BUS  SAFETY 

S.  HRG.  110–1219 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  18,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–274 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE  INFRASTRUCTURE,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 18, 2008  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................

Betts, John, Motorcoach Safety Now 

WITNESSES 
.....................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Brown, Hon. Sherrod, U.S. Senator from Ohio  .....................................................
Forman, Stephen, West Brook Bus Crash Families, Beaumont, Texas  ..............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Gillan, Jacqueline S., Vice President, Advocates for Highway and Auto Safety 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hill, Hon. John, Administrator, Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kelly,  David,  Acting  Administrator,  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Admin-
istration  .................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Pantuso, Peter J., President and CEO, American Bus Association  .....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Rosenker,  Hon.  Mark  V.,  Acting  Chairman,  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Inouye of the Senate Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee 

Letter, dated February 18, 2008, from Peter T. Dishart, President, Enhanced 
Protective  Glass  Automotive  Association  (EPGAA),  to  the  Hon.  Kay  Bailey 
Hutchison  ..............................................................................................................
Letter,  dated  September  15,  2008,  from  Yen-Chi  Le,  Ph.D.,  to  Chairman 
....
Letter,  dated  September  18,  2008  from  Barry  A.  Mesley  to  the  Senate  Sub-
committee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Marine  Infrastructure,  Safety, 
and  Security  and  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transpor-
tation  .....................................................................................................................
Letter,  dated  September  18,  2008  from  Lynn  Mesley  to  the  Senate  Sub-
committee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Marine  Infrastructure,  Safety, 
and  Security  and  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transpor-
tation  .....................................................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
.........................................................................................
..................................................................................................
United Motorcoach Association, prepared statement  ...........................................

Jacqueline S. Gillan 
Hon. John Hill 

Page 
1 
3 
1 

66 
68 
4 
61 
64 
40 
41 
6 
7 

24 
25 
34 
35 

12 
13 

80 

81 

83 

82 

84 
83 
79 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

BUS  SAFETY 

THURSDAY,  SEPTEMBER  18,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND 

MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, SAFETY, AND SECURITY,
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 2:39 p.m., in room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. The hearing will come to order, and I wel-
come  everyone  here  to  today’s  discussion  on  the  safety  of  our  na-
tion’s buses and the passengers who ride in them. This is a hearing 
of  the  Surface  Transportation,  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 
Safety, and Security Subcommittee. 

Our goal is to examine the current laws and safety practices that 
govern motorcoaches, known as the ‘‘over-the-road’’ buses, and how 
we can improve them. 

Buses play a critical role in our nation’s transportation network. 
They  connect  cities  and  communities  that  are  often  without  access 
to  trains  or  commercial  airlines.  They  take  school  sports  teams  to 
games,  tourist  groups  sightseeing  all  over  our  Nation  and  help 
evacuate  populations  being  threatened  by  hurricanes  or  other  nat-
ural  disasters.  And  we  saw  just  this  last  week  during  Hurricane 
Ike when buses were shuttling evacuees to safety. 

In  2006,  631  million  passenger  trips  were  taken  on  a  fleet  of  al-
most 40,000 motorcoaches in the United States. More of these vehi-
cles  are  operated  out  of  my  state  of  New  Jersey  than  in  any  other 
state  in  the  country.  So  it  is  very  important  for  us,  as  it  is  to  me 
and everyone on this Subcommittee, that these buses are safe. 

Unfortunately,  there  have  been  some  serious  crashes.  Over  the 
last  decade,  an  average  of  16  motorcoach  passengers  and  drivers 
have been killed in crashes each year. And just last month in New 
Jersey, two tour buses collided, sending one down a 50-foot ravine. 
Fortunately, nobody was killed, but many were injured. 

And I know that we are joined today by many of the victims and 
their  families  of  the  West  Brook  High  School  and  Bluffton  Univer-
sity bus crashes. So I thank you for being here. Your work will help 
prevent  a  tragedy  like  the  ones  that  you  have  experienced  from 
happening again. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

2 

And  like  these  victims  and  their  families,  my  concern  is  that  we 
are not doing enough to regulate bus companies and protect riders 
from  injury  or  even  death.  We  have  a  picture  here  that  is  really 
shocking.  This  is  evidence  that  more  safety  oversight  is  needed. 
This is a picture received by my office of a bus wheel. The bus be-
longs  to  a  curbside  operator  right  here  in  Washington,  and  the 
photo  was  taken  as  the  bus  pulled  up  to  start  loading  passengers. 
Now,  this  is  a  hanger  here,  in  case  you  cannot  see  it,  and  that  is 
what is used to hold this brake pad together here. Now, these com-
panies,  you  know,  do  not  use  bus  depots,  but  they  pick  passengers 
up and drop them off at the curb. And this was spotted by a police 
officer,  and  that  is  how  this  picture  was  taken.  But  is  that  not  a 
disgraceful  thing,  put  together  with  a  coat  hanger?  It  is  unbeliev-
able. 

One  safety  expert  who  saw  the  picture  commented  that  this  is 
typical  for  curbside  operators  who  have  very  little  oversight.  The 
reason  that  we  need  better  laws  and  oversight  is  the  carelessness 
with human life that this picture demonstrates. 

Two  months  ago,  Congress  passed  the  Over-the-Road  Transpor-
tation  Accessibility  Act,  which  was  an  important  step  to  put  in 
place  common  sense  regulation  for  approving  new  bus  operators. 
Now, thanks to that bill, the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Admin-
istration  now  requires  that  bus  companies  meet  disability  access 
laws  as  intended  by  the  Americans  with  Disabilities  Act.  So  I  am 
pleased  that  this  subcommittee  acted  to  make  sure  that  that  bill 
became law. 

But  there  is  still  work  to  do  to  make  buses  safer  for  their  trav-
elers and drivers, as well as for passengers of other vehicles on the 
road.  Buses  still  lack  many  critical  safety  features  that  can  save 
lives. Most school buses lack seat belts, for instance, and there are 
no  standards  for  roof  strength,  which  is  critical  when  a  bus  rolls 
over.  And  unfit  and  fatigued  drivers  continue  to  be  able  to  get  be-
hind the wheel. 

So  we  should  be  making  safety  improvements  to  the  vehicles 
themselves, as well as completing work in the comprehensive med-
ical oversight program to prevent unfit drivers from operating com-
mercial vehicles, as required by the SAFETEA–LU legislation. 

Many of the improvements that we need to make buses safer are 
similar  to  those  that  we  also  need  in  big  trucks.  For  instance,  we 
know that fatigue is a problem for both bus and truck drivers alike, 
and  requiring  electronic  on-board  recorders  can  make  sure  that 
both  are  ready  to  be  on  the  road.  The  vehicle  may  look  different, 
but  many  of  the  safety  problems  and  inadequate  oversight  are  the 
same. 

And as we look to reauthorize the Federal surface transportation 
programs during the next Congress, we need to thoroughly revamp 
both our bus and truck safety programs. 

Now, Senators Brown and Hutchison have introduced legislation 
to begin that process, and as the families and victims who are here 
with us today know all too well, we must act to improve the safety 
of our buses and the men, women, and children who ride them. 

So  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  today’s  witnesses  as  we  con-

tinue that effort. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

3 

Now I would like to turn to Senator Hutchison for any statement 
that  she  would  like  to  make,  and  then  we  will  call  on  Senator 
Brown. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman. 
I appreciate our having this hearing because it is this hearing that 
will  allow  us  to  mark  up  a  bill  that  will  send  this  bill  to  the  floor, 
and  I  look  forward  to  having  your  input  and  those  of  other  mem-
bers of our Committee in order to do that. 

Let  me  just  say  that  we  do  have  here  many  of  the  families  and 
victims of bus accidents who have taken their time to come and try 
to assure that other families will not have to go through what they 
have had to. And Senator Brown and I just had a press conference 
outside  in  front  of  a  bus  to  show  some  of  the  things  that  can  be 
done,  and  we  are  so  appreciative  of  the  families  who  came  to  tes-
tify.  And  I  am  very  pleased  that  we  are  going  to  have  some  of  the 
experts  here  also  testify  about  what  our  bill  would  do  and  what 
other things need to be done for bus safety. 

The  fact  of  the  matter  is,  we  have  had  just  in  August  in  this 
country  major  bus  accidents  that  caused  fatalities  in  Texas,  Ne-
vada,  Mississippi,  and  New  Jersey.  The  Texas  one  has  representa-
tives  here,  and  I  would  like  to  ask  the  group  from  Houston  who 
have  family  members  and  victims  from  the  bus  accident  in  Sher-
man to please stand. 

They  were  out  at  the  press  conference.  So  I  am  sure  that  they 

will be coming in. 

And  then  we  have  from  West  Brook  High  School  in  Beaumont 
victims  and  families  of  the  accident  that  was  held  to  the  soccer 
team there. Yes, thank you very much. 

And  I  know  that  Senator  Brown  has  constituents  here  from  the 
bus  accident  with  the  Bluffton  baseball  team.  And  if  they  would 
stand. Yes, thank you. 

This  just  shows,  I  think,  Mr.  Chairman,  how  deeply  these  fami-
lies  feel  that  they  are  continuing  to  try  to  do  something  that  will 
allow this to become a safer country for bus passengers. 

Let  me  just  say  a  couple  of  things  about  the  bill  that  Senator 

Brown and I have introduced. It has two points. 

One  is  we  have  technology  now  that  can  prevent  the  accident 
itself. The stabilization control technology has now been developed. 
Mr.  Hill,  who  will  testify  later,  told  me  about  how  that  technology 
has  improved.  Collision  avoidance  systems  are  also  available  now 
that  can  keep  an  accident  from  happening.  And  we  can  upgrade 
our standards for certification and for tracing when a bus company 
is  decertified  and  then  goes  in  under  another  name  and  keeps  the 
same  unfit  buses.  We  can  do  more  in  the  area  of  requirements  for 
inspections. All of these things would help in the prevention of the 
crash itself. 

But accidents will happen. So the other part of our bill will deal 
with  survivability  of  an  accident,  and  that  means  seat  belts  on 
buses. This is something that we believe will make a big difference 
and  something  that  is  very  easy  to  be  done  in  buses  because  we 
know it has been done in other countries. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

4 

In addition to that, we can put glazing on the windows that will 
keep  people  from  being  ejected,  which  is  a  major  cause  of  fatality 
and injury. 

And looking at the way that we can reinforce roofs because many 
of  these  buses  have  glass  tops  so  that  you  can  look  out,  but  we 
could  also  reinforce  those,  again,  with  new  technology.  And  we 
want to have the ability to study how we can better reinforce those 
roofs. 

So  we  have  two  parts  of  our  bill:  prevention  and  survivability. 
And  that  is  what  we  want  to  move  forward,  Mr.  Chairman.  We 
thank  you  for  having  this  hearing  so  that  we  will  be  able  to  move 
forward. I hope it will be this year. If it not this year, we are look-
ing  forward  to  at  least  early  next  year  having  this  bill  come  out 
with  Committee  input  to  be  able  to  do  something  for  the  future 
travelers  in  our  states  and  throughout  our  country.  And  I  think 
that all of us know that we can do it. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Congratulations  to  you  and  to  Senator 
Brown.  I  join  with  you  in  terms  of  the  concerns  and  want  to  get 
things done. 

We  now  call  on  Senator  Brown.  Pleased  to  have  you  here  with 

us. 

STATEMENT OF HON. SHERROD BROWN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OHIO 

Senator BROWN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I really appreciate it, 
and Senator Hutchison, thank you for being here certainly and for 
your terrific work in moving this forward. 

I would like to thank all the witnesses who are joining us today, 
especially John Betts. John and Joy lost their son David, a member 
of  Ohio’s  Bluffton  University  baseball  team,  in  March  2007.  They 
were  on  a  trip  to  Florida  for  a  baseball  tournament  when  the  bus 
lost control on a poorly marked exit ramp just outside Atlanta and 
toppled from an overpass. Five players died. The bus driver and his 
wife died, and several players were pretty badly injured in that ac-
cident. 

Since that day, Joy and John, joined by Barry and Lynn Mesley, 
also  here  today,  who  lost  their  son  also  from  the  Bluffton  baseball 
team,  have  been  courageous  and  vocal  advocates  for  motorcoach 
safety. And it takes special people who are willing to work through 
their grief and fight for sort of the next group of people so they do 
not have to have the grief that so many people behind me have had 
to endure in the last several years. 

The  final  report  from  the  Bluffton  motorcoach  accident  released 
this  spring  echoes  the  recommendations  that  NTSB  has  been  pub-
lishing for years and aligns itself with the safety improvements in-
corporated  in  the  legislation  that  Senator  Hutchison  and  I  have 
been  working  on  for  some  time.  Specifically,  NTSB  underscored 
some  major  safety  shortfalls  from  that  accident  that  must  be  ad-
dressed  such  as  better  protection  systems  for  occupants,  stronger 
passenger  safety  standards,  improved  safety  equipment  and  de-
vices,  and  the  need  for  on-board  recorders  with  the  capability  to 
collect  crash  data.  These  technologies  are  not  exotic.  Many  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

5 

been  around  for  a  long  time,  but  since  they  are  not  required,  they 
simply have not been installed in American motorcoaches. 

Jackie  Gillan,  who  is  the  Vice  President  of  Advocates  for  High-
way and Auto Safety, who perhaps has done more than anybody in 
this city or anywhere else on vehicle safety and highway safety, re-
counts  through  history,  through  the  last  40  years  of  history,  how 
all  the  major  motor  vehicle  safety  measures  that  have  happened 
have  happened  because  Congress  passed  them,  and  Federal  and 
State  agencies  do  not  do  it.  It  really  is  up  to  the  U.S.  Senate  and 
the  House  of  Representatives,  as  it  was  with  seat  belts  and  air 
bags  and  all  the  kinds  of  things  that  many  people—and  you,  I 
know, Mr. Chairman, have been so supportive of all of those. 

As  a  father  of  four,  I  find  it  particularly  disturbing  to  know  stu-
dents  are  still  driving  and  riding  in  vehicles  without  even  the  op-
tion  of  buckling  up.  Seat  belts,  window  glazings,  fire  extin-
guishers—as I said, those are not new technologies. They are com-
mon sense safety features that are widely used that are not highly 
expensive to do, especially when the bus is actually being manufac-
tured.  Yet,  mandating  them,  as  recommended  by  NTSB,  has  been 
languishing for years. 

Last  month  was  yet  another  fatal  month  for  motorcoach  pas-
sengers,  as  family  members  of  victims  of  the  Sherman,  Texas 
crash,  who  are  here  today,  show.  There  is  no  question  that  with 
stronger  safety  regulations,  the  tragedies  and  fatalities  in  motor-
coach accidents can, in fact, be minimized. If the technology to save 
lives  and  reduce  injuries  exists—and  it  certainly  does—we  must 
make  every  effort  to  put  that  technology  to  use,  and  since  the  bus 
companies  and  motorcoach  companies  have  not  done  it  on  their 
own, it is up to us to make it happen. 

It is my hope that in the future, parents will not have to endure 
the anguish and the grief that the Mesleys and the Bettses and Ms. 
Lee,  who  is  here  on  behalf  of  her  mother  who  died,  and  the 
Formans—Steve  Forman  here  with  his  daughter  who  was  injured. 
That just should not happen anymore. 

I thank the Chairman for his interest. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Senator Brown. 
Senator  Hutchison,  do  you  have  anything  else  that  you  want  to 

add? 

Senator HUTCHISON. No, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Then  I  would  thank  you  very  much  for 

being with us, Senator Brown. 

Now  I  would  like  to  welcome  today’s  first  panel  of  witnesses  to 
discuss  their  ideas  and  their  plans  on  how  to  improve  the  safety 
of motorcoaches and the passengers who use them. 

First,  John  Hill  is  the  Administrator  of  the  Federal  Motor  Car-
rier  Safety  Administration  at  the  Department  of  Transportation. 
His  agency  is  responsible  for  bus  and  truck  safety,  and  he  is  in 
charge of several programs to address the safety challenges that we 
are discussing today. 

Mr.  David  Kelly,  Acting  Administrator  at  the  National  Highway 
Traffic Safety Administration. His agency sets safety standards for 
every new motorcoach sold in our country. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

6 

And  Mark  Rosenker  is  the  Acting  Chairman  of  the  National 
Transportation  Safety  Board.  There  are  several  recommendations 
on the NTSB’s most wanted safety improvement list for buses. 

I  thank  all  of  you  for  coming  today  and  lending  your  expertise 
to this hearing. Mr. Hill, I would call on you first. Please recognize 
that  we  have  a  5-minute  time  limit.  We  would  ask  you  to  try  to 
stay within that timeframe. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN HILL, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 

Mr.  HILL.  Yes,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you.  It  is  a  pleasure  to  be 
with  you  today,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee;  Senator 
Hutchison, thank you for appearing today as well. 

As  announced  by  Secretary  Mary  Peters,  the  total  number  of  fa-
talities  on  the  Nation’s  highways  declined  3.9  percent  in  2007,  the 
lowest level since 1994. 2007 had the lowest fatal bus crashes since 
2004, down 8.6 percent from 2006. 

During  my  tenure  as  Administrator,  I  have  redirected  the  agen-
cy’s  resources  and  engaged  our  state  partners  to  prioritize  motor-
coach  programs  by  expediting  safety  audits  and  complete  more 
compliance  reviews  and  inspections,  by  requiring  each  state  to  es-
tablish a motorcoach safety program. 

The  devastation  of  the  August  8  crash  in  Sherman,  Texas,  is  a 
solemn reminder of the need for rigorous oversight and strong pen-
alties  for  unsafe  bus  carriers.  Due  to  the  illegal  behavior  of  the 
motor carrier involved, 17 people lost their lives and 15 others were 
injured. The carrier involved in this tragic crash was operating ille-
gally  and  was  a  reincarnation  of  another  unsafe  motorcoach  com-
pany  that  FMCSA  had  placed  out  of  service  in  June.  Both  compa-
nies  were  owned  and  operated  by  the  same  individual,  and  the 
newly created carrier involved in the crash was placed out of serv-
ice the day following the crash. 

Although  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board’s  investiga-
tion is continuing, at this time FMCSA has discovered at least four 
deficiencies  with  the  motor  carrier  and  the  equipment  involved  in 
the crash. First, the motor carrier did not have the authority to op-
erate  as  a  for-hire  motor  carrier.  Second,  the  tire  that  blew  was  a 
recap/retread  tire  installed  in  the  front  steering  axle,  which  is  im-
permissible under our regulations. Third, the carrier did not ensure 
that  the  driver  was  medically  qualified,  and  last,  the  carrier  was 
not conducting pre-employment drug testing. 

While  investigating,  FMCSA  determined  that  the  motor  carrier 
was  operating  motorcoaches  that  were  being  used  by  a  third  pas-
senger  carrier.  The  agency  immediately  dispatched  investigators 
and  issued  an  imminent  hazard  out-of-service  order  on  this  third 
carrier,  shutting  down  any  operations  involving  the  carriers  impli-
cated in the crash. 

The bus involved in the Sherman crash had been inspected as re-
cently as July 31 and did not have a retread tire at that time. The 
vehicle  and  driver  deficiencies  permitted  by  this  carrier  dem-
onstrate  how  far  some  motor  carriers  will  go  to  defy  existing  laws 
and regulations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

7 

Fortunately,  the  majority  of  the  industry,  nearly  3,900  active 
passenger  carriers,  operates  properly  and  delivers  its  passengers 
safely. 

In  2007,  FMCSA  and  our  State  partners  more  than  doubled  the 
number  of  compliance  reviews,  referred  to  as  the  CR’s,  to  1,300 
from  600  in  2006.  This  represents  a  185  percent  increase  over  the 
number of compliance reviews in 1985. To date in 2008, the agency 
has completed 1,257 compliance reviews on motorcoach companies. 
We also have a safe stat system which identifies high-risk motor 
carriers  in  need  of  agency  oversight.  Consistent  with  NTSB  rec-
ommendations,  we  revised  that  system  to  identify  additional  pas-
senger carriers that will receive compliance reviews. 

FMCSA and its State partners completed approximately 148,000 
bus  inspections  in  Fiscal  Year  2007,  160  percent  higher  than  were 
conducted in 2005, and to date, we have conducted over 140,000 of 
these inspections. And especially noteworthy is the increasing num-
ber of bus inspections, even though the SAFETEA–LU reauthoriza-
tion  bill  instituted  a  prohibition  of  en  route  bus  inspections  unless 
an egregious safety defect exists. 

We  continue  to  recognize  the  importance  of  strong  safety  data. 
Therefore, we are working to establish a bus fire database that will 
give  us  more  information  about  bus  fires  and  allow  us  to  better 
have a handle on what is going on in the industry regarding these 
tragic fires. 

The agency established a goal to complete new entrant safety au-
dits for motor carriers within 9 months, rather than the 18 months 
as  required  by  statute.  Rather  than  taking  9  months,  on  average 
we  are  getting  to  the  audits  of  these  companies  within  5  months. 
FMCSA  has  responded  to  a  number  of  NTSB  motorcoach  rec-
ommendations.  Several  of  these  relate  to  the  medical  certification 
requirements  final  rule  and  national  registry  of  certified  medical 
examiners notice of proposed rulemaking currently under review at 
the Office of Management and Budget, and we will plan to publish 
these rules later this year. 

FMCSA  partnered  with  the  motorcoach  industry  to  develop  and 
distribute  a  booklet  on  motorcoach  brake  systems  and  safety  tech-
nologies. Recently we requested closure of three other recommenda-
tions relating to the publishing of pre-trip safety guidance and out-
reach materials. 

Mr.  Chairman,  sadly  the  owner  of  the  company  involved  in  the 
Sherman  crash  chose  to  ignore  passenger  safety  by  disregarding 
the rules intended to protect them. Our agency is dedicated to find-
ing and stopping such operators before they commit these atrocious 
acts. 

I would be happy to respond to your questions. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hill follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN HILL, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  today  to  discuss  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier 
Safety  Administration’s  (FMCSA)  programs  related  to  bus  operations.  I  am  pleased 
to  have  the  opportunity  to  discuss  how  FMCSA’s  important  programs  improve  bus 
safety  and  make  the  Nation’s  highways  safer.  As  recently  announced  by  Transpor-
tation  Secretary  Mary  Peters,  the  total  number  of  fatalities  on  the  Nation’s  high-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

8 

ways declined 3.9 percent in 2007 to the lowest level since 1994. For the bus indus-
try,  2007  had  the  fewest  fatal  bus  crashes  since  2004,  down  8.6  percent  from  2006. 
The  number  of  fatalities  in  bus  crashes  was  also  4.5  percent  lower  than  in  2006. 
The  Agency  recognizes,  however,  that  every  life  lost  is  one  too  many,  and  under-
stands  fully  the  risk  of  multiple  injuries  and  fatalities  in  a  bus  crash.  As  a  result, 
we continue to place a high priority on our passenger carrier programs. 

The  industry  has  seen  many  recent  market  changes.  For  example,  the  economy 
and  rising  fuel  prices  have  contributed  to  increased  ridership  and  new  bus  compa-
nies. FMCSA monitors the industry, remaining agile and adjusting as needed to off-
set the risks that these changes introduce. 

FMCSA  remains  dedicated  to  developing  and  implementing  strong  safety  pro-
grams  to  reduce  crashes  of  buses  and  large  trucks.  Over  the  past  81⁄2 years,  the 
Agency  has  implemented  new  regulations,  grant  requirements,  processes,  and  pen-
alties  to  make  the  industry  safer.  During  my  tenure  as  Administrator,  I  have  redi-
rected FMCSA’s resources and engaged our State partners actively to complete more 
compliance reviews (CRs), inspections, and nationwide strike forces. Within the last 
year, I visited the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s (NHTSA) Vehi-
cle  Research  and  Test  Center  in  East  Liberty,  Ohio,  and  witnessed  a  motorcoach 
crash  test  to  gain  additional  information  and  insight  into  passenger  carrier  safety 
issues. Additionally, I rode two curbside buses to New York, NY, from Washington, 
D.C.,  to  understand  how  this  emerging  business  model  employs  safety  practices  in 
its operations. 
Sherman, Texas Motorcoach Crash 

Seeing  the  devastation  of  the  August  8,  2008,  crash  in  Sherman,  Texas,  is  a  sol-
emn reminder of the need for rigorous oversight and strong penalties for unsafe car-
riers.  Due  to  the  alleged  unsafe  behavior  of  the  motor  carrier  involved,  17  people 
on  a  religious  pilgrimage  lost  their  lives  and  15  others  were  injured.  The  families 
and communities of these victims will suffer the repercussions for a long time. 

The carrier involved in this tragic crash, Iguala Busmex, did not have proper au-
thority  to  operate  and  was  actually  a  reincarnation  of  another  unsafe  motorcoach 
company, Angel Tours, Inc., that FMCSA had placed out-of-service in June after de-
claring  it  unsatisfactory  and  unfit  to  operate.  Both  of  these  companies  were  owned 
and  operated  by  the  same  individual,  Angel  De  La  Torre.  Although  the  National 
Transportation  Safety  Board’s  (NTSB’s)  investigation  is  proceeding,  FMCSA  discov-
ered at least three deficiencies with Iguala Busmex when the crash occurred, in ad-
dition to its not having operating authority. 

First,  the  tire  that  deflated  was  a  recap/retread  tire  that  had  been  installed  on 
the right front steering axle, in violation of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regu-
lations.  While  such  tires  are  permitted  on  axles  at  the  rear  of  a  bus,  having  them 
on  a  front  or  steering  axle  is  prohibited  by  Federal  regulations.  Second,  the  carrier 
did  not  ensure  that  the  driver  was  certified  as  meeting  our  medical  standards.  The 
driver had an expired medical certificate in his possession at the time of the crash. 
Third, the carrier was not conducting preemployment drug testing. 

Further, while investigating, FMCSA determined that the motor carrier was oper-
ating  motorcoaches  that  were  being  used  by  two  different  motor  carriers,  Iguala 
Busmex, Inc. and Liberty Charters and Tours. Following the discovery of this infor-
mation, FMCSA dispatched additional investigators. 

FMCSA  discovered  that  Angel  De  La  Torre  was  involved  in  managing  at  least 
some  aspects  of  Liberty  Charters  and  Tours.  Based  on  these  findings,  FMCSA 
issued  an  imminent  hazard  out-of-service  order  on  August  12  prohibiting  Liberty 
Charters  and  Tours  from  using  drivers  or  vehicles  that  were  under  the  control  or 
employ  of  Angel  Tours,  Iguala  Busmex,  or  Angel  De  La  Torre.  The  Agency  issues 
imminent hazard out-of-service orders when continued operation of the company in-
creases substantially the likelihood of serious injury or death. 

The  bus  involved  in  the  Sherman  crash  had  been  inspected  as  recently  as  July 
31,  and  did  not  have  a  retread  tire  at  that  time.  However,  FMCSA’s  continuing  in-
vestigations  demonstrate  the  extent  to  which  some  motor  carriers  go  to  defy  laws 
and  regulations.  They  represent  the  most  egregious  carriers  with  which  we  must 
contend. Fortunately, these carriers represent the minority of the industry. Most of 
the  3,938  active  interstate  motorcoach  carriers  operating  33,250  vehicles  operate 
properly and deliver their passengers safely. 
Update on FMCSA’s National Bus Safety Program 

When  I  testified  before  your  House  colleagues  in  March  2007,  I  explained  that 
FMCSA’s National Motorcoach Safety Program emphasizes six areas: (1) increasing 
the  number  of  motorcoach  CRs;  (2)  ensuring  passenger  carriers  have  a  higher  pri-
ority within FMCSA’s CR prioritization system, known as SafeStat; (3) establishing 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

9 

formal  bus  inspection  programs  within  all  States;  (4)  improving  the  collection  and 
analysis  of  safety  data;  (5)  reducing  motorcoach  fires;  and  (6)  expediting  safety  au-
dits of new entrant passenger carriers. Over the past 14 months, FMCSA has made 
considerable progress in each of these areas. 
Motorcoach Compliance Reviews 

In Fiscal Year 2005, FMCSA and its State partners completed CRs on 457 motor-
coach  companies.  FMCSA  increased  this  number  to  more  than  600  in  FY  2006.  I 
am pleased to report that this was more than doubled in 2007 to 1,304. In FY 2008, 
the  Agency  has  completed  1,257  motorcoach  CRs  to  date.  FMCSA  continues  to  ad-
just its resources and goals to reach more motorcoach carriers. I would like to take 
this  opportunity  to  commend  FMCSA’s  State  partners  and  the  Commercial  Vehicle 
Safety Alliance (CVSA), who have been instrumental in helping exceed these goals. 
Passenger Carrier Enhancements to the SafeStat System 

Directly related to FMCSA’s CR program is the Agency’s modification of the algo-
rithm  used  in  the  SafeStat  system.  FMCSA  and  State  enforcement  inspectors  use 
the SafeStat system to identify high risk motor carriers in need of Agency oversight. 
The Agency recognizes that bus companies should receive the utmost program atten-
tion  and  enforcement  resources.  As  a  result,  FMCSA  has  revised  its  SafeStat  CR 
prioritization  system  to  address  the  additional  risks  associated  with  passenger 
transportation  by  applying  more  stringent  safety  standards  for  passenger  carriers. 
Under  the  revised  system,  FMCSA  has  identified  additional  groups  of  passenger 
carriers  as  its  highest  priorities  for  CRs.  These  groups  include  passenger  carriers 
with  less  than  satisfactory  ratings,  those  with  operational  data  showing  violations, 
and passenger carriers that have not been reviewed in the last 5 years. 

Prior  to  the  implementation  of  this  new  algorithm,  101  passenger  carriers  were 
on  the  prioritized  CR  list.  Under  the  new  system,  FMCSA  will  now  be  reviewing 
889  passenger  carriers  on  the  priority  list,  nearly  double  the  number  of  passenger 
carrier CRs in FY 2005. 
Bus Inspections 

For the past two Fiscal Years, FMCSA’s State partners have been required to in-
clude  a  bus  inspection  program  in  their  Commercial  Vehicle  Safety  Plan  (CVSP)  in 
order  to  receive  funding  under  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Assistance  Program.  As  a 
result,  147,686  bus  inspections  were  completed  in  FY  2007,  which  is  160  percent 
higher  than  the  56,084  bus  inspections  conducted  in  FY  2005.  In  FY  2008,  140,448 
inspections have been conducted to date. 

The FMCSA has continued to augment its program with bus strike forces to focus 
attention  on  passenger  carrier  safety.  The  most  recent  strike  force  was  conducted 
August  4–16  and  spanned  all  50  states  and  the  District  of  Columbia.  Federal  and 
State personnel from numerous law enforcement agencies participated in the strike 
force,  completing  approximately  12,000  safety  inspections  on  vehicles  and  drivers. 
As a result, 1,200 buses were placed out of service. 
Improved Safety Data 

The results of these increased efforts remove unsafe drivers and vehicles from the 
road  and  give  the  Agency  additional  data  on  passenger  carriers  that  can  be  used 
to  further  research,  program  initiatives,  and  risk  assessment  on  carriers  and  driv-
ers. 

FMCSA is currently completing a Bus Crash Causation Study. Based on the data 
analysis  to  date,  it  appears  that,  like  the  Large  Truck  Crash  Causation  Study 
(LTCCS)  issued  in  November  2005,  other  vehicles  and  drivers  were  responsible  for 
the  crashes  in  more  than  half  of  the  cases  (20  out  of  39).  In  addition,  where  the 
critical reason for the crash was assigned to the bus driver, the crash was the result 
of  driver  errors  including  inadequate  surveillance,  inattention,  and  following  too 
closely. Only four crashes were related to vehicle malfunctions. In two cases, brakes 
failed  and  in  the  other  two  there  were  fires.  The  Agency  will  continue  its  efforts  to 
increase focus on both commercial motor vehicle (CMV) and nonCMV drivers. 
Bus Fires 

On July 24, 2007, FMCSA published a Federal Register notice to advise that fires 
must be treated as crashes concerning reporting requirements. Motor carriers must 
now  include  fires  on  their  accident  register  and  law  enforcement  agencies  should 
capture  the  information  on  their  State  Accident  Reporting  System.  The  additional 
data from this change improves significantly FMCSA’s fire data collection and anal-
ysis efforts. 

The  FMCSA,  through  the  Department’s  Volpe  National  Transportation  Systems 
Center,  developed  a  national  motorcoach  fire  database  and  completed  a  fire  safety 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

10 

analysis.  This  study  reviewed  more  than  500  fire  incidents  over  the  last  10  years 
using  information  from  FMCSA’s  Motor  Carrier  Management  Information  System, 
the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  National  Fire  Incident  Reporting  System, 
and  individual  state  accident  reporting  data.  The  study  recommended  focusing  on 
improving  the  effectiveness  of  State  and  Federal  motorcoach  inspection  practices  to 
identify  mechanical  conditions  that  can  cause  fires.  With  this  information,  FMCSA 
worked  with  the  CVSA  to  change  the  out-of-service  criteria  to  include  oil  leaks  in 
wheel hubs and frayed or damaged wiring on bus electrical systems. 

The FMCSA is expanding the original study to include newly available fire infor-
mation  from  2004  to  2008.  This  will  allow  the  Agency  to  examine  newer 
motorcoaches  that  may  be  equipped  with  automatic  fire  detection  and  suppression 
systems  and  evaluate  the  efficacy  of  such  safety  devices.  Recently,  FMCSA  entered 
into  a  partnership  with  NHTSA’s  Special  Crash  Investigation  unit  to  evaluate  fire 
incidents  on  motorcoaches  and  conduct  detailed  engineering  root  cause  analysis.  A 
team of NHTSA technical experts will travel to motorcoach fires to perform an engi-
neering analysis to determine whether root cause engineering data can be obtained 
that  will  indicate  why  the  fire  occurred  and  whether  a  primary  contributing  factor 
can be identified. 
New Entrant Passenger Carriers 

As  reported  in  July  2007,  FMCSA  established  an  internal  goal  to  complete  the 
new  entrant  safety  audits  for  passenger  carriers  within  9  months,  rather  than  the 
18  months  provided  in  the  originating  statute.  In  FY  2007,  FMCSA  completed  86.6 
percent within 9 months and 94.7 percent within 18 months. For FY 2008, to date, 
the percentages are 83.5 percent and 94.8 percent, respectively. On average, a safety 
audit is conducted on a new motorcoach carrier within 4.5 months. 

The Agency expects publication of the final rule on the New Entrant Safety Assur-
ance  Process  later  this  year.  At  present,  the  rule  is  in  the  final  stages  of  Depart-
mental review. The notice of proposed rulemaking published on December 21, 2006, 
recommended  strengthening  the  standards  for  all  motor  carriers  and  requiring 
verification  and  education  about  the  requirements  of  the  Americans  with  Disabil-
ities Act (ADA) during the safety audit. Changes in this program will contribute sig-
nificantly  to  starting  new  carriers  off  right  and  will  enable  FMCSA  and  its  State 
partners  to  identify  unsafe  carriers  and  ensure  the  early  correction  of  unsafe  prac-
tices. 
Current and Future Authorities 

While  these  six  National  Motorcoach  Safety  Program  initiatives  have  resulted  in 
significant  enhancements  to  our  safety  programs,  FMCSA  continues  to  use  its  cur-
rent  authority  and  looks  for  additional  authority  that  would  eliminate  loopholes, 
identify  more  unsafe  carriers,  and  make  the  industry  safer.  Recently,  FMCSA  re-
ceived  additional  direction  through  the  Over-the-Road  Bus  Transportation  Accessi-
bility Act of 2007 (P.L. 110–291), signed into law by President Bush on July 30. This 
legislation  clarifies  the  Agency’s  role  in  considering  ADA  compliance  before  oper-
ating  authority  is  granted  and  authorizes  the  Agency  to  revoke  operating  authority 
based on willful noncompliance with DOT’s ADA regulations. 

I am pleased to report that FMCSA met the requirement of the Act to ‘‘take nec-
essary actions to implement the changes required’’ within 30 days. To that end, the 
Agency has provided staff with the needed procedures and direction for implementa-
tion. In addition, we have initiated the development of the Memorandum of Under-
standing (MOU) with the Department of Justice, as required by the statute, and are 
on target to complete the MOU by the 6-month statutory deadline. 

The Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for 
Users  (SAFETEA–LU)  established  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Advisory  Committee 
(MCSAC)  to  provide  advice  and  recommendations  on  motor  carrier  safety  programs 
and motor carrier safety regulations. The MCSAC recently recommended several re-
authorization  proposals  to  the  Agency  for  consideration.  We  are  now  reviewing  the 
advisory  committee’s  recommendations.  The  Agency’s  next  reauthorization  will  be 
critical  in  providing  the  tools  and  resources  needed  by  FMCSA  to  create  an  even 
more robust safety program. 

To  ensure  that  noncompliant  carriers  are  not  attempting  to  evade  detection  by 
creating new motor carriers, the Agency has implemented a vetting process for new 
passenger  carrier  operating  authority  applicants.  This  process  compares  available 
applicant  information  to  existing  carrier  information.  FMCSA’s  algorithm  identifies 
common characteristics such as names, addresses, phone numbers, e-mail addresses, 
vehicles,  drivers,  and  insurance  policy  information.  If  similarities  are  detected, 
FMCSA investigates further. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

11 

The application is vetted by FMCSA and with the appropriate State agency. If an 
affiliation with a carrier with an unsafe record is detected through this vetting proc-
ess, the applicant is required to provide additional documentation. FMCSA will deny 
authority to any unsafe carrier attempting to reestablish itself as a new carrier. 
Driver Issues 

The  FMCSA  continues  to  monitor  other  areas  of  concern  including  driver  health, 
driver  fatigue,  and  the  impacts  of  non-CMVs  around  large  trucks  and  buses.  In 
April  2008,  FMCSA  began  a  24-month  research  study  specific  to  motorcoach  driver 
fatigue.  This  research  will  gather  empirical  data  on  motorcoach  driver  schedules  to 
help bus companies better manage fatigue in their driver operations. 

The  Agency  continues  to  focus  on  driver  information  available  through  our  exist-
ing  systems.  FMCSA  developed  the  Driver  Information  Resource  (DIR)  in  response 
to SAFETEA–LU. The DIR is a Web-based tool that allows a user to search by driv-
er  for  a  driver’s  crash  and  inspection  history,  regardless  of  a  driver’s  employment 
history. FMCSA and State enforcement staff continue to use this tool to access driv-
er-specific data. The Agency expects to make this information available to the motor 
carrier industry as a part of the preemployment verification process. Approved com-
panies would distribute the information to inquiring motor carriers with the driver’s 
approval.  The  system  is  to  be  accessible  by  motor  carriers  in  2009.  This  will  result 
in bus and truck companies hiring safer drivers or risking consequences for employ-
ing unsafe operators. 

Additionally, FMCSA’s Comprehensive Safety Analysis 2010 (CSA 2010) program 
will address driver-specific issues. CSA 2010 will collect and manage driver specific 
data and target drivers and carriers based on these data. 
NTSB Recommendations 

FMCSA has been responding to a number of NTSB motorcoach recommendations. 
Several of these recommendations relate to two FMCSA rulemakings: ‘‘Medical Cer-
tification  Requirements  as  Part  of  the  Commercial  Driver’s  License’’  and  ‘‘National 
Registry  of  Certified  Medical  Examiners.’’  The  Medical  Certification  final  rule  and 
the National Registry notice of proposed rulemaking are currently under review. We 
anticipate publishing both of these rules later this fall. 

In  addition,  in  response  to  a  NTSB  recommendation,  FMCSA  partnered  with  the 
American  Bus  Association  (ABA),  the  United  Motorcoach  Association  (UMA),  and 
the  CVSA  to  develop  and  distribute  a  booklet  entitled,  ‘‘Motorcoach  Brake  Systems 
and  Safety  Technologies.’’  More  than  4,000  copies  were  distributed  and  the  docu-
ment is accessible on the FMCSA website. 

FMCSA  has  developed  a  new  algorithm  to  change  the  prioritization  of 
motorcoaches  in  the  SafeStat  system.  As  a  result,  FMCSA  has  requested  that  the 
NTSB close the related recommendation. 

Additionally,  FMCSA  recently  requested  closure  of  three  other  recommendations 
related to the publishing of pre-trip safety guidance in the Federal Register and de-
velopment  and  publication  of  outreach  materials.  30,000  brochures,  20,000  audio 
CDs,  and  6,000  posters  have  been  distributed.  In  addition,  these  materials  were 
posted  on  FMCSA’s  website.  The  Agency  continues  to  target  non-traditional  motor-
coach users and operators, such as church and school groups. 

Finally,  another  recommendation  relates  to  developing  a  national  bus  fire  data-
base  and  studying  the  causes,  frequency,  and  severity  of  bus  and  motorcoach  fires. 
As I explained earlier in my statement, FMCSA has engaged the Volpe Center and 
NHTSA to provide assistance in this effort. 
Partnerships 

It  must  be  noted  that  FMCSA  could  not  have  made  these  accomplishments  with-
out  our  partnerships  with  other  DOT  agencies  such  as  NHTSA  and  the  Federal 
Transit  Administration,  other  Federal  agencies,  State  and  local  law  enforcement 
agencies,  and  organizations  such  as  the  American  Bus  Association,  the  United  Mo-
torcoach  Association,  and  the  Commercial  Vehicle  Safety  Alliance.  These  critically 
important  relationships  help  to  bring  issues  to  light  and  strengthen  the  industry. 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  reiterate  FMCSA’s  dedication  to  bus  safety.  Our 
agency works each day to ensure that every passenger arrives home safely to loved 
ones  from  every  trip.  In  the  history  of  CMV  enforcement  and  regulatory  oversight, 
we  now  have  more  inspections,  more  CRs  and  timelier  new  entrant  audits,  and 
greater  outreach  and  education  than  ever.  In  advance  of  the  Sherman  tragedy, 
FMCSA took strong steps to ensure the safety of our highways. We identified a car-
rier  as  unsafe,  conducted  a  thorough  investigation,  and  determined  the  carrier  to 
be  unfit,  placing  it  out  of  service.  Sadly,  the  owner  of  the  company  that  had  been 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

12 

placed out of service chose to ignore his passengers’ safety by disregarding the rules 
intended to protect them. This willful negligence has no place in the future of Amer-
ican transportation. Our agency is dedicated to finding and stopping such operators 
before they commit these atrocious acts. 

While  we  are  seeing  a  reduction  in  the  total  number  of  fatalities  each  year, 
FMCSA recognizes that much work remains. Please be assured of my continued per-
sonal commitment to reducing these fatalities further and making our nation’s high-
ways  even  safer.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today  about 
this  important  issue.  I  also  commend  the  Subcommittee  for  continuing  to  focus  on 
bus  safety  to  increase  protection  of  the  American  people.  I  would  be  happy  to  re-
spond to any questions you may have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Now Mr. Rosenker. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK V. ROSENKER, ACTING 

CHAIRMAN, NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 
Mr. ROSENKER. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. Chairman 
Lautenberg,  Senator  Hutchison,  my  name  is  Mark  Rosenker,  and 
I  am  the  Acting  Chairman  of  the  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board. I would like to take this opportunity to thank you for invit-
ing me to testify today on motorcoach safety. 

As  you  know,  the  Safety  Board  is  charged  with  investigating  ac-
cidents  in  all  modes  of  transportation,  including  highways.  We  de-
termine the probable cause and make recommendations to prevent 
similar accidents from happening again. 

Motorcoach  travel  is  one  of  the  safest  modes  of  transportation. 
However,  when  accidents  do  occur,  they  typically  involve  substan-
tial  numbers  of  people  traveling  in  a  single  vehicle,  and  it  is  often 
carrying students or elderly persons who rely on motorcoach travel 
and  have  placed  their  safety  in  the  hands  of  a  professional  motor-
coach  operator.  Therefore,  the  public  demands  that  motorcoaches 
meet the highest level of safety. 

Today  I  would  like  to  discuss  three  areas  where  improvements 
can  be  made  to  make  motorcoach  travel  even  safer.  They  involve 
motorcoach  vehicle  improvements,  oversight  improvements,  and 
technology improvements. 

First,  I  would  like  to  talk  about  vehicle  improvements.  For  dec-
ades,  the  Safety  Board  has  been  concerned  with  motorcoach  occu-
pant  protection  and  the  fatalities  and  injuries  caused  when  pas-
sengers  are  thrown  from  their  seats  or  ejected.  In  fact,  we  just  re-
visited  this  issue  in  the  Bluffton  University  accident  in  Atlanta 
where 12 occupants were ejected from the motorcoach. 

The  Board’s  recommendations  to  NHTSA  included:  develop 
standards  for  a  motorcoach  occupant  protection  system  that  pro-
tects  passengers  in  all  crash  scenarios;  revise  window  glazing  re-
quirements to prevent occupant ejections, yet still allows passenger 
egress;  and  make  motorcoach  roofs  stronger.  These  improvements 
would go a long way in protecting passengers during a crash. 

Motor coach fires are also a concern. Even though deaths and in-
juries  have  historically  been  rare,  the  Board  discovered  after  the 
tragic  motorcoach  fire  near  Dallas,  Texas  in  2005  that  the  con-
sequences  can  be  devastating.  As  a  result,  the  Board  made  rec-
ommendations  to  NHTSA  to  require  enhanced  fire  protection  of 
fuel  systems  and  fire-hardened  materials  in  motorcoaches;  develop 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

13 

fire  detection  systems;  and  establish  acceptable  passenger  egress 
times for motorcoaches. 

The  Board  has  asked  NHTSA  to  require  that  motorcoaches  be 
equipped  with  event  data  recorders  which  can  be  used  to  collect 
crash  data  and  evaluate  crash  pulses  and  occupant  protection 
issues  when  crashes  do  occur.  The  Board  recently  reiterated  this 
recommendation in July, following the Bluffton accident. 

For  decades,  the  Board  has  been  concerned  with  the  safety  pro-
vided by motorcoach operators and the oversight provided by local, 
State,  and  Federal  agencies.  We  have  made  the  following  rec-
ommendations to FMCSA. 

Elevate  the  importance  of  driver  and  vehicle  safety  rule  viola-
tions  in  order  to  take  more  unfit  carriers  off  the  road.  This  rec-
ommendation  was  originally  made  in  1999  and  most  recently  reit-
erated following the motorcoach fire near Dallas. 

Implement our eight recommendations that call for a comprehen-
sive  medical  oversight  program  for  commercial  drivers.  This  rec-
ommendation  was  originally  made  in  2001,  following  the  tragic 
Mother’s Day crash in New Orleans and was placed on the Board’s 
most wanted list in 2003. 

Implement  technology  that  would  prevent  commercial  drivers 
from  falsifying  their  log  books  and  make  it  easier  for  motor  car-
riers,  law  enforcement  agencies,  and  the  FMCSA  to  monitor  driv-
ers’  hours  by  requiring  electronic  on-board  recorders  for  hours  of 
service. This device would go a long way in helping prevent fatigue- 
related accidents. 

And finally, prohibit cellular telephone use by commercial drivers 

on motorcoaches. 

The Board also believes that developing and installing new tech-
nologies such as adaptive cruise control, collision warning systems, 
active braking and electronic stability control hold great promise in 
reducing  accidents.  The  Board  has  made  recommendations  to 
NHTSA  to  study  and  implement  these  and  other  technologies  and 
has recently added this topic to the Board’s most wanted list. 

In summary, the NTSB believes that although the motorcoach is 
still  one  of  the  safest  modes  of  transportation,  there  are  many, 
many improvements that can be made to make it even safer. 

Mr. Chairman, I would be available to respond to any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Rosenker follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARK V. ROSENKER, ACTING CHAIRMAN, 

NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Good  morning  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of 
the  Subcommittee.  My  name  is  Mark  Rosenker,  Acting  Chairman  of  the  National 
Transportation Safety Board. I would like to take this opportunity to thank you and 
the  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today  on  motorcoach 
safety and for your continued interest in furthering the safety of our Nation’s high-
ways. 

As  you  know,  the  Safety  Board  is  charged  with  investigating  accidents  in  all  the 
modes of transportation, including highways, to determine their probable cause, and 
make recommendations to prevent similar accidents from happening again. Over the 
years the Board has done important work in virtually all aspects of highway safety 
including  highway  or  vehicle  design;  roadway  environment;  occupant  protection; 
driver performance; driver training; emergency response; roadway, bridge, and tun-
nel  construction;  and  oversight  by  regulatory  agencies  at  the  local,  state,  and  Fed-
eral levels. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

14 

Today, I would like to discuss the Safety Board recommendations in areas regard-
ing  several  important  issues  that  the  Board  believes  will  make  a  difference  in  mo-
torcoach safety. 

As  you  know,  intercity  motorcoach  travel  is  one  of  the  safest  modes  of  transpor-
tation,  with  approximately  17  occupant  fatalities  in  an  average  year.  It  is  also  one 
of the most popular forms of travel—transporting more passengers than either com-
mercial air or rail travel, according to industry estimates. However, when accidents 
occur,  they  typically  involve  substantial  numbers  of  people  traveling  in  a  single  ve-
hicle. 

These  passengers  are  often  students  or  elderly  persons  who  rely  on  motorcoach 
travel  and  have  placed  their  safety  in  the  hands  of  a  professional  motorcoach  oper-
ator. That factor demands that motorcoaches meet the highest level of safety. 

When tragic accidents occur, the public turns to the Safety Board for answers. Be-
cause  the  Board  ultimately  determines  the  probable  cause  and  makes  safety  rec-
ommendations  to  prevent  future  accidents  from  occurring  again,  the  public’s  con-
fidence is reassured. 

My  discussions  today  include  3  areas:  motorcoach  vehicle  improvements,  motor-

coach oversight improvements, and motorcoach technology improvements. 
Motorcoach Vehicle Improvements 

For  decades,  the  Safety  Board  has  been  concerned  with  injury  causation  mecha-
nisms  with  regard  to  the  occupants  in  motorcoach  accidents.  These  areas  include 
motorcoach  passenger  protection,  event  data  recorders,  and  motorcoach  fire  protec-
tion. 
Motorcoach Passenger Protection 

One of the primary causes of passenger injury in motorcoach buses is passengers 
being thrown from their seats. An accident and the overall injury risk to occupants 
can be significantly reduced during an accident by keeping occupants in the seating 
compartment  throughout  the  collision.  In  addition,  we  found  that  equipping  motor-
coach side windows with advanced glazing may decrease the number of ejections of 
unrestrained passengers and decrease the risk of serious injuries to restrained pas-
sengers during motorcoach accidents. 

In  the  Bluffton  University  accident  in  Atlanta,  7  of  the  35  motorcoach  occupants 
were  killed.  Twelve  occupants  were  ejected  from  the  motorcoach  and  2  more  occu-
pants were partially ejected. 

From 2000 through 2006, 43 motorcoach accidents occurred in which at least one 
occupant  was  fatally  injured.  In  these  motorcoach  accidents,  which  resulted  in  122 
total fatalities, 41 occupants were partially or fully ejected from the motorcoach. In 
15 of the 43 accidents, the motorcoach rolled over and 38 ejected fatalities occurred 
during the rollovers. 

The Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards (FMVSS) contain 22 crashworthiness 
standards.  Most  of  these  standards  exempt  motorcoaches  with  a  gross  vehicle 
weight  over  10,000  pounds,  and  no  Federal  regulations  require  that  motorcoaches 
in  the  United  States  be  equipped  with  an  occupant  protection  system.  Although 
motorcoaches  must  comply  with  both  FMVSS  217,  which  establishes  minimum  re-
quirements  for  motorcoach  window  retention  and  release,  and  with  FMVSS  302, 
which  establish  standards  for  the  flammability  of  interior  materials,  they  do  not 
have  to  comply  with  the  host  of  other  FMVSS  occupant  protection  standards  that 
apply to school buses and passenger cars. 

A  well-designed  vehicle  will  manage  the  energy  of  a  crash  through  its  structure 
and  minimize  that  energy  transfer  to  passengers  through  an  occupant  protection 
system  (compartmentalization),  which  functions  to  restrain  the  passengers  within 
the  seating  compartment  throughout  the  accident  sequence  and  minimize  the  risk 
of  injury.  One  example  of  compartmentalization  has  been  studied,  tested,  and  re-
quired in school buses but not in motorcoaches. 

Between  1968  and  1973,  the  Safety  Board  issued  a  series  of  recommendations  to 
the Federal Highway Administration (FHA) and the National Highway Traffic Safe-
ty Administration (NHTSA) on occupant protection. Additionally, in 1999, the Safety 
Board  published  two  special  investigation  reports  that  addressed  motorcoach  occu-
pant  protection.  The  recommendations  included  the  following  to  NHTSA.  The  first 
two  were  also  added  to  the  Board’s  Most  Wanted  List  of  Transportation  Safety  Im-
provements (Most Wanted) in 2000: 

• In  2  years,  develop  performance  standards  for  motorcoach  occupant  protection 
systems  that  account  for  frontal  impact  collisions,  side  impact  collisions,  and 
rollovers. H–99–47 
• Once  pertinent  standards  have  been  developed  for  motorcoach  occupant  protec-
tion  systems,  require  newly  manufactured  motorcoaches  to  have  an  occupant 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

15 

crash protection system that meets the newly developed performance standards 
and  restrains  passengers,  including  those  in  child  safety  restraint  systems, 
within  the  seating  compartment  throughout  the  accident  sequence  for  all  acci-
dent scenarios. H–99–48 
• Expand  your  research  on  current  advanced  glazing  to  include  its  applicability 
to  motorcoach  occupant  ejection  prevention,  and  revise  window-glazing  require-
ments  for  newly  manufactured  motorcoaches  based  on  the  results  of  this  re-
search. H–99–49 

NHTSA’s  initial  response  indicated  that  work  had  begun  to  develop  a  research 
plan to accomplish these recommendations. Two years later, NHTSA reported form-
ing  the  Bus  Manufacturer’s  Council  and  in  2002,  the  agency  held  a  public  forum 
on  motorcoach  safety  with  Transport  Canada.  In  2004,  the  Safety  Board  was  in-
formed  that  NHTSA  was  focusing  on  roof  crush  and  window  retention  technology 
to keep occupants in the vehicle and had initiated a joint study with Transport Can-
ada. 

In 2001, these recommendations were reiterated following a 1999 motorcoach acci-
dent  in  New  Orleans  in  which  22  occupants  were  killed.  Since  1998,  the  Safety 
Board has investigated 33 more motorcoach crashes involving 255 ejections and 123 
fatalities.  The  majority  of  these  rollover  crashes  clearly  shows  that  passengers  who 
remain  in  their  seating  compartments  sustain  fewer  injuries  and  that  ejected  pas-
sengers are the most likely to be killed. 

Unfortunately  today,  9  years  after  the  Safety  Board  concluded  its  bus  crash-
worthiness  special  investigation,  no  Federal  regulations  or  standards  require  that 
motorcoaches  operated  in  the  United  States  be  equipped  with  occupant  protection 
systems.  Consequently,  these  motorcoach  occupant  protection  recommendations 
were again reiterated in the Bluffton University accident in Atlanta. 

However, NHTSA is making some progress. In December 2007, NHTSA performed 
a  frontal  motorcoach  crash  test  and  in  February  2008,  they  performed  two  tests  on 
motorcoach roof strength and occupant survivable space by the MGA Research Cor-
poration,  under  contract  to  NHTSA,  both  of  which  were  observed  by  Safety  Board 
staff. The Board will carefully follow the analysis of those test results. 

Another  critical  aspect  of  surviving  a  motorcoach  accident  is  the  ability  of  pas-
sengers  to  exit  the  vehicle  in  a  timely  manner.  In  the  Safety  Board’s  1999  special 
crashworthiness report, we found that the emergency window exits need to be easily 
opened  and  that  they  need  to  remain  open  during  an  emergency  evacuation.  Con-
sequently, the Board recommended that NHTSA: 

• revise  the  Federal  Motor  Vehicle  Safety  Standard  217,  ‘‘Bus  Window  Retention 
and Release,’’ to require that other than floor-level emergency exits can be eas-
ily  opened  and  remain  open  during  an  emergency  evacuation  when  a  motor-
coach is upright or at unusual attitudes (H–99–9). 

This recommendation was added to the Most Wanted list in 2000. 
Motorcoaches must be strong enough to retain adequate survivable space for pas-
sengers  during  typical  accident  scenarios,  and  especially  important  regarding  roof 
strength during rollovers. The recommendation to NHTSA in our 1999 special report 
was  to  develop  performance  standards  within  2  years  for  motorcoach  roof  strength 
that  provide  maximum  survival  space  for  all  seating  positions  and  that  take  into 
account  current  typical  motorcoach  window  dimensions  (H–99–50).  This  rec-
ommendation was added to the Most Wanted list in 2000. 

Finally, the Safety Board made recommendations to NHTSA as a result of the mo-

torcoach accident investigation in Wilmer, Texas. These include: 

• evaluate  current  emergency  evacuation  designs  of  motorcoaches  and  buses  by 
conducting  simulation  studies  and  evacuation  drills  that  take  into  account,  at 
a minimum, acceptable egress times for various post-accident environments, in-
cluding  fire  and  smoke;  unavailable  exit  situations;  and  the  current  above- 
ground  height  and  design  of  window  exits  to  be  used  in  emergencies  by  all  po-
tential vehicle occupants (H–07–08), and 
• require motorcoach operators to provide passengers with pretrip safety informa-

tion (H–99–8). 

Some  progress  has  been  made  on  these  recommendations.  In  2002,  NHTSA  met 
separately with motorcoach manufacturers and operators to address the issue of bus 
window retention and release; however, no research plan was agreed upon at those 
meetings. In the fall of 2004, NHTSA signed a Memorandum of Understanding with 
Transport  Canada  to  carry  out  research  in  the  areas  of  roof  crush  and  window  re-
tention  technology,  with  a  goal  of  keeping  occupants  in  the  vehicle,  because  most 
motorcoach  fatalities  occur  when  passengers  are  ejected  from  the  vehicle.  NHTSA’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

16 

research shows that in most accidents, the bus only rolls  1⁄4 turn and comes to rest 
on  its  side;  therefore  installation  of  roof  exits  to  serve  as  an  alternate  to  window 
exits as a means of rapid emergency egress for bus passengers was also being exam-
ined. 

On  August  6,  2007,  NHTSA  issued  their  ‘‘Approach  to  Motorcoach  Safety,’’  which 
is a comprehensive review of motorcoach safety issues and the course of action that 
NHTSA  will  pursue  to  address  them.  In  the  course  of  its  research,  NHTSA  will 
study its own regulations (such as FMVSS 217) which establishes minimum require-
ments  for  bus  window  retention  and  release  to  reduce  the  likelihood  of  passenger 
ejection  in  crashes—as  well  as  international  standards  to  determine  the  best  way 
to proceed with the establishment of new requirements to better protect motorcoach 
passengers. 
Event Data Recorders 

Since  motorcoach  accidents  are  relatively  rare  events  and  motorcoach  crash  test-
ing  is  prohibitively  expensive,  one  way  to  collect  crash  data,  evaluate  crash  pulses, 
and  occupant  protection  issues  is  to  equip  motorcoaches  with  event  data  recorders. 
An  event  data  recorder  is  a  device  or  function  that  records  a  vehicle’s  dynamic, 
time-series  data  just  before  a  crash  (vehicle  speed  versus  time)  or  during  a  crash 
(change  in  velocity  versus  time).  Intended  for  retrieval  after  the  crash  event,  EDR 
data  can  provide  critical  safety  system  performance  information.  To  enhance  crash 
testing  with  real-world  data,  it  is  important  that  data  from  motorcoach  crashes  be 
used  for  post-accident  analysis,  forensics,  and  design  evaluation.  At  a  recent  SAE 
International symposium on highway EDRs, industry representatives presented the 
status  of  standards  work,  current  system  operating  experience,  and  evidence  that 
many operators currently use vehicle data recorders to improve operational control, 
to support insurance rates and claims, and to respond to litigation. The Board would 
like to see these devices on all motorcoaches. 

Although  crash  forces  can  sometimes  be  estimated  by  comparing  the  accident  ve-
hicle’s  physical  damage  to  instrumented  crash  test  data,  this  method  is  not  always 
reliable—particularly when crash test data are substantially limited as they are for 
motorcoaches,  and  when  the  accident  involves  a  barrier  collision  or  a  collision  with 
a  hard  paved  surface.  The  ability  to  estimate  crash  pulses  was  also  limited  by  the 
fact  that  some  surfaces  of  the  motorcoach  may  have  undergone  multiple  collisions. 
As  a  result  of  its  1996  safety  study  on  child  restraint  systems  and  subsequent 
1997  air  bag  forum,  the  Safety  Board  recommended  that  NHTSA  address  the  on- 
board recording of crash data. About that time, the National Aeronautics and Space 
Administration  and  the  Jet  Propulsion  Laboratory  also  recommended  that  NHTSA 
study  the  feasibility  of  obtaining  crash  data  for  safety  analysis  by  installing  crash 
recorders  on  vehicles.  In  response,  NHTSA  organized  the  EDR  Working  Group  in 
October  1998.  In  1999,  the  Board  held  a  symposium  on  transportation  recorders. 
Later  that  year,  as  a  result  of  its  special  investigation  on  bus  crashworthiness,  the 
Safety Board made the following two EDR-related recommendations to NHTSA: 

• require  that  all  school  buses  and  motorcoaches  manufactured  after  January  1, 
2003,  be  equipped  with  on-board  recording  systems  that  record  vehicle  param-
eters,  including,  at  minimum,  lateral  acceleration,  longitudinal  acceleration, 
vertical acceleration, heading, vehicle speed, engine speed, driver’s seat belt sta-
tus, braking input, steering input, gear selection, turn signal status (left/right), 
brake  light  status  (on/off),  head/tail  light  status  (on/off),  passenger  door  status 
(open/closed),  emergency  door  status  (open/closed),  hazard  light  status  (on/off), 
brake  system  status  (normal/warning),  and  flashing  red  light  status  (on/off) 
(school  buses  only).  For  those  buses  so  equipped,  the  following  should  also  be 
recorded:  status  of  additional  seat  belts,  airbag  deployment  criteria,  airbag  de-
ployment  time,  and  airbag  deployment  energy.  The  on-board  recording  system 
should record data at a sampling rate that is sufficient to define vehicle dynam-
ics  and  should  be  capable  of  preserving  data  in  the  event  of  a  vehicle  crash  or 
an  electrical  power  loss.  In  addition,  the  on-board  recording  system  should  be 
mounted to the bus body, not the chassis, to ensure that the data necessary for 
defining bus body motion are recorded (H–99–53), and 

• develop  and  implement,  in  cooperation  with  other  government  agencies  and  in-
dustry,  standards  for  on-board  recording  of  bus  crash  data  that  address,  at  a 
minimum,  parameters  to  be  recorded,  data  sampling  rates,  duration  of  record-
ing, interface configurations, data storage format, incorporation of fleet manage-
ment tools, fluid immersion survivability, impact shock survivability, crush and 
penetration survivability, fire survivability, independent power supply, and abil-
ity to accommodate future requirements and technological advances (H–99–54). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

17 

In  October  2000,  NHTSA  organized  the  Truck  and  Bus  Event  Data  Recorder 
Working  Group  to  focus  on  data  elements,  survivability,  and  event  definitions  re-
lated  to  trucks,  school  buses,  and  motorcoaches.  The  group’s  results  and  findings 
were  published  in  May  2002.  In  2004,  the  NCHRP  completed  a  project  that  exam-
ined  current  U.S.  and  international  methods  and  practices  for  the  collection,  re-
trieval,  archiving,  and  analysis  of  EDR  data  for  roadside  and  vehicle  safety.  Both 
the IEEE and SAE have published voluntary industry motor vehicle EDR standards. 
A  second  SAE  standards  committee,  J2728—Commercial  Vehicle  Event  Data  Re-
corders—is  specifically  addressing  data  elements  for  medium-  and  heavy-duty 
trucks.  Industry  initiatives  in  standards  development  include  the  American  Truck-
ing  Association’s  Technology  and  Maintenance  Council’s  publication  of  a  rec-
ommended  practice  to  define  the  collection  of  event-related  data  on  board  commer-
cial  vehicles.  The  recommended  practice  outlines  data  elements,  storage  method-
ology,  and  the  retrieval  approach  for  event  data  recording  on  commercial  vehicles. 
‘‘Commercial  Vehicle  Safety  Technology 
Diagnostics  and  Performance  Enhancement  Program’’  (also  known  as  the  ‘‘CV  Sen-
sor Study’’) has worked to define driver and vehicle assistance products and systems 
and, in particular, advanced sensor and signal processors in trucks and tractor-trail-
ers, with an emphasis on on-board diagnostic and improved safety-related products. 
The  program  involves  developing  EDR  requirements  for  the  analysis  of  accident 
data from the FMCSA’s Large Truck Crash Causation Study, with the goal of devel-
oping  EDR  functional  specifications  for  both  complete  accident  reconstruction  and 
crash  analyses.  To  date,  this  project  has  developed  requirements  for  EDR  compo-
nents,  hardware,  software,  sensors,  and  data  bases  and  has  completed  a  cost-effec-
tiveness analysis. 

In  the  meantime,  the  FMCSA’s 

In recent years, NHTSA has made progress in developing EDR data standards for 
light  vehicles,  which  include  passenger  cars,  multipurpose  passenger  vehicles,  light 
trucks,  and  vans  with  a  gross  vehicle  weight  rating  of  3,855  kilograms  (8,500 
pounds)  or  less.  In  August  2006,  NHTSA  published  a  final  rule  that  standardizes 
the  information  EDRs  collect,  but  was  amended  in  January  14,  2008,  in  response 
to  numerous  petitions  for  reconsideration.  Based  on  this  revised  rule,  compliance 
dates  have  been  changed  to  September  1,  2012,  for  most  light  vehicles  and  to  Sep-
tember  1,  2013,  for  vehicles  manufactured  in  two  or  more  stages.  The  new  rule, 
however,  does  not  address  vehicles  over  8,500  pounds  and  thus  would  not  apply  to 
buses or motorcoaches. 

In  its  August  2007  ‘‘Approach  to  Motorcoach  Safety,’’  NHTSA  included  a  discus-
sion of EDRs, stating that the agency has recently defined mandatory data elements 
for  the  voluntary  installation  of  EDRs  in  light  passenger  vehicles.  However,  crash 
characteristics  and  relevant  measurements  for  motorcoaches  are  different,  as  sup-
ported  by  the  2001  NHTSA  EDR  Working  Group  final  report’s  ‘‘Summary  of  Find-
ings.’’ 

The EDR Working Group’s final report also noted the following: 
• EDRs  can  improve  highway  safety  for  all  vehicle  classes  by  providing  more  ac-
• U.S. and European studies have shown that the number and severity of crashes 

curate data for accident reconstructions, and 

is reduced when drivers know that an on-board EDR is in operation. 

However,  NHTSA’s  ‘‘Approach  to  Motorcoach  Safety’’  also  makes  the  seemingly 
contradictory statement that Safety Recommendations H–99–53 and –54 concerning 
EDRs  do  not  specifically  relate  to  changes  that  would  have  a  direct  or  quantifiable 
safety benefit for motorcoach occupants. The Safety Board believes the lack of useful 
event  data  associated  with  accident  motorcoaches  represents  a  missed  opportunity 
to  better  understand  crash  forces,  ejection  dynamics,  and  crashworthiness.  The 
Board  concludes  that  event  data  recorders  would  provide  the  accurate  and  detailed 
event  data  necessary  to  better  understand  crash  causation  and  to  establish  design 
requirements for motorcoach crashworthiness and occupant protection systems. The 
need  for  such  information  is  particularly  significant  as  EDRs  become  more  widely 
used  in  the  truck  and  transit  industry,  as  evidenced  at  the  September  2007  EDR 
symposium  sponsored  by  SAE.  During  the  symposium,  representatives  from  indus-
try noted that EDR applications are being more widely used for motor carrier anal-
ysis  of  accidents  and  to  support  more  accurate  insurance  underwriting  and  risk 
analysis. 

Also  in  its  ‘‘Approach  to  Motorcoach  Safety,’’  NHTSA  states  ‘‘Upon  completion  of 
SAE  J2728,  consideration  of  a  requirement  for  heavy  vehicle  EDR  installation  into 
motorcoaches would be appropriate.’’ 

The  Safety  Board  recognizes  NHTSA’s  progress  in  developing  EDR  standards  for 
light vehicles. Establishing EDR performance standards for motorcoaches and buses 
is necessary for the timely and efficient implementation of EDRs, which will provide 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

18 

the  data  needed  to  develop  effective  occupant  protection  systems.  The  Board  urges 
NHTSA  to  actively  push  to  complete  standards  work  and  require  EDRs  on  all  new 
motorcoaches. As a result, in July of 2008 the Board reiterated Safety Recommenda-
tions H–99–53 and –54 in its report on the Bluffton University accident in Atlanta. 
Motorcoach Fire Protection 

On  September  23,  2005,  a  fire  engulfed  a  motorcoach  carrying  elderly  evacuees 
away  from  the  predicted  path  of  Hurricane  Rita  near  Dallas,  Texas.  The  44  pas-
sengers  were  from  an  assisted-living  facility  in  Bellaire,  Texas;  many  needed  to  be 
carried or assisted onto the motorcoach by firefighters or nursing staff, and required 
almost 2 hours to board. When the fire occurred, 23 elderly passengers were unable 
to  escape  the  blaze  and  perished.  I  would  like  to  note  that  this  accident  involved 
very  unusual  circumstances,  and  many  of  the  decisions  to  evacuate  and  the  means 
to  evacuate  were  made  in  the  context  of  the  devastation  caused  by  Hurricane 
Katrina that occurred just 1 month earlier. 

Fires  on  motorcoaches  are  not  an  unusual  occurrence.  In  fact,  some  industry  ex-
perts  estimate  that  there  is  close  to  one  motorcoach  fire  per  day.  However,  to  date, 
injuries and fatalities related to motorcoach fires are an extremely rare event. Still, 
this accident shows the potential for catastrophe when passengers are unable to exit 
a burning motorcoach quickly. 

As  a  result  of  its  investigation,  the  NTSB  made  the  following  recommendations: 
• NHTSA  should  develop  a  standard  to  provide  enhanced  fire  protection  of  the 
fuel  systems  in  areas  of  the  motorcoaches  and  buses  where  the  system  may  be 
exposed  to  the  effects  of  a  fire.  In  addition  we  asked  that  fire-hardened  mate-
rials  be  used  in  areas,  such  as  those  around  wheel  wells,  to  limit  the  potential 
for  flame  spread  into  motorcoach  or  bus  passenger  compartments.  In  the  in-
terim, while standards are being developed, we asked the motorcoach manufac-
turers  to  use  currently  available  materials  and  designs  for  fuel  system  compo-
nents that are known to provide fire protection for the system, 
• Since  wheel  well  fires  are  so  difficult  to  extinguish,  we  asked  that  NHTSA  de-
velop detection systems to monitor the temperature of wheel well compartments 
in  motorcoaches  and  buses  to  provide  early  warning  of  malfunctions  that  could 
lead to fires so that passengers might have time to escape, and 
• FMCSA continues to gather and evaluate information on the causes, frequency, 
and  severity  of  bus  and  motorcoach  fires,  and  conduct  ongoing  analysis  of  the 
fire data to measure the effectiveness of the fire prevention and mitigation tech-
niques identified and instituted as a result of the Volpe National Transportation 
Systems Center fire safety analysis study. 

Motorcoach Oversight Improvements 

For decades the Board has been concerned with the safety of motorcoach operators 
and  the  oversight  provided  by  local,  state,  and  Federal  agencies.  These  areas  in-
clude: 

• Oversight of the Compliance Review Process, 
• Oversight of Driver Medical Conditions, 
• Electronic Onboard Recorders for Hours of Service (fatigue), and 
• Cell Phone Use by Bus Drivers. 

Oversight of the Compliance Review Process 

The Wilmer, Texas motorcoach fire is an illustration of the potential consequences 
of  poor  oversight  of  motorcoach  operations,  especially  concerning  the  vehicle.  The 
fire  in  this  accident  would  not  have  occurred  had  the  motorcoach  been  properly 
maintained. 

The  Safety  Board  determined  that  the  cause  of  the  fire  was  insufficient  lubrica-
tion  in  the  right-side  tag  axle  wheel  bearing  assembly  of  the  motorcoach,  which  re-
sulted  in  increased  temperatures  and  subsequent  failed  wheel  bearings.  The  high 
temperatures  resulting  from  the  friction  led  to  the  ignition  of  the  tire  and  a  cata-
strophic  fire.  This  occurred  because  the  motorcoach  operator,  Global  Limo,  Inc., 
failed  to  maintain  their  vehicles  and  FMCSA  failed  to  provide  proper  oversight  of 
the motor carrier through its compliance review process. 

Unfortunately,  FMCSA  is  only  able  to  conduct  compliance  reviews  for  a  small 
fraction  of  the  almost  911,000  motor  carriers  in  this  country.  However,  in  this  par-
ticular  accident,  numerous  driver  and  vehicle  safety  violations  were  uncovered  in  a 
review  performed  by  the  Texas  Department  of  Public  Safety  (DPS)  in  April  2002. 
At  the  time,  the  Texas  DPS  had  no  authority  to  force  Global  to  cease  operations. 
In  February  2004,  FMCSA  conducted  a  compliance  review  of  Global  in  which  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

19 

found  similar  violations  pertaining  to  drivers  and  vehicles.  However,  FMCSA  rated 
Global  as  ‘‘satisfactory.’’  Nineteen  months  later,  after  the  bus  fire  near  Dallas, 
FMCSA  went  back  to  Global  and  conducted  another  compliance  review  in  Sep-
tember  2005.  In  this  review,  FMCSA  found  many  of  the  same  violations  as  in  its 
previous compliance review; however, this time FMCSA gave Global a safety rating 
of ‘‘unsatisfactory’’ and declared that Global’s operations created an ‘‘imminent haz-
ard’’ to public safety. FMCSA issued an order for Global to cease operations. 

Concerned  that  motor  carriers  with  significant  regulatory  violations  for  drivers 
and  vehicles  are  still  receiving  satisfactory  ratings,  the  Safety  Board  once  more  fo-
cused  on  Federal  standards  for  determining  the  safety  fitness  of  carriers.  As  we 
have done in several accident investigations over the past 8 years, the Board again 
concluded  that  the  current  FMCSA  compliance  review  process  does  not  effectively 
identify  unsafe  motor  carriers  and  prevent  them  from  operating,  especially  when 
violations are found in the areas of driver and vehicle safety. As a result, we reiter-
ated our long-standing recommendation to FMCSA to change the safety fitness rat-
ing methodology so that adverse vehicle or driver performance-based data alone are 
sufficient  to  result  in  an  overall  unsatisfactory  rating  for  a  carrier  (H–99–6).  This 
recommendation was added to the Board’s Most Wanted list in 2000. 

The  Safety  Board  originally  issued  this  recommendation  in  1999  in  a  Special 
Study  on  Selective  Motorcoach  Issues.  We  reiterated  the  recommendation  in  2002 
in our Mountainburg, Arkansas truck/school bus accident report and again in 2007. 
Our  goal  is  to  prevent  motor  carriers  from  putting  vehicles  with  mechanical  prob-
lems on the road and unqualified drivers behind the wheel. 

The  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Act  of  1984  directed  the  Department  of  Transportation 
(DOT) to establish a procedure to determine how safely motor carriers operate. Cur-
rently,  the  DOT,  through  the  FMCSA,  uses  a  system  for  determining  how  safely  a 
motor  carrier  operates  that  does  not  place  sufficient  emphasis  on  driver  or  vehicle 
qualifications.  Motor  carriers  are  given  safety  ratings  based  on  compliance  reviews 
conducted by the FMCSA. Carriers are rated on six safety fitness factors: 

1.  General—including  financial  responsibility,  insurance  coverage,  drug  and  al-
cohol programs, 
2. Driver—including qualifications and training, 
3.  Operations—including  management  controls,  scheduling  practices,  allowing 
violations of rules, false reports, failing to maintain records, 
4. Vehicle—including maintenance, 
5. Hazardous materials—including failure to follow regulations, and 
6. Accident rate. 

A  motor  carrier  can  receive  an  unsatisfactory  overall  rating  if  two  elements  are 
rated unsatisfactory. An overall unsatisfactory rating can lead to a carrier being or-
dered to cease operations. 

The Safety Board’s investigations have demonstrated that the two most important 
factors in safe motor carrier operations are the operational condition of the vehicles 
and  the  performance  of  the  drivers  who  drive  them.  The  Board  believes  that  if  the 
carrier receives an adverse rating (conditional or unsatisfactory) for either the vehi-
cle  or  driver  factor,  the  overall  rating  should  be  unsatisfactory.  Since  this  rec-
ommendation was originally issued and later reiterated in two accident reports, the 
FMCSA  has  planned  or  carried  out  a  variety  of  efforts  to  address  our  concerns. 
However, the same system is still in place and the recommendation has not yet been 
satisfied. 

For the safety of all highway users, the Safety Board believes that a motor carrier 
that  does  not  ensure  either  the  safe  operation  of  its  vehicles  or  drivers  should  re-
ceive an overall unsatisfactory safety rating. 

In June 2007, the FMCSA briefed the Safety Board on their ‘‘Comprehensive Safe-
ty  Analysis  (CSA)  2010  Initiative’’  which  they  indicated  would  include  a  complete 
evaluation  of  the  compliance  review  process  leading  to  the  development  of  a  new 
performance-based  operational  model  for  determining  motor  carrier  safety,  empha-
sizing  preventative  measures  and  early  detection  for  unsafe  driver  and  carrier  con-
ditions.  Under  CSA  2010,  the  FMCSA  plans  to  decouple  the  safety  fitness  rating 
from the compliance review. They have started the process of developing a new safe-
ty fitness rating methodology that would be based on an objective measure of a driv-
er’s or carrier’s safety performance data. These safety ratings would be issued to all 
drivers and carriers. FMCSA began pilot testing the new rating system in 2008. 

The Safety Board believes FMCSA’s current efforts represent a comprehensive re-
view of the process of determining the safety of commercial motor carriers. Still, the 
Board  continues  to  monitor  FMCSA’s  actions  and  is  concerned  that  accidents  con-
tinue to occur involving motor carriers with poor oversight of their drivers and vehi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

20 

cles.  Recognizing  the  importance  of  this  issue  to  motor  carrier  safety,  the  Board 
added this recommendation to the Most Wanted list in 2000. 

Related to this issue is the fact that, although FMCSA collects data on numerous 
safety  violations  when  it  conducts  compliance  reviews  of  motor  carriers,  approxi-
mately  85  percent  of  those  violations  are  not  included  in  the  calculations  of  the 
motor  carriers’  rating.  By  not  recognizing  these  violations  in  its  calculations, 
FMCSA  is  allowing  potentially  unsafe  carriers  to  continue  to  operate  without  con-
sequence. Therefore the Safety Board recommended that FMCSA: 

• issue  an  Interim  Rule  to  include  all  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Regulations 
in the current compliance review process so that all violations of regulations are 
reflected in the calculation of a carrier’s final rating (H–07–03) and 

• revise  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Regulations  to  prohibit  a  commercial 
vehicle  from  operating  with  wheel  seal  or  other  hub  lubrication  leaks  (H–07– 
02). 

Oversight of Driver Medical Conditions 

On  May  9,  1999,  on  Mother’s  Day  in  New  Orleans,  a  commercial  driver  lost  con-
sciousness  while  driving  a  motorcoach  on  an  interstate  highway,  left  the  roadway, 
and  crashed  into  an  embankment,  killing  22  passengers,  and  seriously  injuring  the 
driver  and  15  additional  passengers.  The  driver  was  found  to  have  had  multiple 
known serious medical conditions, including kidney failure and congestive heart fail-
ure and was receiving intravenous therapy for 3–4 hours a day, 6 days a week. 

The  Safety  Board  has  investigated  many  other  accidents  involving  commercial 
drivers  with  serious  preexisting  medical  conditions  that  had  not  been  adequately 
evaluated. These include: 

• a nearly blind school bus driver in Montana who apparently did not see an on-

coming train that struck the bus and killed 2 students, 

• a  New  York  City  transit  bus  driver  with  a  seizure  history  who  experienced  a 
seizure  while  driving  the  bus,  seriously  injuring  a  cyclist  and  killing  a  pedes-
trian, 

• a tractor-trailer driver with unevaluated sleep apnea and untreated thyroid dis-
ease who ran over and killed a Tennessee State Trooper driving in his highway 
patrol vehicle with lights flashing; and 

• an  alcohol-dependent  tractor-trailer  driver  whose  excessive  speed  resulted  in  a 
load  breaking  free  and  striking  a  school  activity  bus  in  North  Carolina,  killing 
the school bus driver and a child. 

It is unusual in our accident investigations to find a commercial driver for whom 
there  are  not  at  least  some  questions  regarding  medical  certification.  This  is  not  to 
say  that  a  driver’s  conditions  always  cause  the  accident,  but  finding  these  undocu-
mented  and  unevaluated  conditions  in  commercial  drivers  is  concerning  and  often 
alarming. In many cases, these conditions are manageable if they are appropriately 
evaluated,  treated,  and  monitored.  Unfortunately,  for  a  variety  of  reasons,  no  such 
evaluation, treatment, or monitoring occurred in many of the cases we investigated. 
As a result of observing serious deficiencies in the oversight of commercial driver 
medical certification in several of our investigations including the New Orleans acci-
dent,  the  Safety  Board  issued  recommendations  to  the  FMCSA  in  2001  to  develop 
a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial  drivers.  The 
Board suggested that such a program include qualified and properly educated exam-
iners,  updated  and  available  regulatory  and  non-regulatory  guidance,  review  and 
tracking of medical exams, improved enforcement of certification requirements, and 
appropriate  mechanisms  for  reporting  unfit  drivers.  The  Board’s  recommendations 
specify a comprehensive oversight program, because we feel that only by addressing 
this  issue  in  a  systematic  fashion  can  a  truly  effective  program  of  oversight  be  de-
veloped. A piecemeal approach to the problem may result in gaping deficiencies that 
will continue to permit unqualified drivers to operate on the Nation’s highways. The 
specific recommendations are as follows: 

• develop  a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial 
drivers  that  contain  the  following  program  elements:  individuals  performing 
medical  examinations  for  drivers  are  qualified  to  do  so  and  are  educated  about 
occupational issues for drivers (H–01–17), 
• develop  a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial 
drivers  that  contain  the  following  program  elements:  a  tracking  mechanism  is 
established  that  ensures  that  every  prior  application  by  an  individual  for  med-
ical certification is recorded and reviewed (H–01–18), 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

21 

• develop  a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial 
drivers that contain the following program elements: medical certification regu-
lations  are  updated  periodically  to  permit  trained  examiners  to  clearly  deter-
mine whether drivers with common medical conditions should be issued a med-
ical certificate (H–01–19), 

• develop  a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial 
drivers that contain the following program elements: individuals performing ex-
aminations  have  specific  guidance  and  a  readily  identifiable  source  of  informa-
tion for questions on such examinations (H–01–20), 

• develop  a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial 
drivers  that  contain  the  following  program  elements:  the  review  process  pre-
vents,  or  identifies  and  corrects,  the  inappropriate  issuance  of  medical  certifi-
cation (H–01–21), 

• develop  a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial 
drivers  that  contain  the  following  program  elements:  enforcement  authorities 
can  identify  invalid  medical  certification  during  safety  inspections  and  routine 
stops (H–01–22), 

• develop  a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial 
drivers  that  contain  the  following  program  elements:  enforcement  authorities 
can prevent an uncertified driver from driving until an appropriate medical ex-
amination takes place (H–01–23), and 

• develop  a  comprehensive  medical  oversight  program  for  interstate  commercial 
drivers that contains the following program elements: mechanisms for reporting 
medical  conditions  to  the  medical  certification  and  reviewing  authority  and  for 
evaluating these conditions between medical certification exams are in place; in-
dividuals, health care providers, and employers are aware of these mechanisms 
(H–01–24). 

In  2003,  because  of  the  critical  importance  of  this  issue  and  the  lack  of  sub-
stantive  progress  on  the  recommendations,  this  issue  was  placed  on  the  Safety 
Board’s Most Wanted list. Although the FMCSA has put in place a Medical Review 
Board  and  taken  certain  other  preliminary  actions  in  response  to  Congressional 
mandates, there are still areas in which absolutely no measurable progress has been 
made.  In  general,  most  of  our  safety  recommendations  remain  in  an  open—unac-
ceptable response. The FMCSA does seem to be making limited progress toward the 
type  of  comprehensive  oversight  system  envisioned  by  the  Board,  but  it  remains 
questionable whether such a system will in fact be completely developed. 
Electronic Onboard Recorders for Hours of Service (Fatigue) 

Paper  logbooks  offer  many  opportunities  to  play  fast  and  loose  with  the  hours  of 
service  rules.  In  our  investigations,  we  repeatedly  find  that  some  drivers  falsify 
their books or keep two sets of books and some motor carriers do not closely monitor 
their drivers’ compliance with the rules. Recognizing this lack of accountability with 
paper  logbooks,  the  Safety  Board  has  advocated  the  use  of  on-board  data  recorders 
for the past 30 years. 

In 1977, the Safety Board issued its first recommendation on the use of on-board 
recording  devices  for  hours  of  service  compliance  by  asking  the  FHA  to  explore  the 
merits  of  tachographs  on  reducing  commercial  vehicle  accidents.  Although  the 
FHWA studied the issue, they did not make any changes. 

During  the  1980s,  the  technology  for  on-board  recorders  for  hours  of  service  im-
proved dramatically and the European community began requiring tachographs and 
other similar devices. In 1990, as part of a study on heavy truck crashes, the Safety 
Board  recommended  that  FHWA  and  the  states  require  the  use  of  automated/tam-
per-proof  on-board  recording  devices.  This  recommendation  was  not  acted  upon  by 
the  FHWA.  In  1995,  the  Board  reiterated  this  same  recommendation  to  the  FHWA 
and the states. Both failed to act. 

In 1998, the Safety Board tried a different approach, and made recommendations 
directly to industry, asking them to equip their commercial vehicle fleets with auto-
mated  and  tamper-proof  on-board  recording  devices.  This  recommendation  was  op-
posed by the industry. 

In  2001,  when  the  FMCSA  issued  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  on  hours  of 
service of drivers, the Safety Board reiterated its position that FMCSA strongly con-
sider  mandatory  use  of  electronic  onboard  recorders  by  all  motor  carriers.  FMCSA 
did  not  incorporate  this  suggestion  into  the  NPRM.  Finally,  in  2007  the  FMCSA 
issued  a  proposed  rulemaking  on  on-board  recorders;  however,  there  are  2  primary 
reasons why the Board felt the NPRM fell short of its intended target. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

22 

First, the rule does not require EOBRs for hours of service for all commercial ve-
hicles,  but  rather  promotes  voluntary  installation  and  only  requires  installation  for 
pattern  violators.  The  Safety  Board  is  concerned  that  pattern  violators  will  be  very 
difficult  to  identify  without  this  technology  and  is  convinced  that  the  only  effective 
way in which on-board recorders can help stem hours of service violations is to man-
date their use by all operators. 

Second,  the  Safety  Board  would  like  to  see  damage  resistance  and  data  surviv-

ability included in the standards for recorder hardware. 

In  summary,  fatigue-related  accidents  continue  to  plague  our  Nations  highways 
because,  unlike  alcohol  or  drugs,  fatigue  is  extremely  difficult  to  detect.  In  fact,  fa-
tigue  is  probably  the  most  underreported  causal  factor  in  highway  accidents.  Elec-
tronic  on-board  recorders  for  hours  of  service  hold  the  potential  to  efficiently  and 
accurately collect and verify the hours of service for all drivers. They will also estab-
lish the proper incentives and create a level playing field for compliance with hours 
of service rules that will ultimately make our highways safer for all drivers. 
Cell Phone Use by Bus Drivers 

On November 14, 2004, during daylight hours, a 44-year-old bus driver was oper-
ating  a  motorcoach  in  the  southbound  right  lane  of  the  George  Washington  Memo-
rial  Parkway  in  Alexandria,  Virginia,  taking  27  high  school  students  and  a  chap-
erone  to  Mount  Vernon.  This  vehicle  was  the  second  one  of  a  two-bus  team.  The 
motorcoach  was  traveling  approximately  46  miles  per  hour  as  it  approached  the 
stone  arched  Alexandria  Avenue  overpass  bridge,  which  passes  over  the  GW  Park-
way.  The  bus  driver  passed  warning  signs  indicating  that  the  right  lane  had  only 
a 10-foot, 2-inch clearance, while the center lane had a 13-foot 4-inch clearance. The 
bus was 12 feet tall. The lead bus moved into the center lane, but the accident bus 
driver remained in the right lane and drove the bus into the underside of the bridge. 
Witnesses and the bus driver reported he was talking on a hands-free cellular tele-
phone  at  the  time  of  the  accident.  Of  the  27  student  passengers,  10  received  minor 
injuries  and  1  sustained  serious  injuries.  The  bus  driver  and  chaperone  were 
uninjured. The bus’s roof was destroyed. 

The Safety Board determined that the probable cause of this accident was the bus 
driver’s  failure  to  notice  and  respond  to  posted  low-clearance  warning  signs  and  to 
the  bridge  itself  due  to  cognitive  distraction  resulting  from  conversing  on  a  hands- 
free cellular telephone while driving. 

As  a  result  of  this  accident,  the  Safety  Board  made  the  following  recommenda-

tions: 

• FMCSA  would  publish  regulations  prohibiting  cellular  telephone  use  by  com-
mercial driver’s license holders with a passenger-carrying or school bus endorse-
ment,  while  driving  under  the  authority  of  that  endorsement,  except  in  emer-
gencies, 

• the 50 states and the District of Columbia would enact legislation to accomplish 

the same result at the state level, 

• the  motorcoach  associations,  school  bus  organizations,  and  unions  would  de-
velop  formal  policies  prohibiting  cellular  telephone  use  by  commercial  driver’s 
license holders with a passenger-carrying or school bus endorsement, while driv-
ing under the authority of that endorsement, except in emergencies, 

• a  previously  issued  safety  recommendation,  reiterated  to  the  Safety  Board,  to 
20  states  to  modify  their  traffic  accident  investigation  forms  to  include  driver 
distraction codes, including codes for interactive wireless communication device 
use. 

Motorcoach Technology Improvements 

The  Safety  Board  believes  that  developing  and  installing  new  technologies—such 
as  adaptive  cruise  control  and  collision  warning  systems  in  commercial  trucks, 
buses,  and  passenger  vehicles,  will  substantially  reduce  accidents.  This  assessment 
comes  from  numerous  Board  investigations.  In  a  2-year  period,  the  Board  inves-
tigated  9  rear-end  collisions  in  which  20  people  died  and  181  were  injured.  Three 
of  the  accidents  involved  buses  and  one  accident  involved  24  vehicles.  Common  to 
all nine accidents was the rear-following vehicle driver’s degraded perception of traf-
fic  conditions  ahead  before  striking  other  vehicles.  These  accidents  did  not  involve 
the  use  of  drugs,  alcohol,  or  vehicle  mechanical  defects.  The  investigation  showed 
that  sun  glare,  fog,  smoke,  fatigue,  distractions,  and  work  zones  interfered  with  a 
driver’s  ability  to  detect  slow-moving  or  stopped  traffic  ahead  and  resulted  in  rear- 
end  collisions.  According  to  the  DOT,  preliminary  analyses  have  shown  that 
1,836,000  police-reported  crashes,  or  about  48  percent  of  accidents,  could  be  pre-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

23 

vented  by  rear-end  or  run-off-the-road  and  lane  change  collision  warning  systems 
(CWS). 

In 1995, the Board first made recommendations concerning collision-warning sys-
tems  as  part  of  its  Special  Investigation  of  Collision  Warning  Technology.  The  fol-
lowing recommendation was made to both the DOT and to the Intelligent Transpor-
tation Society of America: 

• in  cooperation  with  the  Intelligent  Transportation  Society  of  America,  sponsor 
fleet  testing  of  collision  warning  technology  through  partnership  projects  with 
the  commercial  carrier  industry.  Incorporate  testing  results  into  demonstration 
and training programs to educate the potential end-users of the systems (H–95– 
44). 

In 1999, the Safety Board held a public hearing on Advanced Safety Technologies 
for  Commercial  Vehicle  Applications  to  discuss  and  highlight  new  and  emerging 
technologies  such  as  collision  warning  systems  among  others.  In  2001,  the  Board 
issued  the  following  recommendation  to  NHTSA  as  part  of  its  2001  Special  Inves-
tigation On Technology To Prevention Rear-End Collisions. 

• complete  rulemaking  on  adaptive  cruise  control  and  collision  warning  system 
performance  standards  for  new  commercial  vehicles.  At  a  minimum,  these 
standards  should  address  obstacle  detection  distance,  timing  of  alerts,  and 
human factors guidelines, such as the mode and type of warning (H–01–6). 

In 2007 this recommendation was added to the Board’s Most Wanted list. 
In  2001,  the  DOT  established  an  Intelligent  Vehicle  Initiative  (IVI)—the  goal  of 
which was to improve the safety and efficiency of motor vehicle operations by reduc-
ing the probability of motor vehicle crashes—as a major component of the Intelligent 
Transportation  System  (ITS)  program.  As  part  of  the  IVI,  NHTSA  evaluated  the 
performance  of  CWS  and  adaptive  cruise  control  (ACC)  by  participating  in  field 
operational  tests  of  vehicles  equipped  with  advanced  safety  systems.  In  May  2005, 
NHTSA  released  the  results  of  its  passenger  vehicle  testing,  Automotive  Collision 
Avoidance  System  Field  Operational  Test  Final  Program  Report,  showing  potential 
to reduce rear-end crashes by 10 percent and reporting positive user reaction to the 
systems.  The  final  report  on  the  commercial  vehicle  field-testing  conducted  for  the 
DOT  by  Battelle  and  Volvo  Trucks  North  America,  Inc.,  was  released  in  January 
2007.  The  preliminary  findings  of  the  report  indicate  that  a  combined  CWS  and 
ACC  bundled  safety  system  account  for  a  statistically  significant  reduction  in  rear- 
end crashes through reduced exposure to safety-critical driving scenarios. 

NHTSA,  along  with  the  FHWA,  the  FMCSA,  and  RITA,  appears  to  be  working 
consistently on this important technological safety issue. The preliminary results of 
the  testing  on  advanced  safety  systems  are  encouraging,  but  rulemaking  is  needed 
to  ensure  uniformity  of  system  performance  standards,  such  as  obstacle  detection, 
timing  of  alerts,  and  human  factors  guidelines,  on  new  passenger  and  commercial 
vehicles. 

Additionally,  the  Safety  Board  has  made  recommendations  on  electronic  stability 
control  to  improve  a  vehicle’s  handling,  particularly  at  the  limits  where  the  driver 
might  lose  control  of  the  vehicle.  In  concert  with  ABS  brakes,  ESC  senses  when  a 
vehicle  is  about  to  slide  or  yaw,  and  applies  brakes  to  the  proper  wheels  to  regain 
control. The Board first made recommendations on this technology back when it was 
called ‘‘traction control’’ following a 1997 accident in Slinger, WI involving commer-
cial  vehicles  operating  under  icy  conditions.  Eight  fatalities  occurred  when  a  truck 
lost  control,  crossed  a  median  and  struck  a  van.  In  its  report  the  Board  made  the 
following recommendations to NHTSA: 

• work,  together  with  FHWA,  the  American  Trucking  Associations,  the  Inter-
national  Brotherhood  of  Teamsters,  and  the  Motor  Freight  Carrier  Association 
to conduct laboratory and truck fleet testing to assess the safety benefits of add-
ing traction control devices to anti-lock brake systems and report your findings 
to the NTSB (H–98–015), 
• work,  together  with  the  FHWA,  the  American  Trucking  Association,  the  Inter-
national  Brotherhood  of  Teamsters,  and  the  Motor  Freight  Carrier  Association 
to  encourage  the  trucking  industry  to  gain  experience  with  traction  control  de-
vices through fleet tests (H–98–016). 

To  illustrate  some  successes  the  Safety  Board  has  had  in  the  passenger  car  area 
concerning electronic stability control, the Board made recommendations in its 2003 
Largo,  Maryland  accident  report  for  NHTSA  to  expand  its  current  evaluation  of 
electronic  stability  control  systems  and  determine  their  potential  for  assisting  driv-
ers in maintaining control of passenger cars, light trucks, sport utility vehicles, and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

24 

vans.  Included  in  this  evaluation  was  an  accident  data  analysis  of  electronic  sta-
bility control-equipped vehicles in the U.S. fleet (H–03–06). 

In April 2007, NHTSA announced that it would require ESC on all new cars and 
light trucks sold in the U.S. by September 1, 2011. Unfortunately, this rule only ap-
plies  to  passenger  cars,  multipurpose  vehicles,  trucks,  and  buses  with  a  gross  vehi-
cle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less. 

In  summary,  the  Safety  Board  believes  that,  although  motorcoach  travel  is  one 
of  the  safest  modes  of  transportation,  there  are  still  many  improvements  that  can 
be made to make it even safer. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  completes  my  statement,  and  I  will  be  happy  to  respond  to 

any questions you may have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Mr. Rosenker. 
Mr. Kelly? 

STATEMENT OF DAVID KELLY, ACTING ADMINISTRATOR, 
NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 
Mr.  KELLY.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Senator 
Hutchison. I appreciate the opportunity to appear before you today 
to discuss the important issue of motorcoach safety. 

Every  death  and  serious  injury  that  occurs  on  our  roads  is  a 
tragedy. Myself and all of the NHTSA employees who dedicate our 
careers  to  saving  lives  share  the  same  feelings  of  concern  and  em-
pathy for the individuals and families who have been tragically af-
fected  by  these  crashes,  especially  when  our  most  valuable  re-
source,  children,  are  involved.  We  know  that  one  death  is  too 
many,  and  I  extend  my  deepest  condolences  to  each  of  them.  They 
also  have  our  commitment  that  we  will  continue  to  work  to  make 
sure fewer families will have to suffer their same pain. 

Over  the  past  several  years,  NHTSA  has  been  very  focused  in 
our  efforts  to  improve  motorcoach  safety.  In  April  2002,  we  began 
a  joint  research  program  with  Transport  Canada  that  was  an  out-
reach  of  a  public  hearing  that  we  had,  again  with  Transport  Can-
ada,  to  look  at  window  glazing.  With  input  from  that  meeting  and 
from  further  study,  we  then  moved  on  in  2006  to  look  at  other  oc-
cupant  restraint  and  protection  devices.  We  reexamined  our  prior-
ities and we also developed NHTSA’s approach for motorcoach safe-
ty.  That  was  released  in  August  2007,  and  in  that  report,  we  fo-
cused  our  efforts  on  four  priorities:  safety  belts,  roof  strength, 
emergency  evacuation,  and  fire  protection.  I  am  pleased  to  say  we 
are making progress in each of those areas. 

Just last December, we conducted our first-ever motorcoach crash 
test. This test was a full frontal barrier crash at 30 miles per hour 
with  22  crash  chest  dummies  aboard  in  a  variety  of  seat  designs, 
seating  configurations  and  restraint  use.  We  expect  to  have  the 
analysis from this crash completed in December. 

Additionally,  we  know  that  maintaining  the  integrity  of  roof 
structure  is  important.  We  conducted  tests  on  four  motorcoaches 
this February and are now assessing those results to determine our 
next  steps.  Our  plan  is  to  make  a  decision  on  roof  strength  next 
spring. 

Further, when a crash does occur, getting passengers out quickly 
must be a priority. We are currently conducting human evacuation 
studies  and  simulations  that  take  into  consideration  various  emer-
gency  exit  scenarios  and  the  special  needs  of  young  and  elderly 
passengers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

25 

Finally,  NHTSA  has  contracted  with  the  National  Institute  for 
Standards  and  Technology  to  conduct  fire  safety  research.  This 
study  is  designed  to  review  existing  motorcoach  flammability 
standards  and  procedures  and  determine  which  might  be  the  most 
effective way to improve motorcoach safety. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  your  consideration  and  the  Sub-
committee’s  ongoing  efforts  to  improve  highway  safety.  I  would  be 
pleased to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Kelly follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID KELLY, ACTING ADMINISTRATOR, 

NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 

Mr. Chairman, I am David Kelly, Acting Administrator for the National Highway 
Traffic  Safety  Administration.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  the 
Subcommittee  to  discuss  the  important  issue  of  bus  safety,  and  particularly  motor-
coach safety. 

Every death and serious injury that occurs on our roads is a tragedy. I share the 
same  feelings  of  concern  and  empathy  for  the  individuals  and  families  who  have 
been  tragically  affected  by  these  crashes,  especially  when  our  most  valuable  re-
source, children, are involved. I extend my deepest condolences to each of them. 

Over  the  past  several  years,  NHTSA  has  been  very  focused  in  our  efforts  to  im-
prove motorcoach occupant protection. In April 2002, NHTSA sponsored a joint pub-
lic  meeting  with  Transport  Canada  to  hear  the  views  and  comments  from  motor-
coach  manufacturers,  operators,  users,  and  the  public  at  large  in  order  to  be  better 
informed  of  their  specific  needs,  and  to  help  us  determine  what  improvements  in 
motorcoach  passenger  crash  protection  standards  were  most  warranted.  With  input 
from  that  meeting,  NHTSA  and  Transport  Canada  entered  into  a  joint  program  in 
April 2003 that was completed in September 2006. 

The  joint  program  with  Transport  Canada  focused  on  improving  glazing  and 
structural integrity on motorcoaches to prevent ejections through the use of modified 
window  glazing  materials  and  bonding  techniques.  There  were  several  reasons  the 
program was focused in this way: 

1. Both Transport Canada and NHTSA had observed ejections through windows 
in motorcoach crashes. 
2.  Several  NTSB  safety  recommendations  have  been  concerned  with  glazing, 
window exits, structural integrity, roof strength, and survival space. 
3.  Focusing  the  joint  program  on  this  area  seemed  the  best  way  to  address  a 
broad array of the issues that had been raised by NTSB, and improve occupant 
protection for all crash conditions. 

The  joint  study  concluded  that  considerably  more  effort  would  be  needed  to  de-
velop  performance  requirements  that  would  have  a  reasonable  possibility  of  being 
effective. 

Completion  of  the  joint  study  with  Transport  Canada  coincided  with  completion 
of  an  internal  NHTSA  review  of  emergency  egress  and  flammability  requirements 
that are applicable to motorcoaches, as well as the NTSB hearing on the tragic mo-
torcoach fire that occurred in Wilmer, TX during the evacuation for Hurricane Rita. 
The testimony from the Wilmer NTSB hearing, in addition to the Transport Canada 
and internal agency reviews, caused NHTSA to reexamine our priorities for improv-
ing  motorcoach  safety.  After  completing  a  comprehensive  review,  we  developed 
NHTSA’s  Approach  to  Motorcoach  Safety,  which  was  made  public  in  August  2007. 
Our objectives in developing the safety plan were to review motorcoach safety issues 
and  develop  approaches  directed  to  the  areas  that  have  the  greatest  potential  for 
achieving  improved  motorcoach  safety  most  quickly.  NHTSA  is  making  significant 
progress  in  our  major  research  effort  into  passenger  protection  for  motorcoaches  in 
crashes.  Four  strategies  the  agency  is  pursuing  on  a  priority  basis  are  seat  belts, 
roof strength, emergency evacuation, and fire safety protection. 

We  have  been  conducting  various  crash  and  related  tests  to  determine  the  best 
strategies for enhancing passenger safety, especially ways to prevent passenger ejec-
tions  in  crashes,  such  as  through  the  use  of  seat  belts.  In  December  2007,  the  first 
motorcoach  crash  test  ever  conducted  by  the  agency  was  completed.  The  test  was 
a full frontal barrier crash at 30 miles per hour with 22 crash test dummies aboard 
in  a  variety  of  seat  designs,  seating  configurations,  and  restraint  usage.  Using  the 
crash  information  from  this  test,  additional  sled  tests  were  conducted  during  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

26 

past summer to determine the forces transmitted through the seat and seat anchor-
ages  under  this  full  frontal  crash  condition,  as  well  as  experienced  under  different 
crash  velocities,  impact  angles,  and  restraint  conditions.  Component  tests  are  now 
underway  to  assess  the  feasibility  of  developing  a  performance  procedure.  Once 
those tests are completed this fall, and if the test data indicate feasibility, initiation 
of rulemaking proceedings could then occur. 

In the area of roof strength, we conducted tests on four motorcoaches in February. 
Those tests were designed to bracket motorcoach body styles (i.e., short vs. long win-
dow spacing) for a comparison of U.S. school bus and European roof strength proce-
dures  to  determine  the  relative  stringency  and  practicability  of  those  differing  re-
quirements  in  applicability  to  motorcoaches.  We  are  now  assessing  those  results  to 
determine our next steps. 

Emergency evacuation studies are underway to identify studies from other trans-
portation  modes  and  countries  and  then  determine  applicability  to  motorcoaches. 
This  involves  conducting  human  evacuation  studies  and  simulations  under  various 
emergency  exit  scenarios.  Another  aspect  of  this  effort  is  to  examine  the  minimum 
strength requirements necessary to open emergency exits, with special consideration 
for  young  and  elderly  occupants  and  the  need  to  balance  rapid  emergency  egress 
with containment requirements to prevent ejection. 

Finally,  NHTSA  has  contracted  with  the  National  Institutes  for  Standards  and 
Technology  to  conduct  the  fire  safety  aspects  of  our  motorcoach  safety  effort.  This 
study is designed to review existing flammability standards and procedures and de-
termine which might be most applicable to improve motorcoach safety. Research on 
motorcoach  fire  propagation  properties  will  examine  the  U.S.  vs.  European  proce-
dures  for  vehicle  interior  materials.  Wheel  well  mockup  studies  will  be  conducted 
on  the  tires,  fuel  and  HVAC  lines,  external  body  panels,  insulation,  and  wiring. 
Those tests will measure flame temperatures, heat release, fire resistance of compo-
nents,  and  propagation  to  the  passenger  compartment.  Countermeasure  assess-
ments  will  also  be  examined  for  fire  hardening,  fire  detection,  and  fire  suppression 
strategies. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for your consideration and this Subcommittee’s ongoing 

efforts to improve highway safety. I would be pleased to answer any questions. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you all very much. 
Mr.  Hill,  after  you  discovered  in  the  Sherman,  Texas  crash  this 
summer,  in  which  it  appears  an  operator  whose  license  had  been 
revoked simply got a new registration number—how does this hap-
pen?  And  what  do  we  have  to  do  to  prevent  this  from  happening 
again? 

Mr. HILL. Mr. Chairman, thank you for the question. I would just 
point  out  that  even  though  they  had  a  USDOT  number,  they  were 
not  legally  prepared  to  operate.  They  had  not  fulfilled  their  licens-
ing  requirement.  One  of  the  things  that  we  have  in  our  current 
computer system is that people can apply for USDOT numbers, but 
they also have to have operating authority, and until they complete 
the  operating  authority  process,  they  are  not  permitted  to  conduct 
interstate commerce. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  How  intense  is  the  review  for  operating 
authority  permission?  What  do  you  do  to  satisfy  that  this  is  some-
one who is qualified to operate a bus service? 

Mr.  HILL.  Every  motor  carrier  coming  into  the  business  has  to 
show,  first  of  all,  that  they  have  the  financial  wherewithal  to  en-
gage  in  that  business  to  protect  the  people  that  they  are  carrying. 
So they are required to file $5 million worth of insurance with the 
agency before they are ever allowed to operate. 

Second, they have to disclose to us information through an appli-
cation process that will allow us to verify information that they are 
providing  has  not  been  falsified  or  is  in  any  way  recreating  them-
selves  as  a  new  carrier.  One  of  the  things  that  we  have  instituted 
as  a  result  of  ongoing  evaluation  of  our  process  is  to  make  sure 
that we vet these a lot more carefully on the front end. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

27 

Even though it would not have stopped the Sherman crash—this 
person was intent on running anyway—we believe that we can pre-
vent  future  crashes  by  lengthening  the  time  of  review  that  allows 
for us to properly investigate each one of the passenger carrier ap-
plications. There are about 875 of them a year. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  does  that  review  involve  a  physical 
visit to the home location? I recognize that with a very small oper-
ation  that—these  applications  come  in  fairly  frequently.  But  how 
do you be certain that there are not violations of law in the applica-
tion  itself.  But  do  people  from  your  office  physically  visit  these 
folks? Are they asked to come in and have a conversation? 

Mr. HILL. Yes, Mr. Chairman. Let me point to two things. 
First  of  all,  in  the  vetting  process  to  evaluate  fitness  for  oper-
ating authority, we are looking at not only the application process, 
but we are sending the information to our field offices because they 
have routine contact with carriers that are trying to evade enforce-
ment  activities  or  compliance.  So  they  would  be  familiar  with 
names  or  carriers  that  are  already  in  operation.  So  we  require 
them  or  the  State  enforcement  people  to  look  at  the  application, 
give us any information they might have about the applicant. That 
is the first step. 

And then we run them against our data bases for any kind of ad-
dresses,  telephone  numbers,  or  anything  that  would  be  an  identi-
fier that would indicate that this newly created carrier is trying to 
evade  an  out-of-service  order  or  any  kind  of  enforcement  case  pen-
alty  that  has  previously  been  issued  to  them.  So  that  is  the  one 
side of the authority vetting process. 

The  other  side  is  that  we  are  also  doing  new  entrant  safety  au-
dits,  and  the  law  requires  us  to  do  those  within  18  months,  as  I 
said  in  my  statement.  We  are  going  to  these  carriers  within  5 
months  after  we  get  notice  that  they  are  applying.  We  are  visiting 
their  place  of  business.  We  physically  go.  We  interview  the  owner 
or  the  safety  manager  responsible  for  that  company  and  we  take 
information from them. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  in  most  states,  cars  capable  of  car-
rying  only  five  people  must  pass  a  government  inspection  to  be  le-
gally  registered  and  driven.  This  is  an  automobile.  Your  agency, 
however,  allows  bus  companies  to  annually  inspect  their  vehicles 
themselves, and they carry up to 56 passengers. 

Now,  we  learned  a  lesson  with  the  airlines  that  when  it  comes 
to  the  safety  of  the  traveling  public,  you  cannot  simply  trust  the 
companies to self-certify that important safety tests have been done 
correctly. 

You have 40,000 annual inspections that are being done by 4,000 
U.S. motorcoach companies. How do you know they are being done 
properly? 

Mr.  HILL.  Well,  that  is  why  we  have  a  roadside  inspection  pro-
gram,  Mr.  Chairman.  We  have  increased  our  roadside  inspection 
activities significantly in the last 3 years. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How many of those inspections do you con-

duct in a year? 

Mr. HILL. Well, this year so far we have done 140,000 inspections 

on buses in this country, and previously—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. With how many people? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

28 

Mr. HILL. Well, there are approximately 9,000—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. No, no. In your organization. 
Mr. HILL. We only do a small percentage of the inspections along 
the  southern  border.  Primarily,  we  do  bus  inspections  with  about 
270  people.  I  think  we  do  30,000  to  35,000  inspections  along  the 
southern  border.  But  nationally  the  numbers  that  I  am  giving  you 
of 140,000—those are representative of State inspections as well. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Can they be thorough with that number of 

people and those number inspections required? 

Mr. HILL. Well, these inspections require about 30 to 45 minutes 
to go through them. I personally used to be certified in the process. 
It requires checking of 32 different items on a motorcoach or a bus. 
And  yes,  they  are  very  thorough  and  they  do  find  violations  regu-
larly. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  will  take  a  minute  more.  Senator 
Hutchison,  when  you  choose,  we  will  give  you  the  time  you  need. 
Mr. Rosenker, how do we know that an annual inspection is ade-
quate  at  all  given  the  number  of  miles  some  of  these  buses  put  on 
in a particular year, and should they be done more frequently? And 
from your standpoint, are these thorough enough? 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  Mr.  Chairman,  we  have  been  concerned  about 
two  particular  elements  of  motorcoach  safety  and  oversight  by 
FMCSA.  One  area  of  concern  is,  specifically,  the  driver  himself.  Is 
he  qualified?  Is  he  medically  fit?  Does  he  have  a  performance 
record that enables him to drive safely? And on the other side, the 
maintenance  and  mechanics  of  the  vehicle  itself.  In  addition,  we 
have  made  recommendations  to  FMCSA  and  they  have  made 
progress  on  those,  but  we  continue  to  see  that  more  needs  to  be 
done in the area of oversight as it relates to maintenance. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Is that numbers of inspections or more de-

tail in the inspection? 

Mr. ROSENKER. Both, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Hill,  just  a  month  after  the  tragic 
Bluffton  University  chartered  motorcoach  crash,  your  agency  gave 
the bus company involved a satisfactory safety rating. According to 
the NTSB in its July 2008 report on the crash, the safety audit per-
formed  found  several  serious  safety  violations.  Does  that  not  tell 
you  that  there  is  a  problem  with  the  rating  system  when  a  com-
pany like this is allowed to keep going? 

Mr.  HILL.  Mr.  Chairman,  one  of  the  issues  that  we  have  been 
working  to  resolve  is  an  open  recommendation  with  the  National 
Transportation Safety Board on the evaluation of safety fitness for 
motor carriers. We inaugurated a study and a program change into 
the  way  we  are  going  to  be  implementing  safety  fitness  in  the  fu-
ture.  It  is  called  the  Comprehensive  Safety  Analysis  2010.  We  are 
expecting  a  rulemaking  to  be  published  in  early  2009  that  would 
begin to start the safety rating process review. So instead of rating 
carriers  with  only  acute  and  critical  violations,  as  you  referred  to 
in  your  comments  about  the  Bluffton  company,  we  will  be  rating 
companies based upon violations that are found at the roadside, as 
well  as  what  are  found  in  terms  of  the  compliance  review  process. 
We will have a much more comprehensive review and safety rating 
methodology,  and,  it  will  include  driver  fitness  factors,  not  just 
equipment factors and company factors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

29 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So that suggests that at this point in time 
that  we  are  lacking  some  part  of  a  proper  review.  You  talk  about 
2010. 

Mr.  HILL.  We  have  observed  a  deficiency  in  our  safety  rating 
process,  and  we  believe  that  it  needed  to  be  reformed  and  that  is 
why we took the action to do that. It started several years ago, and 
my  predecessor  and  I  have  been  quite  diligent  to  ensure  that  that 
is  not  going  to  slip  in  time  lines,  and  we  are  going  to  get  it  imple-
mented. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So there perhaps is a risk that we endure 
until we have a chance to bring up the standards as you would like 
to see them? 

Mr. HILL. Well, actually I do not think that I would characterize 
it  as  enduring.  We  are  already  doing  a  pilot  program  in  the  state 
of New Jersey as one state to test this safety fitness. So we are ac-
tually working the safety fitness process right now with four states 
in  the  country,  and  we  are  going  to  roll  that  out  even  further  as 
we move along. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And  I  will  close  with  asking  Mr.  Kelly  a 
question.  Since  a  number  of  injuries  and  fatalities  involved  pas-
sengers being ejected from the bus—it seems everyone agrees with 
that, and the legislation proposed by Senator Hutchison focuses on 
that  as  well—why  does  your  agency  not  require  seat  belts  to  be 
made available on buses for passengers? 

Mr. KELLY. Thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 
We have been looking at the issue of seat belts on motorcoaches, 
especially  as  a  result  of  the  crash  test  that  we  did  last  December 
where we got over 4 million data points from that one crash alone. 
We  had  every  configuration  that  you  could  think  of  about  belted 
and  unbelted  passengers.  We  had  unbelted  passengers  behind  a 
belted  passenger.  And  I  have  some  video  that  I  would  like  to  sub-
mit to the record at some point of the crash test.* And you can see 
in  the  crash  the  unbelted  passengers,  obviously,  fared  much  worse 
than the belted passengers. 

What  we  need  to  do  with  that  data  is  develop  recommendations 
and  finish  analyzing  it.  If  we  are  going  to  move  forward  with  the 
rulemaking  process,  we  are  going  to  have  to  develop  a  standard,  a 
performance evaluation for the seat belts to meet. And that is what 
we  are  doing  right  now,  and  that  is  what  we  intend  to  have  done 
in December. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So we know about the importance of them, 

and we just have to get to that. Thank you. 

Senator Hutchison? 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you. 
I would just like to follow up on that. You have said in your testi-
mony  that  you  have  been  studying  this  for  quite  a  while,  starting 
with your—well, you have been looking at it even before your meet-
ing  with  the  Canadian  officials.  But  my  question  is,  from  the  data 
that  you  have  gotten,  you  said  you  expect  to  have  exactly  what 
done  in  December?  The  standards  set  and  that  you  would  be  able 
to go out with a rulemaking, or what is your time line for a process 

* This video is retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

30 

to go forward on seat belts if you think you are going to make that 
decision? 

Mr. KELLY. Thank you, Senator. 
What  we  plan  to  do  is  to  take  the  data  from  the  test,  from  the 
crash  test,  and  not  only  the  data  that  we  got  from  that  test,  but 
also  subsequent  sled  testing  and  component  testing  that  we  did 
throughout  this  past  year,  and  take  that  data  and  come  up  with 
really  a  performance  standard  by  which,  if  we  are  going  to  move 
forward,  that  is  what  we  would  do  in  a  rulemaking  process.  That 
is what we would set so manufacturers know what they would need 
to manufacture toward. 

But  there  is  all  of  that  data  that  we  are  analyzing.  That  4  mil-
lion  data  points  that  I  mentioned  before  is  300  times  more  data 
than we get in any one single crash test that we do with a regular 
car. So the volume of data there is extensive for us to be evaluating 
and moving forward on. 

Senator HUTCHISON. That was done in—when was—— 
Mr. KELLY. That was done in December 2007, 10 months ago. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  And  that  seems  like  a  reasonable  time  to 

look at the data and make that determination? 

Mr.  KELLY.  With  that  much  data  and  with  the  subsequent  test-
ing that we did with the sled tests and the component testing that 
we  have  been  doing  over  the  spring  and  early  summer,  yes.  We 
think that is a quick turnaround on the data actually. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Have  you  made  a  decision  about  whether 

you would do a rulemaking on providing safety belts? 

Mr.  KELLY.  We  have  not  made  that  decision  as  to  whether  we 
would move forward with a rulemaking. We are still looking at the 
performance  standard.  Moving  forward  with  a  rulemaking  process 
is  a  cumbersome  process.  What  we  need  to  first  do  is  determine 
what the data tells us, and we are still evaluating that data. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  If  we  were  to  pass  the  legislation  that  Sen-
ator Brown and I have introduced, you could use the data that you 
already  have  in  place  for  the  implementation  of  a  rulemaking.  Is 
that correct? 

Mr. KELLY. Absolutely. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  Let  me  ask  you.  Have  all  three  of  you 
looked  at  my  legislation?  I  would  like  to  ask  each  of  you  to  tell  us 
what  you  think  is  good  about  the  bill  and  if  you  have  concerns  of 
any part of the bill. 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  I  have  looked  at  the  legislation.  I  have  seen  a 
number  of  drafts.  I  am  not  in  full  knowledge  of  exactly  what  each 
and  every  one  of  the  provision  is  ultimately  going  to  be  look  like. 
But I can tell you that the body of this legislation basically incor-
porates  a  great  deal  of  what  the  NTSB  has  been  recommending 
both  to  my  colleague  at  the  FMCSA  and  also  my  colleague  at  the 
National Highway Traffic Safety Administration. If we can get this 
legislation  passed,  I  genuinely  believe  we  will  be  taking—not  one 
step,  but  many,  many,  many  steps  toward  either  preventing  acci-
dents  from  happening  because  of  the  technological  aspects  of  the 
provisions or mitigating accidents that we cannot prevent. 

So  I  personally  and  my  colleagues  at  the  Board  are  quite  sup-
portive  of  the  provisions  and  the  concepts  which  have  been  devel-
oped so far in this legislation. We applaud your work, and we also 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

31 

applaud  Senator  Brown’s  work.  We  would  encourage  a  quick  pas-
sage of this legislation because it will begin the process of accident 
elimination and mitigation. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you very much. 
Mr. KELLY. Senator Hutchison, we have also been looking at the 
bill  and  also  working  with  your  staff  and  Committee  staff  on  the 
bill  and  also  applaud  the  intentions  of  the  bill.  We  think  that  it 
provides additional safety for motorcoach passengers. 

We  have  also  gone  through  various  drafts  of  the  bill,  and  I  am 
not  exactly  sure  which  version  we  are  talking  about  at  this  point. 
But  we  have  shared  with  your  staff  some  of  the  concerns  that  we 
had  which  were  more  technical  in  nature,  time  lines,  performance 
standards,  and  things  like  that.  As  a  whole,  I  think  that  the  bill 
is  a  step  in  the  right  direction  about  providing  additional  benefits 
and I think is something that we are more than willing to continue 
to work with you and your staff with. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Let me ask you this, and then I do want to 
hear  from  Mr.  Hill.  But  let  ask  you.  Seat  belts.  I  think  we  are  in 
general  agreement  that—you  have  seen  results  that  show  a  major 
improvement.  I  do  not  want  to  put  words  in  your  mouth,  but  you 
have  seen  from  your  tests  that  there  is  a  major  improvement  be-
tween  passengers  that  are  restrained  and  those  that  are  not.  So  I 
think  we  can  agree  that  seat  belts  will  improve  safety  and  you 
have to get the right standards and all of that. 

Integrity of windows, the window glazing. Is that something that 
you also see as a potential lifesaver in the data that you have seen 
or in the NTSB reports that you have seen? 

Mr.  KELLY.  We  do  not  see  as  much  benefit  out  of  the  window 
glazing for the side windows as we do for occupant protection. And 
one of the reasons is because in the testing that we have done and 
that we have seen in the work that we did with Transport Canada, 
it was not as much of an issue where the window was breaking or 
shattering,  it  was  an  issue  of  where  the  entire  windowpane  was 
popping  out  and  you  would  still  have  the  hole  in  the  side  for  the 
ejection.  And  glazing  was  not  helping.  It  is  sort  of  like  an  ice  cube 
tray  with  ice  cubes  when  you  start  wiggling  the  sides  and  they  all 
pop out. I think that there are greater benefits to be had with win-
dow retention as opposed to glazing. 

Senator HUTCHISON. OK. 
Mr. Rosenker, are you in agreement on window integrity so that 

they would not pop out as a larger goal over glazing? 

Mr. ROSENKER. Our position for close to a decade is that we take 
a  systems  approach  to  mitigating  the  results  of  a  terrible  crash  or 
a rollover where potentially people can be ejected. While Mr. Kelly 
talks  about  making  sure  that  the  window  stays  in  place,  we  want 
to make sure that if the window stays in place, it has the integrity 
that  is  needed  so  that  the  passenger  does  not  go  through  the  win-
dow. So we stand by our position in glazing. 

But we also talk about the need for an appropriate occupant pro-
tection system; a combination of things which would potentially in-
clude a number of design improvements. We like, as you have even 
talked  about  in  your  legislation,  strengthening  the  roof  so  that  it 
cannot  be  crushed  into  the  compartment  area.  It  has  got  to  be  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

32 

scientifically  designed  system  that  incorporates  all  of  the  latest 
technology in occupant protection. 

We  applaud  the  work  that  is  being  done  in  this  effort,  and  we 
would  hope  that  this  could  be  done  in  an  expeditious  manner.  We 
do  know  that  these  technologies  exists  not  only  in  the  United 
States, but also in Europe. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Mr.  Hill,  I  know  your  area  is  a  little  dif-
ferent,  and  what  you  and  I  have  talked  about,  the  stabilization 
technology—so if you would talk about, from your standpoint, what 
you  think  is  helpful  in  the  bill  and  if  there  are  any  concerns  that 
you have. 

Mr. HILL. Well, first of all, Senator Hutchison, thank you for tak-
ing  the  initiative  to  think  about  motorcoach  safety.  I  know  your 
state  has  experienced  tragedy  in  this  area,  but  I  applaud  you  for 
moving ahead with this. 

I  would  just  say  that  we  support  many  of  the  provisions  of  this 
bill  and  we  have  been  working  with  your  staff  and  will  continue 
to  provide  specific  information.  Let  me  just  point  out  a  couple 
things. 

We  are  moving  forward  with  the  medical  certification  rule  that 
would merge the CDL process, the licensing process, with the med-
ical process. That will be a final rule and it will be issued later this 
year. 

We  are  issuing  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  later  this  year 
on  the  registry  of  medical  examiners,  and  so  that  will  give  us  a 
database  that  will  allow  us  to  track  who  is  doing  medical  exams, 
and  if  they  are  doing  them  correctly.  The  examiners  will  be  cer-
tified or accredited in order to perform those exams. 

So those are two main provisions that I think your bill addresses. 
One  of  the  things  that  your  bill  also  does  is  it  deals  with  elec-
tronic on-board recorders, and we are going to be publishing a final 
rule  this  year.  And  I  would  just  say  that  if  you  want  to  mandate, 
that  would  go  beyond  what  our  rule  eventually  does,  then  that 
would be something that we would have to take into consideration 
and issue interim guidance on. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  So  you  are  going  to  be  doing  something  in 

that area at the end of this year? 

Mr. HILL. Yes, ma’am, the final rule. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Final rule or NPRM? 
Mr. HILL. Final rule, electronic on-board recorders. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Oh, good. 
Mr. HILL. The chairman held a hearing earlier about this and ad-

monished us to move that along. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Good. 
Mr. HILL. And then I would just say the one provision of the bill 
that we would want to make sure that we can finesse and work to-
gether is our Comprehensive Safety Analysis 2010, redesign of our 
safety  fitness  program  the  Chairman  was  just  questioning  me 
about.  We  would  want  to  make  sure  that  the  contents  of  this  bill 
allow  us  to  continue  with  that  modernization  of  our  safety  fitness 
and  not  have  two  different  kinds  of  rating  systems  that  would  be 
in  place.  But  I  am  sure  that  we  could  discuss  that  and  come  to 
some resolution. But we applaud the Committee for moving ahead. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

33 

Senator HUTCHISON. All right. Well, those were the major things 

that I have. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  to  step  out.  We  are  trying  to  finish  this 
tax  extender  negotiation  for  some  of  our  people  here,  our  victims 
of  Hurricane  Ike.  And  I  am  trying  to  get  some  disaster  protection. 
So I am going to have to step out. 

But  I  thank  you  very  much.  I  am  going  to  try  to  step  back  in, 
but  I  really  appreciate  that  what  I  am  hearing  is  that  all  three  of 
you  believe  that  we  can  take  some  major  steps  forward  with  the 
legislation.  And  if  you  all  can  beat  us  to  the  punch  with  a  rule-
making,  it  is  good,  but  if  you  cannot,  whatever  status  you  are  in 
will  make  the  time  table  more  doable.  So  I  think  that  we  are  all 
going  to  work  together  here  to  enhance  safety  and  that  is  a  good 
thing. So thank you very much. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you,  Senator  Hutchison.  The  legis-
lation  sounds  like  it  has  a  real  good  purpose  and  will  make  bus 
riding safer, and that is a perfect objective for legislation. 

Senator HUTCHISON. I will look forward to working with you, Mr. 

Chairman. 

please. 

the panel. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. And good luck with the tax extenders. Go, 

[Applause.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Now  I  thank  you  very  much,  members  of 

And we will now invite the members of the second panel to come 
to  the  witness  table.  They  bring  a  combination  of  policy  expertise 
and personal experience to the issue, and we look forward to hear-
ing from them. 

Mr.  Peter  Pantuso,  the  President  and  CEO  of  the  American  Bus 
Association. Mr. Pantuso will share with us the industry’s plan for 
improving our Federal motorcoach safety programs. 

Ms.  Jackie  Gillan,  Vice  President  of  Advocates  for  Highway  and 
Auto Safety. She is a longtime fighter for more safety on the road. 
We know each other from our work for safety and protection of the 
people  in  transportation  and  for  cars,  trucks,  buses  alike,  and  we 
welcome your ideas. 

And  we  have  Mr.  Steve  Forman.  Is  Mr.  Forman  here?  Well,  the 
one  that  has  your  name  on  it  is  the  one  you  are  choosing  if  you 
are  Mr.  Forman.  And  we  are  happy  to  have  your  testimony.  We 
know that your daughter was injured last year when the school bus 
that her team was riding rolled over in Devers, Texas. 

And  Mr.  John  Betts  will  testify  about  the  Bluffton  University 
baseball accident. Mr. Betts’ son David died when the bus carrying 
the Bluffton baseball team drove off a highway overpass in Atlanta, 
Georgia. 

And  I  express  to  all  of  you  who  had  a  family  member,  a  friend 
who was injured or was killed—we appreciate the fact that you are 
willing  to  be  here  today  and  do  not  want  to  see  any  other  family 
suffer the loss and anguish that you experienced. I thank all of you 
for being here. 

Mr.  Pantuso,  if  you  would,  you  may  begin.  We  have  a  5-minute 
limit.  I  am  usually  fairly  generous,  but  not  too  much  so.  So  red 
means put on the brakes. Thank you and please give us your testi-
mony. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

34 

STATEMENT OF PETER J. PANTUSO, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

AMERICAN BUS ASSOCIATION 

Mr. PANTUSO. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much for your lead-
ership  in  convening  this  hearing.  The  American  Bus  Association 
represents  800  bus  companies  who  operate  nearly  two-thirds  of  all 
the  motorcoaches  on  the  road.  The  motorcoach  industry  is  diverse 
and its bedrock is small businesses. In fact, a typical company has 
fewer  than  five  coaches.  Collectively  these  companies,  though,  pro-
vide  more  than  700  million  passenger  trips  annually,  as  many  as 
provided by the airlines. 

Mr.  Chairman,  let  me  be  very  clear.  The  bus  industry  does  not 
oppose  seat  belts.  What  we  do  favor  is  rigorous  scientific  research 
before  arriving  at  any  conclusions.  And  what  we  do  oppose  is  a 
rush to judgment. 

Safety is our number one priority and always has been. It is not 
just  enough  that  Government  statistics  show  the  bus  is  the  safest 
way  to  travel,  as  was  reaffirmed  earlier  by  Administrator  Hill  and 
Chairman  Rosenker.  We  want  to  be  even  safer.  However,  recent 
bus  crashes  illustrate  that  there  are  bus  companies  that  should 
never have been allowed to be on the road. 

ABA  promotes  safety  through  its  Bus  Industry  Safety  Council 
comprised  on  safety  experts,  associations,  engineers,  and  govern-
ment  agencies,  including  NHTSA,  NTSB,  and  FMCSA.  ABA  is  a 
member  of  FMCSA’s  Safety  Advisory  Committee  and  has  rec-
ommended stepped-up inspections. 

The heart of this issue is unsafe operators, combined with a lack 
of  enforcement,  lack  of  cooperation  between  Federal  and  State 
agencies.  Today  a  new  bus  company  need  only  file  an  application, 
pay  a  $300  fee,  and  provide  temporary  proof  of  insurance  to  be 
granted  Federal  operating  authority.  An  inspection  of  a  carrier’s 
equipment  and  personnel  and  records  can  take  up  to  18  months 
after authority is granted. It is difficult to imagine the FAA grant-
ing  an  application  for  an  airline  without  prior  review  of  its  fitness 
to operate. 

Following  the  horrific  crash  by  an  illegal  operator  in  Sherman, 
Texas, Administrator Hill froze applications for new bus companies’ 
operating  authority,  a  critical  first  step.  But  more  must  be  done. 
The  record  shows  that  some  of  the  most  serious  bus  accidents 
were  a  result  of  carriers  who  were  operating  illegally  or  had  a 
record  of  safety  violations.  Earlier  this  week,  the  ABA  proposed  a 
plan  to  enhance  bus  safety  by  getting  illegal,  unsafe  operators  off 
the  road  and  increasing  enforcement  of  existing  laws.  And  I  ask 
that plan be attributed to my testimony and appended to my testi-
mony. 

Elements  of  the  plan  include  that  FMCSA  must  ensure  that  the 
$300  million  going  to  states  for  inspections  include  buses,  not  just 
trucks.  A  State-by-State  patchwork  quilt  of  enforcement  is  com-
pletely  unacceptable.  Therefore,  FMCSA  and  State  law  enforce-
ment  officials  must  work  together  and  share  information  so  that 
another  Sherman,  Texas  crash  never  happens.  Illegal  and  unsafe 
operators involved in fatal crashes should be charged with Federal 
crimes and prosecuted to the maximum extent of the law. 

ABA is eager to work with Congress to make bus transportation 
safer. The late Congressman Paul Gillmor from Ohio started us on 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

35 

a road to a bipartisan bill for bus safety. Congressman Bill Shuster 
and other House members came together and introduced H.R. 4690 
which provides NHTSA with time and resources to research safety 
issues  and  develop  new  standards.  It  also  provides  a  phase-in  pe-
riod  for  manufacturers  and  operators  to  meet  the  new  standards, 
as well as an investment of Federal funds so that buses can be ret-
rofit  in  a  very  timely  fashion.  During  this  period,  states  should  be 
also  prevented  from  imposing  new  regulations  so  that  bus  opera-
tors  are  not  subject  to  inconsistent  or  contradictory  standards 
across the country. 

But  that  is  just  the  beginning,  Mr.  Chairman.  Bus  safety  re-
quires a holistic approach. Safety equipment cannot be bolted onto 
a vehicle. It must be engineered into the vehicle’s architecture. 

NHTSA  finally  began  bus  research  last  year,  after  a  decade  of 
prompting  by  the  bus  industry,  the  first  time  they  have  moved  on 
this  issue  in  history.  Now  they  need  the  time  to  complete  their 
work.  One  cannot  rush  safety  research  or  put  a  time  table  on 
science.  Safety  is  just  too  important  to  be  left  to  intuition,  to 
chance, or even to educated guesses. Safety demands rigorous test-
ing. 

We  welcome  the  opportunity  to  work  with  you,  Mr.  Chairman, 
and the Committee for a safer bus industry. We appreciate the op-
portunity to be here. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Pantuso follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PETER J. PANTUSO, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

AMERICAN BUS ASSOCIATION 

Introduction 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  my  name  is  Peter  J.  Pantuso 
and I serve as the President and Chief Executive Officer of the American Bus Asso-
ciation (ABA). The ABA and its 3800 members would like to thank you, Mr. Chair-
man for your leadership in convening this hearing. The ABA appreciates the oppor-
tunity to testify on the issue of bus and motor carrier safety and to work with you, 
the  Committee  and  the  Congress  on  the  reauthorization  of  the  Nation’s  transpor-
tation programs in the coming year. 

We  also  come  before  you  today  representing  the  interests  of  the  entire  industry 
including  the  National  Tour  Association  and  the  United  Motorcoach  Association. 
Both  organizations  are  equally  concerned  about  safe  motorcoach  travel  and  each 
represents  significant  motorcoach  companies.  For  its  part  the  ABA  is  the  national 
trade  association  for  the  independent,  private  over-the-road  bus  industry.  ABA  is  a 
voluntary  organization  comprised  of  companies  that  operate  buses  and  provide  re-
lated  services  to  the  motorcoach  industry.  Our  bus  operator  members,  of  which 
there are 850, operate 40 to 45 foot touring coaches with baggage bays under a pas-
senger  compartment.  These  operators  also  represent  nearly  sixty-five  percent  of  all 
motorcoaches  on  the  road  today  in  North  America.  Nearly  all  of  these  operator 
members  provide  charter  and  tour  service  (like  Coach  America  located  in  Texas) 
commuter service (like Academy Bus Lines in New Jersey) and some 100 ABA mem-
ber  companies  provide  regular  route  scheduled  service  like  Trailways  and  Grey-
hound.  The  American  motorcoach  industry  is  diverse  but  its  bedrock  is  small  busi-
ness men and women. ABA’s average member has eight motorcoaches or fewer. Our 
operator members provide local, regional and national services. Together ABA mem-
bers provide all manner of bus services and provide in excess of seven hundred mil-
lion  passenger  trips  annually,  a  number  which  approximates  the  number  of  pas-
sengers  carried  by  U.S.  airlines  in  any  given  year.  In  addition,  we  move  more  pas-
sengers in 2 weeks than Amtrak does in a year. 

Chief  among  our  duties  is  providing  charter  and  tour  services  to  the  Nation.  We 
bring families, school groups and senior citizens together for tours, family reunions, 
festivals, sporting events, fairs and to see the beauty of our country. ABA members 
will  provide  these  services  safely.  We  do  so  because  it  is  a  part  of  ABA’s  mission, 
i.e.,  to  provide  safe  trips  to  all  our  passengers  and  because  our  families,  neighbors 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

36 

and  friends  ride  with  us  every  day.  ABA  believes  that  there  is  no  margin  for  error 
in  safety;  we  must  be  safe  and  even  one  accident  tarnishes  the  industry.  The  prob-
lem today is that there has been a spate of accidents by bus companies that should 
not have been on the road. 
ABA and Bus Safety 

ABA  promotes  safety  in  the  industry  is  several  ways.  First,  ABA  long  ago  estab-
lished the Bus Industry Safety Council (BISC). This organization is composed of the 
safety  directors  of  bus  companies  and  key  representatives  from  bus  industry  sup-
pliers,  and  state  and  Federal  Government  agencies.  BISC  meets  at  least  twice  a 
year  to  discuss  and  provide  guidance  and  best  practices  on  industry  safety  issues. 
At BISC’s July meeting there were discussions and panels led by or participated in 
by  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  (FMCSA),  National  Highway 
Traffic  Safety  Administration  (NHTSA)  and  the  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board  (NTSB).  It  is  important  to  note  that  BISC  is  open  to  all  bus  operators  and 
all those interested in bus safety whether or not they are members of the ABA. 

ABA’s  commitment  to  safety  goes  beyond  BISC.  ABA  led  the  fight  against  dan-
gerous roadside inspections which required buses to unload their passengers by the 
side  of  the  road  in  traffic  while  buses  were  inspected.  The  fact  of  youngsters  and 
senior citizens along the road while cars and trucks passed by at 70 miles per hour 
was an accident waiting to happen. Earlier this summer, ABA was instrumental in 
securing  the  passage  of  H.R.  3985  (P.L.  110–219)  which  requires  FMCSA  to  certify 
the willingness and ability of motor carriers to abide by the Americans with Disabil-
ities  Act  (ADA)  before  the  agency  grants  that  carrier  authority  to  operate.  And  we 
advanced that legislation in the face of some opposition within the bus industry. In-
deed,  before  drafting  that  legislation,  ABA  sued  the  FMCSA  seeking  to  enforce  the 
ADA, a suit the FMCSA and the Department of Transportation vigorously opposed. 
In addition, through the ABA, the independent, private bus industry is a member 
of FMCSA’s Motor Carrier Safety Advisory Committee (MCSAC). This Federal advi-
sory committee meets each quarter to evaluate and provide recommendations to the 
FMCSA  Administrator  on  safety  issues.  Moreover,  the  MCSAC  engages  in  deter-
mining how best to extend the agency’s resources to advance safe bus and truck op-
erations. ABA participates in the MCSAC with the American Trucking Associations, 
the  Advocates  for  Highway  and  Auto  Safety,  Road  Safe  America  and  several  state 
law  enforcement  agencies.  Several  ABA  recommendations  to  FMCSA,  for  example, 
increasing bus inspections, have been included in the FMCSA’s list of recommenda-
tions  for  the  reauthorization  of  the  Nation’s  transportation  programs  scheduled  for 
next year. Reauthorization looms large in ABA’s plans for safer buses and safer op-
erators and in ABA’s view enforcement of current bus safety standards is key to safe 
bus operators. 
Enforcement is Critical 

ABA believes strongly that the heart of the problem of accidents and fatalities are 
unsafe operators and the lack of FMCSA’s and state enforcement officials’ attention 
to  a  motor  carriers’  safety  fitness  prior  to  granting  authority  to  operate.  There  is 
also a lack of cooperation between the Federal Government and the states in getting 
unfit bus companies off of the nation’s highways. It is difficult to see the FAA grant-
ing  an  application  for  an  air  carrier  without  a  prior  review  of  its  fitness  to  operate 
but that is essentially what happens to bus applicants. 

Today,  a  person  seeking  authority  to  operate  need  only  file  an  application,  pay 
a  fee  of  three  hundred  dollars  and  provide  proof  of  insurance  (five  million  dollars); 
an  applicant  gains  operating  authority  before  it  can  be  shown  that  he  or  she  is  a 
safe operator. Any inspection of a carrier’s equipment, personnel or records can take 
up  to  18  months  after  authority  is  granted,  a  regulatory  scheme  that  puts  the  cart 
before the horse and opens the public to unsafe operators. 

FMCSA  has  released  statistics  which  reveal  that  in  2007  the  number  of  applica-
tions for new and expanded regular route authority amounted to almost 50 percent 
of  the  industry.  And  still  there  is  no  investigation  of  fitness  before  authority  is 
granted.  Recently,  following  the  horrific  accident  in  Texas,  FMCSA  Administrator 
Hill froze the processing of all applications for passenger carrier authority while he 
addresses the issues surrounding the unprecedented number of applications. We ap-
plaud  Administrator  Hill  for  taking  this  bold  step.  This  demonstrates  that  FMCSA 
itself has focused on the need to address the entry issue. 

How important is it to certify a carrier’s safety fitness prior to granting authority? 
ABA  has  determined  that  over  the  last  decade  each  of  the  most  serious  bus  acci-
dents were the product of carriers who were either operating illegally or had serious 
pre-existing  safety  issues.  Inspecting  a  carrier  before  it  begins  operations  and  re-
quiring  periodic  inspections  thereafter  would  help  reduce  this  toll  of  lives  and  acci-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

37 

dents.  ABA  believes  that  any  examination  of  a  carrier’s  safety  fitness  must  include 
a review of the operator’s safety management program and a physical inspection of 
the  operator’s  vehicles.  Our  proposed  inspection  process  is  virtually  identical  to  the 
process now used by the Department of Defense (DOD) to vet motor carriers which 
seek to transport military personnel. The DOD contracts with third party inspectors 
to carry out these inspections, something we have long advocated to FMCSA. 

Second, FMCSA must implement the authority given it in SAFETEA–LU to deny 
authority  to  individuals  who  startup  new  bus  companies  after  already  developing 
bad safety records at prior companies. It appears that the most recent accident was 
the product of this type of operator. 

Third, Congress should require that states enforce any interstate shutdown orders 
from FMCSA and cancel any intrastate operating authority issued to bus companies 
whose  interstate  operating  authority  is  terminated  by  FMCSA  or  whose  interstate 
application is denied on fitness grounds. This is a particular problem in states with 
extensive  intrastate  operations.  The  states  must  become  more  aggressive  in  confis-
cating the license plates and vehicle registrations for non-compliant carriers. 

Fourth, Congress should require that FMCSA and the states ensure that carriers 
applying  for  private  charter  authority  do  not  use  that  authority  to  provide  common 
carrier,  scheduled  or  fixed  route  service  open  to  the  general  public.  This  is  a  par-
ticular problem in the Border States. Even though cross-border, fixed route bus au-
thority grants are frozen under NAFTA, charter applications are not. Thus, carriers 
on  both  sides  of  the  border  get  charter  authority  from  FMCSA  and  then  run  fixed 
route service with no effort to prevent these illegal operations. 

Fifth,  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Assistance  Program  (MCSAP)  provides  the  states 
with  Federal  dollars  to  support  a  bus  inspection  program.  In  ABA’s  view  only  a 
handful  of  states  have  an  effective  bus  inspection  program.  The  states  must  dem-
onstrate that they have effective bus inspection programs. States are provided funds 
through  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Assistance  Program  (MCSAP),  to  provide  these 
programs.  Last  year  Federal  MCSAP  grants  exceeded  two  hundred  million  dollars. 
Lastly, for many years ABA has supported a provision that would require FMCSA 
to  establish  a  medical  registry.  Such  a  registry  would  provide  bus  operators  with 
an approved list of qualified medical providers who will not certify a driver’s fitness 
for duty if the driver is unfit. Currently, a driver could ‘‘shop’’ for a medical profes-
sional  who  knows  little  about  transportation  or  those  medical  conditions  that  bear 
upon  safe  operations.  As  a  result,  a  medically  unqualified  driver  would  be  certified 
fit for duty. 
Reauthorization Legislation 

As  this  Committee  moves  toward  reauthorization,  please  keep  in  mind  that  ABA 
is  eager  to  work  with  you  on  all  manner  of  transportation  issues.  We  are  available 
to  anyone  who  calls  with  a  request  for  help  in  making  buses  safer.  It  was  such  a 
call from the late Congressman Paul Gillmor (R-Ohio) which started us on the road 
to  H.R.  4690,  a  bipartisan  bill  that  provides  a  comprehensive  plan  for  bus  safety. 
The  industry,  ABA,  Greyhound  Lines,  the  unions  and  the  United  Motorcoach  Asso-
ciation  (UMA),  and  others  worked  for  several  months  to  craft  this  bill.  After  the 
death  of  Congressman  Gillmor,  Congressman  Bill  Shuster  and  Congresswoman 
Eddie Bernice Johnson came together in a bipartisan effort to introduce the bill that 
is  now  H.R.  4690.  Other  House  members  have  joined  this  coalition  and  ABA  con-
tinues  to  support  this  bill.  The  bill  provides  time  for  NHTSA  to  research  safety 
issues,  time  for  any  new  standards  to  be  implemented  by  the  industry,  including 
the bus manufacturers who would have to retool and perhaps reengineer their proc-
ess and it provides funds so that bus companies can retrofit their buses in a timely 
fashion. 

But  H.R.  4690  is  neither  our  only  legislative  effort  nor  did  our  safety  initiatives 
begin 2 years ago. ABA also actively supports H.R. 3820, a bill to provide tax credits 
to  motor  carriers  which  install  advanced  safety  equipment  (e.g.,  lane  departure 
warning,  electronic  stability  controls)  in  their  buses.  ABA  believes  that  proper  bus 
safety legislation will materially aid our goal for safer bus operators and operations 
and we commend these bills for your consideration as we move into the reauthoriza-
tion process. 

One  thing  is  certain.  While  bus  safety  is  vital,  the  issue  is  also  complicated.  The 
safety  of  any  vehicle  is  dependent  on  many  issues.  This  is  no  less  true  of 
motorcoaches. Several factors must be weighed before any person; agency or organi-
zation can pronounce a bus safe or unsafe or say with certainty that any one change 
will  make  the  bus  safer.  I  have  already  noted  that  the  skill,  ability,  resources  and 
willingness  of  the  driver  and  bus  company  are  of  prime  importance.  Likewise,  the 
type,  make  and  model  of  the  motorcoach  are  issues  that  must  be  considered.  Obvi-
ously,  newer  motorcoaches  are  built  differently  than  older  models  and  may  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

38 

more  safety  features.  The  type  of  crash  a  bus  is  involved  in  is  also  important.  For 
example, seat belts may help passengers in so-called ‘‘roll over’’ crashes but in other 
type  of  crashes  a  combination  of  compartmentalization  and  other  safety  improve-
ments may be just as effective. 

Bus window design may also be a factor. Bus engineers have noted that fatalities 
in bus crashes began largely with the advent of larger bus windows, hence the need 
for  NHTSA  to  study  advanced  window  glazing  techniques.  In  considering  fire  sup-
pression one issue is where to place any additional fire suppression gear on a motor-
coach and at what cost to other bus safety systems? 

Reauthorization  provides  this  Committee  with  a  rare  opportunity  to  craft  a  com-
prehensive  bus  safety  bill  that  all  parties  and  transportation  stakeholders  can  sup-
port.  And  here  ABA  would  like  to  commend  Committee  Ranking  Member  Senator 
Hutchison  for  her  efforts  in  fostering  such  a  bill.  In  the  Committee’s  continued  ef-
forts  on  behalf  of  this  goal,  ABA  asks  you  to  keep  my  testimony  and  concerns  in 
mind  regarding  any  bus  safety  legislation.  Those  concerns  may  be  grouped  around 
three issues: implementation, retrofit standards and liability. 

First,  any  bill  that  requires  NHTSA  to  promulgate  standards  for  seatbelts,  ad-
vanced  window  glazing  and  improved  firefighting  equipment  should  require  that 
NHTSA research and test for these issues prior to promulgating standards for these 
buses.  Further,  there  must  be  sufficient  time  for  bus  manufacturers,  operators  and 
maintenance professionals to meet the new standards. 

Clearly,  new  NHTSA  requirements  must  be  based  on  what  research  and  testing 
determines  is  appropriate,  and  NHTSA  should  have  3  years  to  do  the  testing  and 
initiate  and  complete  the  rulemaking.  Then  NHTSA  must  be  required  to  develop 
standards for each of these items and their installation on both new and retrofitted 
buses. The new and retrofit standards are likely to be quite different, given the vast 
array  of  existing  over-the-road  buses.  Retrofit  standards  will  be  complicated  by  the 
various motorcoach makes, model and manufacturers and the fact that a motorcoach 
normally  has  a  25  year  life  cycle.  NHTSA  will  also  have  to  take  into  account  dif-
ferent  flooring,  anchors  and  seat  construction.  One  size  retrofit  standards  will  not 
fit  all  buses.  The  complicated  issue  of  retrofitting  buses  also  points  up  the  need  for 
Federal  financial  assistance  in  order  to  retrofit  buses.  Unlike  the  transit  industry 
our  buses  are  not  federally  funded  or  maintained  with  Federal  money.  We  are  an 
industry composed of small businesses and the imposition of a seatbelt mandate for 
every bus will be a heavy one. It will be impossible to fulfill without Federal funds. 
In addition, a too brief implementation phase-in time for all buses is unreasonable 
and  unworkable.  First,  in  one  year,  the  four  major  world  bus  manufacturers  (only 
one  is  a  domestic  company)  produce  a  combined  total  of  nearly  2000  motorcoaches 
for  the  U.S.  market.  Currently,  there  are  40,000  motorcoaches  on  the  U.S.  high-
ways. The bus manufacturers will probably need more than a year just to retool and 
re-engineer  their  product  to  comply  with  the  new  law.  Thus,  the  vast  majority  of 
buses would have to be retrofitted. This will be an extremely expensive and burden-
some  undertaking.  Ironically,  an  unreasonably  tight  time-frame  could  also  mean 
less  safe  buses  overall  since  it  would  divert  resources  from  new  bus  purchases, 
which may be safer than older buses. 

Installing  seat  belts  is  not  just  a  matter  of  bolting  a  belt  to  a  seat.  It  may  be, 
depending  on  the  type  of  belt  and  bus,  a  matter  of  redesigning  the  seat,  strength-
ening  the  bus  floor  or  changing  the  seat  configuration.  Safety  cannot  simply  be 
added  on  to  any  equipment,  it  must  be  engineered  into  that  equipment.  In  H.R. 
4690, bus manufacturers were given 3 years to retool their plants and redesign their 
products to meet the new standards. The operator phase-in period is that mandated 
by Congress in the implementation of the bus provisions of the Americans with Dis-
abilities  Act.  That  is,  that  bus  fleets  be  50  percent  compliant  within  6  years  and 
fully  compliant  within  12  years.  We  believe  that  these  timeframes  are  appropriate 
for the private bus industry. 

One  other  concern  ABA  and  its  members  have  about  any  bus  safety  legislation 
is  that  of  liability  protection  for  bus  operators  and  manufacturers.  H.R.  4690  ad-
dresses this issue by providing liability protection for bus operators and bus makers 
during the law’s phase in period. Without such protection bus operators and manu-
facturers would be sued for not having seatbelts even though the law would not yet 
require  the  buses  to  be  so  equipped.  Moreover,  during  the  phase-in  period  of  the 
Federal regulations it is important that bus manufacturers be protected from states 
imposing  their  own  regulations.  Without  such  protection,  interstate  motor  carriers 
could  be  subjected  to  inconsistent  or  even  contradictory  standards  concerning  all 
manner  of  safety  equipment.  When  Congress  mandated  the  use  of  air  bags  in  pas-
senger  vehicles  it  provided  just  such  protection  for  automobile  manufacturers;  that 
is,  during  the  phase  in  period,  manufacturers  or  owners  could  not  be  sued  for  not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

39 

having  air  bags  or  be  subject  to  inconsistent  state  requirements.  That  is  exactly 
what ABA seeks with any new legislation. 
NHTSA Bus Crash Testing Program 

ABA’s  efforts  to  prevent  bus  crashes  and  to  lessen  the  damage  from  such  acci-
dents  began  with  the  NTSB’s  Bus  Crashworthiness  hearing  in  1998.  Since  then 
ABA has asked NHTSA to apply to Congress for authority and funds to begin a bus 
crash  testing  program.  Then,  as  now,  ABA  wants  to  determine  the  safety  of  the 
buses  we  operate  and  how  to  discover  ways  to  make  them  safer.  After  years  of  dis-
taining  such  a  program  because  of  the  industry’s  low  number  of  fatalities,  an  aver-
age  of  22  a  year,  late  last  year  NHTSA  finally  began  such  a  program,  the  first  in 
its  history.  The  program,  studying  the  need  for  new  regulations  on  fire  prevention 
and suppression, emergency egress, roof strength standards and occupant protection 
is  a  step  in  the  right  direction.  In  fact,  ABA  would  wish  the  program  be  more  rig-
orous.  However,  ABA  and  its  members  are  in  partnership  with  the  agency  in  this 
effort.  We  provide  resources,  including  technical  expertise  and  equipment  for  the 
program.  Our  experts  are  in  regular  contact  with  the  NHTSA  staff.  ABA  hopes  for 
a  timely  analysis  of  the  reams  of  data  that  just  one  crash  test  produced  and  that 
the  industry  will  get  answers  to  the  questions  of  whether,  and  if  so,  how  the  buses 
we depend on can be made safer. 

Now that NHTSA has begun its research and testing program, ABA believes that 
it needs time to complete its work before it can provide scientifically correct conclu-
sions  as  to  the  future  safety  needs  of  buses.  One  cannot  rush  safety  research  and 
one  must  look  at  all  the  evidence.  For  example,  recent  bus  crashes  involved  equip-
ment in which seatbelts were provided, yet the injuries and fatalities seem (and the 
evidence is yet unclear) to be as bad as those crashes with buses not equipped with 
seat  belts.  This  question  raises  other  questions,  for  example,  the  responsibility  for 
ensuring seat belt use. None of us know the answers to these questions because the 
testing  is  ongoing,  the  data  still  unclear.  It  is  not  a  question  for  ABA  alone.  Last 
year, Texas passed a law requiring seat belts on all buses which carry students from 
Kindergarten  to  Grade  12.  According  to  news  reports,  there  is  now  an  effort  in  the 
legislature  to  re-look  at  that  law  in  part  because  there  is  no  science  or  testing  to 
support  the  law’s  conclusion  that  seat  belts  are  necessary  or  at  least  not  harmful 
in all accidents. 
Conclusion 

Hopefully in addition to providing the Committee with the facts it needs to legis-
late  bus  safety  during  reauthorization,  my  testimony  will  also  dispel  a  myth  about 
the industry’s promotion of and interest in safety. That myth of ‘‘if the industry real-
ly  wanted  to  do  it,  it  would  have  done  so  already.’’  Nothing  could  be  further  from 
the  truth.  What  standards  would  the  industry  use  for  installing,  for  example,  seat 
belts?  What  type  of  belts  and  on  what  type  of  equipment?  And  what  if  the  Federal 
agencies  then  determine  that  the  standards  used  were  incorrect?  Since  1966,  it  is 
the Federal Government’s role to set these standards. Heretofore, it has chosen not 
to  act.  How  can  any  one  say  that  the  industry  should  have  acted  in  the  govern-
ment’s stead? 

ABA’s  view  is  that  safety  is  too  important  to  be  left  to  intuition,  chance  or  even 
educated guesses. Safety demands rigorous testing and specific answers to the ques-
tions  surrounding  the  development,  installation,  and  use  of  any  safety  equipment 
in a variety of circumstances. Safety also demands rigorous enforcement of the regu-
latory  tools  available  and  the  development  of  new  tools  as  needed.  But  those  an-
swers  and  those  new  tools  cannot  be  rushed  solely  because  we  wish  to  have  them 
sooner.  It  is  for  these  reasons  that  we  work  with  NHTSA  on  the  bus  crash  testing 
program,  we  work  with  FMCSA  on  demanding  ADA  accessible  transportation  and 
upgrading the skills of bus operators, and we work with NTSB at every bus accident 
investigation.  It  is  safe  to  say  that  ABA  will  work  with  anyone  who  calls  and  has 
an  idea  for  safer  buses,  operations  and  educating  the  public  on  how  to  pick  a  safe 
bus  operator.  For  those  reasons  and,  as  I  stated  at  the  beginning  of  my  testimony, 
for  the  simple  reason  that  our  families,  friends  and  colleagues  ride  with  us  every 
day,  we  are  happy  to  work  with  you  Mr.  Chairman  and  with  the  Committee  and 
with the Congress for a safer bus industry. 

Once  again,  on  behalf  of  the  700  million  passengers  who  ride  with  us  every  year 
and  the  3800  ABA  member  companies  and  organizations,  I  thank  you  for  allowing 
us to testify and I am happy to answer any questions. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Ms. Gillan, we welcome and invite you to give your testimony. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

40 

STATEMENT OF JACQUELINE S. GILLAN, VICE PRESIDENT, 

ADVOCATES FOR HIGHWAY AND AUTO SAFETY 

Ms. GILLAN. Thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 
Good  afternoon.  My  name  is  Jackie  Gillan.  I  appreciate  the  op-
portunity  to  testify  on  such  an  important  safety  issue  on  behalf  of 
Advocates for Highway and Auto Safety. 

Motorcoach  safety  is  a  serious  concern  for  anyone  who  uses  this 
growing  and  affordable  mode  of  transportation.  Every  day  millions 
of  Americans  are  boarding  buses  at  risk  because  of  chronic  and 
continuing failures to upgrade the safety design of motorcoaches, to 
provide  adequate  safety  oversight  of  the  industry,  and  to  give  con-
sumers the essential information they need about the safety record 
of motorcoach companies. 

Motorcoaches  are  really  the  over-the-road  commuter  airlines 
without  the  strong  Federal  safety  standards  that  protect  you  and 
your family when flying. According to DOT data, a total of 571 peo-
ple  died  in  400  motorcoach  crashes  in  the  last  11  years,  including 
motorcoach  occupants,  people  in  other  vehicles,  and  pedestrians. 
And  in  fact,  I  have  attached  to  my  testimony  a  chart  describing 
over 100 motor crashes from around the country. 

We  know  what  to  do  to  protect  passengers  and  prevent  motor-
coach  crashes.  However,  the  Department  of  Transportation  just 
does  not  seem  to  want  to  do  it.  For  more  than  40  years,  the  Na-
tional  Transportation  Safety  Board  has  been  investigating  motor-
coach  crashes  and  issuing  recommendations  to  improve  occupant 
safety  and  operations.  These  lifesaving  recommendations  have 
largely been ignored or rejected at DOT. 

For  example,  40  years  ago,  NTSB  recommended  to  DOT  that 
they  consider  seat  belts  on  motorcoaches,  and  they  have  repeated 
that recommendation throughout the years. Australia has required 
three-point  seat  belts  on  motorcoaches  for  over  14  years.  During 
that time, no one who was wearing a seat belt has died or suffered 
any  injury  in  a  motorcoach  crash.  Seat  belts  on  motorcoaches  are 
also now required in the European Union and Japan. 

Other  NTSB  safety  recommendations  continue  to  take  a  back 
seat  at  DOT.  It  is  clear  that  Congress  needs  to  pass  Senate  bill 
2326, the Motor Coach Enhanced Safety Act. This bill directs DOT 
to  act  within  reasonable  deadlines  on  safety  improvements  rec-
ommended  in  NTSB  investigation,  Inspector  General  reports,  and 
a host of GAO studies that have languished for decades. 

Clearly, when Congress acts, DOT reacts. And I need to be more 
specific on that. When the Senate Commerce Committee acts, DOT 
reacts.  It  took  Federal  legislation  to  require  air  bags  in  passenger 
vehicles,  to  direct  Federal  upgrades  in  tire  safety  after  the  Fire-
stone fiasco, and to mandate long overdue vehicle safety standards 
and  SAFETEA–LU  to  reduce  the  number  of  rollover  crashes  that 
continue  to  kill  and  injure  thousands  annually.  Once  again,  this 
kind of Congressional leadership and legislation is urgently needed. 
S. 2326 requires DOT to issue safety standards that would result 
in  lap  and  shoulder  belts,  a  stronger  roof,  and  advanced  window 
glazing  to  protect  occupants  from  ejection,  and  the  use  of  readily 
available  crash  avoidance  technologies,  such  as  electronic  stability 
control  and  adaptive  cruise  control.  It  would  also  prevent  deadly 
motorcoach  fires  by  increasing  the  fire  resistance  of  interior  mate-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

rials,  requiring  automatic  fire  suppression  systems,  as  well  as  im-
proving passenger evacuation in an emergency. 

41 

The bill also mandates additional reforms to keep unsafe drivers 
and companies off of our highways like required training of motor-
coach  drivers,  increased  Federal  and  State  oversight  and  enforce-
ment,  and  an  issue  that  you  have  taken  a  leadership  role  on,  the 
installation of electronic on-board recorders to help enforce Federal 
hours-of-service rules and keep fatigued drivers off the road. 

FMCSA  has  also  failed  to  give  consumers  essential  information 
about  the  safety  of  motorcoach  operators.  A  random  review  of  the 
safety  ratings  of  motorcoach  companies  in  New  Jersey  and  Texas 
were found to be incomplete, out of date, misleading, or simply not 
available.  Some  safety  ratings  were  20  years  old,  Senator.  Only  a 
handful of companies in either state had ratings that were current 
or complete. 

When  motorcoaches  are  stopped  and  inspected,  the  results  are 
also  discouraging.  For  2005,  more  than  1  out  of  10  motorcoaches 
were placed out of service, a rate that has not changed significantly 
over several years. Similarly, inspections found that one out of five 
commercial  drivers  of  passenger-carrying  motor  carriers  were 
placed  out  of  service  for  failing  to  keep  updated  log  books  on  their 
driving hours. 

In conclusion, Senator, every passenger on every motorcoach trip 
in every state deserves to be safe. Too many lives are at stake, and 
too few safety measures are being advanced at DOT, and we cannot 
wait  any  longer.  Advocates  strongly  recommends  that  Congress 
enact S. 2326. 

I also have with me, which I would like to submit for the record, 
letters  from  nearly  every  single  major  highway  and  auto  and  con-
sumer  safety  group,  as  well  as  the  supplier  industry  of  advanced 
glazing,  showing  their  strong  support  for  moving  quickly  on  this 
legislation. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Gillan follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JACQUELINE S. GILLAN, VICE PRESIDENT, 

ADVOCATES FOR HIGHWAY AND AUTO SAFETY 

Good  afternoon.  My  name  is  Jacqueline  Gillan  and  I  am  Vice  President  of  Advo-
cates  for  Highway  and  Auto  Safety  (Advocates),  a  coalition  of  consumer,  health, 
safety, medical organizations and insurers working together to advance Federal and 
state  programs  and  policies  that  prevent  deaths  and  injuries  on  our  neighborhood 
streets  and  highways.  I  commend  the  Subcommittee  for  holding  hearings  on  the 
safety of motorcoach operations. 

This  hearing  today  is  another  in  a  long  series  of  oversight  hearings  held  by  the 
Subcommittee  because  of  its  concern  over  the  quality  of  motor  carrier  safety.  The 
Subcommittee  held  a  hearing  in  May  1,  2007,  to  receive  testimony  on  the  value  of 
Electronic  On-Board  Recorders  (EOBRs)  and  their  important  contribution  to  reduc-
ing  commercial  driver  fatigue.  That  hearing  was  extraordinarily  important  because 
it  showed  how  members  of  the  motor  carrier  community  have  found  that  EOBRs 
are  not  only  valuable  for  keeping  commercial  drivers  within  the  limits  of  Federal 
hours  of  service  regulations,  but  also  help  to  expedite  freight  delivery  and  conserve 
fuel,  keep  big  trucks  from  using  illegal  routes,  and  track  motorcoaches  in  real-time 
to help ensure passenger safety. 

Motorcoach  safety  is  a  serious  concern  for  anyone  who  relies  on  and  uses  this 
growing  and  affordable  mode  of  transportation.  Unfortunately,  when  it  comes  to 
choosing  a  safe  motorcoach,  consumers  have  been  forced  to  travel  wearing  a  blind-
fold. Many of us in this hearing room have put our excited children on charter buses 
for out-of-town school field trips and team sporting events, boarded motorcoaches to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

42 

take  part  in  church  and  community  outings,  or  waved  goodbye  to  retired  parents 
who  traveled  by  tour  coach  to  vacation  destinations.  Some  have  even  taken  advan-
tage  of  low  cost  fares  to  travel  between  Washington,  D.C.,  New  York  or  Boston  on 
‘‘curbside’’ buses that leave from downtown locations rather than bus terminals. 

Motorcoaches  make  630  million  passenger  trips  a  year,  and  transport  hundreds 
of thousands of passengers each day, often carrying more passengers—55 to 59 peo-
ple  when  fully  loaded—than  most  commuter  airline  flights.  Yet,  motorcoach  safety 
is  not  being  held  to  the  same  high  safety  standards  as  passenger  aviation  even 
though  motorcoaches  operate  on  much  more  congested  and  less  safe  highways.  Mo-
torcoach  drivers  are  not  required  to  meet  the  rigorous  medical  and  safety  require-
ments of airline pilots; most of the vehicle safety design and performance standards 
for  passenger  vehicles,  especially  for  occupant  protection,  are  not  required  for 
motorcoaches;  and  motorcoach  companies  are  governed  by  the  same  weak,  ineffec-
tual safety oversight and enforcement regime that is used for trucking freight. 

Despite  the  widespread  use  of  motorcoach  transportation  in  our  everyday  lives, 
the public is almost completely in the dark about the safety of motorcoach transpor-
tation because of chronic and continuing failures by the Federal Motor Carrier Safe-
ty  Administration  (FMCSA)  to  exercise  its  legal  authority  to  regulate  the  safety  of 
this industry, and the failure of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration 
(NHTSA)  to  require  the  same  basic  safety  improvements  required  for  smaller  pas-
senger  vehicles  to  ensure  the  crash  avoidance  and  crashworthiness  of  buses  and 
motorcoaches.1 These  failures  have  contributed  to  numerous  tragic  motorcoach 
crashes in just the last few years, including several just last month, in August 2008. 
My  testimony  today  will  address  the  safety  problems  and  the  documented  need 
to  improve  motorcoach  safety;  the  means  available  to  provide  improved  occupant 
protection  in  motorcoach  crashes  and  other  emergencies,  such  as  fires;  enhanced 
crash avoidance capabilities, and the importance of strengthening Federal oversight 
of  motorcoach  operations  to  ensure  that  unsafe  motorcoach  companies  and  drivers 
are detected before they can do harm and are kept off the road. 
Motorcoach Crashes Are Frequent and Deadly 

Over the past four decades, the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) has 
investigated  nearly  70  motorcoach  crashes  and  fires  that  resulted  in  several  hun-
dred  passenger  deaths  and  many  hundreds  of  severe  injuries.  NTSB’s  motorcoach 
crash investigations over just the last decade, 1998–2007, involved the deaths of 255 
passengers  and  more  than  one  thousand  injuries.2 In  some  of  these  incidents  more 
than  20  people  on  board  were  killed  in  a  single  crash  or  fire.  Not  all  motorcoach 
crashes resulting in death and injury are investigated by NTSB or any other agency 
at the Federal level. I have attached to my testimony a list of the motorcoach crash-
es  that  Advocates  has  compiled  from  the  NTSB  investigation  reports  and  reliable 
newspaper  and  wire  service  reports  found  on  the  Internet.  But  even  this  list,  con-
taining over 100 motorcoach crashes and fires in the past 40 years, is far from com-
plete. 

According  to  NHTSA  data,  there  were  400  fatal  motorcoach  crashes  from  1994 
through 2005 in which 571 people died.3 Of that total of fatal crashes and associated 
deaths, 2005 was an especially tragic year—70 motorcoach occupants died in crash-
es, the highest total ever recorded. Data covering a much longer period of time, 1975 
through 2005, shows 1,107 fatal crashes involving 1,117 motorcoaches and resulting 
in  1,486  deaths  to  passengers  in  motorcoaches,  people  in  other  vehicles  and  pedes-
trians.4 

Motorcoach  crashes  kill  and  injure  occupants  inside  the  motorcoaches  and  people 
outside  as  well.  That  is  why  it  is  crucially  important  to  have  a  comprehensive, 
multi-faceted  approach  to  motorcoach  safety  that  emphasizes  major  safety  counter-
measures  for  motorcoach  occupant  protection,  as  well  as  dramatic  improvements  in 
motorcoach crash avoidance capabilities that will ensure that these big, heavy vehi-
cles  provide  crash  protection  to  the  motorcoach  occupants  while  also  reducing  both 
the number and the severity of collisions with other highway users. 
Recent Motorcoach Crashes Illustrate Severe Safety Risks 

In  just  the  past  3  years  there  have  been  constant  reminders  of  the  safety  perils 
in  motorcoach  travel.  Moreover,  three  severe  motorcoach  crashes  occurred  over  a 
span of less than 3 days only a few weeks ago. 
• Sherman, Texas 

On  August  8,  2008,  a  motorcoach  with  54  passengers,  operated  by  a  company, 
Angel  Tours,  Inc.  restarted  its  motorcoach  business  under  a  different  name,  Iguala 
Busmex, only 3 days after it had been judged an ‘‘imminent hazard’’ by FMCSA and 
prohibited  from  providing  transportation  services.  In  a  catastrophic  crash,  the 
Iguala  Busmex  motorcoach  broke  through  a  guardrail  in  rural  Grayson  County, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

43 

Texas and plummeted from an overpass into a dry creek bed in a rollover crash that 
resulted  in  17  people  dead  and  38  injured.  Angel  Tours,  Inc.,  had  been  stopped  by 
FMCSA  from  operating  only  6  weeks  earlier,  on  June  23,  2008.  The  new  business 
named  Iguala  Busmex,  according  to  preliminary  information  in  media  reports,  had 
no insurance and had no Federal interstate operating authority. 

By  the  time  the  crash  occurred,  the  owner  of  Angel  Tours  had  changed  the  com-
pany  name  to  Iguala  Busmex  and  continued  to  operate  illegally.  The  new  company 
even  used  the  same  business  address  to  restart  operations.  FMCSA  was  unaware 
that Angel Tours, Inc., had transformed into the rogue motorcoach company, Iguala 
Busmex.  In  fact,  the  company  had  no  legal  authority  to  provide  motorcoach  trans-
portation services for compensation even within the state of Texas. In far too many 
cases, motor carriers both of passengers and of freight are ordered to stop operations 
for safety reasons, but then restart their businesses under different company names, 
leaving  law  enforcement  officials  with  the  task  of  identifying  and  proving  which 
companies  are  conducting  illegal  operations.  Sometimes,  as  in  the  Sherman,  Texas 
crash,  Federal  authorities  find  this  out  only  after  a  tragic  crash,  when  deaths  and 
severe injuries have already occurred. 

The  motorcoach  in  the  Sherman,  Texas,  crash  was  operated  by  a  driver  who  had 
no  valid  medical  certificate.  FMCSA  had  also  determined  prior  to  its  ‘‘cease  oper-
ations’’  order  that  Angel  Tours  was  using  a  driver  without  the  company  having  re-
ceived  a  pre-employment  report,  a  Federal  requirement.  Angel  Tours  also  failed  to 
require  drivers  to  prepare  vehicle  inspection  reports.  In  addition,  the  motorcoach 
was  fitted  with  retreaded  tires  on  the  front  steer  axle,  another  Federal  regulatory 
violation. It appears that this illegal tire suddenly failed and destabilized the motor-
coach,  making  it  difficult  to  control  and  facilitating  its  crash  into  the  overpass 
guardrail. 
• Tunica, Mississippi 

On  August  10,  2008,  a  casino  motorcoach  operated  by  Harrah’s  Entertainment 
packed  with  43  tourists  rolled  over  in  a  highway  intersection  in  northwestern  Mis-
sissippi. The roof of the motorcoach collapsed and its windows were shattered. Three 
passengers died and 27 were injured, one in critical condition. 
• Primm, Nevada 

Another  casino  motorcoach  crash  occurred  on  I–15  near  Primm,  Nevada,  on  Au-
gust  10,  2008,  the  same  day  that  the  Harrah  motorcoach  rolled  over.  Luckily,  no 
one  died  in  this  crash,  but  29  people  of  the  30  people  on  board  were  injured,  three 
of  them  critically.  This  was  the  second  motorcoach  crash  involving  casino  workers 
between Las Vegas and Primm. Previously, a crash injured at least 25 people before 
the  motorcoach  burst  into  flames  and  was  destroyed  on  January  17,  2008.  Once 
again,  it  appears  that  there  may  have  been  a  problem  of  tire  tread  separation  that 
could have triggered the rollover crash. 

These cases, even without the benefit of a thorough crash investigation, point out 
two  serious  safety  problems.  First,  in  the  Sherman,  Texas  crash,  the  illegal  oper-
ation  of  the  company  is  an  extremely  serious  issue,  especially  in  light  of  the  com-
pany  history  of  safety  problems.  Unfortunately,  FMCSA  currently  has  authority 
only to impose fines for such conduct. Criminal penalties are not available for such 
illegal operation but are clearly appropriate where the company owners and officers 
neglect safety and take such intentional actions in defiance of legal orders. 

Second,  although  there  are  many  safety  issues  and  factors  in  these  crashes  that 
will  be  investigated,  it  appears  that  tire  tread  separation  may  have  been  a  major 
contributing  factor  to  both  the  Angel  Tours  and  Primm,  Nevada,  crashes.  Although 
retreaded  tires  are  allowed  by  FMCSA  on  the  other,  non-steering  axles  of 
motorcoaches,  and  on  tractor-trailer  rigs  and  straight  (single-unit)  trucks  operated 
in  interstate  commerce,  there  are  no  Federal  standards  administered  by  NHTSA 
specifying  the  quality  and  safety  performance  of  retreaded  tires  on  commercial 
motor  vehicles.  At  the  present  time,  there  are  only  voluntary  industry  standards. 
Advocates asked the agency more than a decade ago to adopt such standards to en-
sure that retreated, recapped, and regrooved commercial motor vehicle tires met the 
same safety performance requirements as new tires. However, NHTSA has failed to 
put  forward  any  proposal  to  adopt  a  performance  standard  for  retreaded  tires  on 
motorcoaches and other commercial vehicles. 
• Bluffton University Motorcoach Crash 

On  March  2,  2007,  a  motorcoach  hired  to  transport  the  Bluffton  University  base-
ball  team  from  Ohio  to  Georgia  vaulted  a  bridge  parapet  after  taking  a  left  exit 
ramp  that  led  to  a  perpendicular  entrance  to  an  overpass  above  I–75  in  Atlanta, 
Georgia.  The  vehicle  struck  the  bridge  parapet  at  right  angles  and  plunged  to  the 
roadway  below  the  ramp.  Of  the  35  passengers  and  a  driver  on  board,  seven  were 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

44 

killed  and  several  others,  including  the  coach  of  the  school’s  baseball  team,  were 
transported  to  the  hospital  with  severe  injuries.  Twelve  of  the  motorcoach’s  occu-
pants were ejected, four through the windshield or left front side windows even be-
fore  the  motorcoach  left  the  roadway,  and  six  passengers  were  ejected  through  the 
left  side  windows  when  the  vehicle  slammed  into  I–75,  the  impact  that  stopped  its 
fall. 

None  of  the  occupants  on-board  had  three-point  safety  belts  available  to  restrain 
them. Of the 59 seats on board, only the driver’s seat, the ‘‘jump seat,’’ and the first 
row  of  two  passenger  seats  immediately  behind  the  driver  had  two-point  lap  belts. 
The driver and his wife, both of whom had fastened their lap belts, died. 

The  company  that  operated  the  over-the-road  bus,  Executive  Coach,  received  a 
Satisfactory  safety  rating  from  FMCSA  on  April  4,  2007,  only  a  month  following 
crash.  However,  NTSB’s  findings  and  recommendations  produced  by  its  investiga-
tion  listed  several  major  deficiencies  in  motorcoach  operating  safety.5 The  vehicle 
issues  identified  by  NTSB  included  the  lack  of  interior  occupant  impact  protection; 
the  ease  with  which  unrestrained  passengers  were  ejected  through  large  side  win-
dows; and FMCSA’s inadequate motor carrier driver oversight. The driver issues in-
cluded  the  fact  that  the  motorcoach  driver’s  medical  certification  had  expired,  the 
driver’s  logbook  clearly  had  been  falsified,  and  that  the  driver  had  medical  condi-
tions  and  had  taken  medications  that  may  have  impaired  his  ability  to  drive.  Also, 
the  company  that  operated  the  motorcoach  had  no  formal  driver  training  program, 
no written policies on driver procedures such as an emergency response protocol for 
evacuation  and  other  passenger  safety  needs,  and  the  company’s  alcohol  and  drug 
testing program did not comply with Federal requirements.6 

It  should  be  pointed  out  that  motorcoaches  in  foreign  countries  equip  their  vehi-
cles with safety protection features not provided for passengers in the United States. 
For  example,  the  motorcoach  that  was  involved  in  the  Atlanta,  Georgia,  crash  only 
had a few lap belts in the front seating positions and was not equipped with three- 
point  lap/shoulder  belts.  The  same  motorcoach  built  in  Australia  comes  equipped 
with three-point lap/shoulder seat belts at every seating position and with seats and 
their floor anchors tested for maximum crash resistance. 
• Hurricane Rita Nursing Home Motorcoach Crash 

On September 23, 2005, a motorcoach operated by Global Limo, Inc., carrying as-
sisted living and nursing home residents fleeing the imminent landfall of Hurricane 
Rita  caught  fire  and  exploded,  initially  killing  24  of  the  44  people  on  board  who 
were  residents  and  employees  of  a  Dallas-area  home  for  seniors.  Most  of  the  resi-
dents  of  the  senior  living  facility  had  moderate  to  severe  disabilities  and  were  not 
able  to  evacuate  the  motorcoach  during  the  fire  without  assistance.  Evacuation  in-
volved  concerted  efforts  by  the  nursing  staff,  rescue  personnel,  and  bystanders  who 
were able to help the residents exit the motorcoach. 

NTSB  found  that  the  motorcoach  was  operated  in  an  unsafe  manner  and  that 
FMCSA  oversight  of  motorcoach  safety  was  lax.  The  major  safety  issues  identified 
through the NTSB investigation included poor fire reporting information and incon-
sistent  data  in  Federal  crash  data  bases;  FMCSA’s  ineffective  compliance  review 
program; lack of adequate emergency exits from motorcoaches; lack of fire resistant 
motorcoach  materials  and  designs;  inadequate  manufacturer  maintenance  informa-
tion  on  wheel  bearing  components;  transportation  of  highly  flammable,  pressurized 
aluminum  cylinders;  and  poor  safety  procedures  for  the  emergency  transportation 
of persons with special needs.7 

While the driver of the Global Tours motorcoach possessed a Mexican commercial 
driver’s  license,  the  Licencia  Federal  de  Conductor  (LFC),  he  had  not  obtained  a 
Texas-issued commercial driver’s license (CDL), even though the driver had been in 
the  U.S.  since  at  least  February  2005.  Drivers  are  required  to  apply  for  a  Texas- 
issued CDL within 30 days after taking up residence in Texas. This means that the 
driver had no legal CDL or federally-required commercial driver medical certificate, 
nor  had  he  complied  with  requirements  to  prove  his  identity,  provide  a  social  secu-
rity  number,  supply  documentation  of  vehicle  registration  and  liability  insurance, 
and  surrender  his  LFC.  These  are  legal  requirements  for  drivers  that  the  company 
should  have  ensured  were  being  met.  Also,  the  driver  was  unable  to  communicate 
in English, relying on an interpreter for his post-crash interviews, another violation 
of  FMCSA  regulations.8 According  to  NTSB,  the  driver  may  have  been  fatigued  at 
the  time  of  the  motorcoach  fire.  The  driver  had  violated  multiple  requirements  of 
the  FMCSA  hours  of  service  regulations  (HOS),  including  having  failed  to  take  a 
minimum of 8 consecutive hours off-duty before working or driving, and driving for 
over  15  consecutive  hours  starting  at  3  PM  on  September  22,  2005,  until  the  fire 
began at about 6 AM on September 23, 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

45 

FMCSA conducted a compliance review (CR), the agency’s method of assessing the 
safety  of  a  motor  carrier,9 of  the  company  on  February  6,  2004,  and  found  seven 
violations  of  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Regulations  (FMCSR).  Nevertheless, 
FMCSA  issued  a  Satisfactory  safety  rating  to  the  motor  carrier  just  6  days  later, 
even though the company had multiple Out of Service (OOS) violations prior to the 
CR  and  more  driver  OOS  violations  prior  to  the  September  23,  2005,  motorcoach 
fire.  An  Unsatisfactory  safety  rating  cannot  be  triggered  unless  violations  have  oc-
curred in both driver and vehicle categories. 

According to NTSB in its report, the motorcoach itself was evidently inadequately 
maintained. Inadequate lubrication of an axle on the vehicle led to ‘‘frozen’’ bearings 
that generated extreme heat that, in turn, triggered the fire. Fires on motorcoaches 
are  started  from  various  sources,  such  as  engine  compartments,  electrical  wiring 
and  batteries,  auxiliary  heaters,  and  underinflated  or  failed  tires.  Motorcoach  fires 
consume many of the materials from which the vehicles are manufactured, and are 
evidently a chronic problem, as admitted by the former Administrator of FMCSA be-
fore  the  House  Committee  on  Transportation  and  Infrastructure,  Subcommittee  on 
Highways, Transit, and Pipelines on March 2, 2006.10 In fact, motorcoach floors are 
usually made of sheets of plywood. 
Comprehensive  Motorcoach  Safety  Improvements  Are  Stalled  at  DOT 

Despite Urgency 

From  this  brief  review  of  just  a  few  motorcoach  crashes  and  fires,  it  should  be 
evident that motorcoach safety has not been a primary focus of Federal agencies and 
is  in  dire  need  of  regulatory  action  to  improve  safety.  The  NTSB  has  been  issuing 
safety  recommendations  to  the  motorcoach  industry  and  the  U.S.  Department  of 
Transportation  (DOT)  and  its  agencies  for  decades,  but  those  recommendations  es-
sentially  have  been  ignored.  Unfortunately,  very  few  NTSB  recommendations  have 
been  implemented  by  NHTSA  and  FMCSA,  and  certainly  not  in  the  complete  and 
effective manner that NTSB recommended. 

In  the  Bluffton  University  Motorcoach  Crash  Report,  NTSB  reviewed  the  40-year 
history of its frustrated attempts at achieving agency action in accordance with mul-
tiple recommendations for motorcoach drivers, passengers, vehicles, and operations. 
NTSB  asserted  that  ‘‘motorcoaches  transport  a  substantial  number  of  people  trav-
eling in a single vehicle with a high exposure to crash risk,’’ with other special safe-
ty requirements, and that ‘‘[t]hese factors demand that motorcoaches meet the high-
est  level  of  safety.’’ 11 NTSB  also  stated  in  its  findings  and  recommendations  that 
NHTSA had unacceptably delayed defining and acting on regulations for motorcoach 
occupant  protection  safety  performance  standards,  emphasizing  that  the  traveling 
public  in  motorcoach  trips  were  inadequately  protected  during  collisions,  especially 
in rollovers.12 

For  example,  NTSB  has  repeatedly  asked  NHTSA  to  require  stronger  seats  and 
to  mandate  seat  belt  assemblies  at  every  designated  seating  position 
in 
motorcoaches. But NTSB finally had to close out these recommendations with nota-
tions  of  ‘‘Unsatisfactory  Action’’  because  NHTSA  continually  deflected  NTSB’s  rec-
ommendations on requiring stronger seats and mandating seat belts.13 

But  NTSB  did  not  give  up,  despite  NHTSA’s  endless  inaction.  Over  and  over  it 
beat  the  drum  in  support  of  occupant  restraints  with  successive  reports  on  horrific 
motorcoach  crashes  where  restraints  would  have  saved  many  lives.  For  decades 
NHTSA deflected every one of those recommendations. There are many other exam-
ples  of  critical  motorcoach  safety  recommendations  sent  to  NHTSA  since  1968  that 
were  ignored—and  the  result  was  more  deaths  and  injuries  that  could  have  been 
prevented. 

Similarly, the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA), and its successor agency, 
FMCSA,  have  also  rebuffed  many  NTSB  recommendations  over  the  years,  despite 
evidence  showing  the  need  for  major  safety  countermeasures  for  existing  passenger 
motor carriers and for improvements in FMCSA enforcement. NTSB was frustrated 
with  FMCSA’s  enforcement  scheme  for  motor  carrier  safety  violations  because  the 
agency would provide Satisfactory ratings to motor carriers even if they had several 
serious driver or vehicle violations. FMCSA’s policy is that there must be violations 
in both areas to trigger an Unsatisfactory rating that could result in a company or-
dered  to  stop  operations.  But  NTSB  recommended  that  serious  violations  in  either 
area  should  be  enough  to  trigger  imposition  of  an  Unsatisfactory  rating.  (Note  that 
Angel  Tours  before  the  Sherman,  Texas  crash  had  a  Satisfactory  rating  because 
FMCSA had recorded several driver violations, but no vehicle violations for the com-
pany.  Accordingly,  FMCSA  had  no  basis  for  threatening  the  company  with  an  Un-
satisfactory safety rating.) 

FMCSA has repeatedly avoided acting on this recommendation, even after several 
U.S. DOT Office of the Inspector General and Government Accountability Office re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

46 

ports  demonstrating  multiple  weaknesses  in  FMCSA  enforcement  regimes  and  ac-
tions.14 

Since  FMCSA  itself  has  admitted  that  its  current  safety  rating  system,  and  the 
safety  scoring  system  used  to  support  it,  is  inadequate,  the  question  arises  of  what 
the agency intends to do in the interim to ensure that dangerous motor carriers are 
detected  and  stopped  from  operating  before  more  lives  are  lost.  The  agency  cannot 
wait  until  its  new  safety  rating  system,  Comprehensive  Safety  Analysis  2010,  is 
complete  and  ready  for  action.  In  the  meantime,  unsafe  motorcoach  companies  will 
receive  ratings  that  do  not  represent  a  valid  safety  profile,  and  the  public  will  be 
left  in  the  dark  on  how  to  choose  a  safety  motorcoach  business  for  personal  trans-
portation. 
Federal Legislation Is Needed to Direct DOT to Implement Comprehensive 
Motorcoach  Safety  Reforms  and  Comply  with  NTSB  Recommendations 
It is time for Congress to step in and ensure that the safety improvements NTSB 
has  recommended  for  decades  are  adopted  by  the  agencies  with  the  authority  to 
issue motor vehicle and motor carrier regulations. Experience has shown that when 
Congress  requires  safety  action,  the  agencies  find  the  ways  and  means  to  meet  the 
challenge.  Several  years  ago,  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee  took  a  leadership 
role  in  addressing  deadly  rollover  crashes  and  other  major  motor  vehicle  safety 
issues.  In  the  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act  of 
2005—A  Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU),15 Congress  required  NHTSA  to  issue 
regulations on safety problems that had languished for years without agency action. 
NHTSA is in the process of complying with those vehicle safety rulemaking require-
ments.  More  recently,  the  Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  Transportation  Safety  Act  of 
2007,16 requires  NHTSA  to  issue  rules  on  safety  problems  to  protect  children  from 
dangers in vehicles that the agency had previously refused to address. 

There is absolutely no doubt that when Congress sets the safety agenda, the Fed-
eral  agencies  respond  quickly  by  developing  action  plans,  conducting  tests,  and 
issuing  rules  that  improve  transportation  safety.  This  is  the  model  that  Congress 
should follow for motorcoach safety. 

The right vehicle to accomplish this approach has already been introduced in Con-
gress—The  Motorcoach  Enhanced  Safety  Act  of  2007.  This  pending  legislation,  S. 
2326,  introduced  on  November  8,  2007,  by  Senators  Sherrod  Brown  (D–OH)  and 
Kay Bailey Hutchinson (R–TX), and its companion bill in the House, H.R. 6747, in-
troduced by Representative John Lewis (D–GA) and co-sponsored by Representative 
Ted  Poe  (R–TX),  sets  a  reasonable  and  achievable  regulatory  safety  agenda  for  re-
forming  motorcoach  safety.  The  Motorcoach  Enhanced  Safety  Act  deals  with  each 
of the major aspects of motorcoach safety: vehicle design and performance, operating 
safety and inspection, and driver safety, including training and medical certification. 
The  bills  respond  to  virtually  every  major  safety  recommendation  made  over  the 
past 40 years by the NTSB. The Motorcoach Enhanced Safety Act addresses almost 
all NTSB safety issues in a comprehensive manner, including crash protection of oc-
cupants,  such  as  seat  belts  and  windows  that  prevent  occupant  ejection  in  crashes; 
protection  against  roof  crush,  especially  catastrophic  single-vehicle  events  involving 
rollovers;  improved  fire  protection  and  the  need  to  use  materials  and  technology  to 
assist in fire resistance and suppression; better methods to facilitate passenger evac-
uation in emergency conditions; crash avoidance technology, such as adaptive cruise 
control  and  electronic  stability  control  to  prevent  crashes;  vehicle  maintenance  and 
inspection  needs;  and  operator  qualifications,  including  driver  skills  and  medical 
certification. Finally, the Motorcoach Enhanced Safety Act sets reasonable timelines 
for DOT, NHTSA and FMCSA to review the safety problems, complete testing, con-
duct rulemaking and issue safety rules to implement those recommendations so that 
lives can be saved and injuries prevented as soon as possible. 

S.  2326,  the  Senate-introduced  version  of  the  Motorcoach  Enhanced  Safety  Act, 
is supported by parents and relatives of victims and survivors of motorcoach crash-
es.  Many  family  members  who  lost  relatives  in  motorcoach  crashes  have  traveled 
to  Capitol  Hill  for  today’s  hearing.  S.  2326  is  also  strongly  supported  by  Advocates 
and safety groups, including Public Citizen, Center for Auto Safety, Citizens for Re-
liable and Safe Highways (CRASH), Consumers for Auto Reliability and Safety, the 
Trauma  Foundation,  the  Consumer  Federation  of  America  and  the  Enhanced  Pro-
tective Glass Automotive Association. 

The DOT agencies with responsibility for motorcoach safety, NHTSA and FMCSA, 
have failed to fulfill their safety missions. Although NHTSA has not moved quickly 
to adopt NTSB recommendations for crash protection and crash avoidance, the agen-
cy  has  in  recent  years  developed  a  motorcoach  safety  research  and  testing  program 
and has begun to examine many of the safety issues raised by NTSB and safety or-
ganizations.  However,  without  a  Congressional  directive  to  actually  issue  safety 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

47 

standards,  there  is  no  assurance  that  the  agency  will  address  all  the  safety  issues 
in the NTSB recommendations, much less establish stringent safety standards that 
adopt those recommendations in a timely manner. 

FMCSA,  in  contrast,  has  been  entirely  delinquent  in  its  role  as  the  Federal  ad-
ministrator  of  safe  motorcoach  operations.  As  with  its  duties  to  improve  general 
motor  carrier  safety,  FMCSA  has  failed  to  issue  or  properly  enforce  even  the  most 
basic  safety  requirements  and  has  shown  no  inclination  to  be  proactive  regarding 
the  adoption  of  safety  standards  and  regulations  to  improve  public  safety  on 
motorcoaches.  FMCSA  only  acts  when  compelled  by  explicit  Congressional  legisla-
tion,  and  even  then  it  fails  frequently  to  comply  with  either  the  clear  letter  of  the 
law or to meet legislated deadlines. The safety community has had to repeatedly sue 
FMCSA to compel the agency to comply with Congressional mandates and issue ef-
fective regulations to improve key areas of motor carrier safety. 

While  our  testimony  cannot  survey  all  the  safety  provisions  addressed  in  these 
comprehensive  bills,  the  remainder  of  this  testimony  highlights  the  major  gaps  in 
motorcoach safety and how key provisions of S. 2326 and H.R. 6747 will save lives, 
prevent injuries, and reduce other motorcoach crash losses. 
Motorcoach  Occupant  Protection  is  Inadequate  and  Contributes  to  Deaths 

and Injuries 

There  are  serious  deficiencies  with  the  crashworthiness  features  of  motorcoaches 
for protecting occupants against severe and fatal injuries. In the 2007 Bluffton Uni-
versity  motorcoach  crash  in  Atlanta,  GA,  and  in  many  others  investigated  in  the 
last  several  years  by  NTSB,  occupants  were  ejected  through  side  windows  and  the 
windshield.  Serious  injuries  and  deaths  in  motorcoach  rollover  crashes  are  highly 
predictable  when  these  vehicles  do  not  have  three-point  seat  belts  and  fail  to  have 
the kind of windows that could withstand a crash and prevent ejection. These severe 
occupant  safety  defects  have  been  documented  time  and  again  in  NTSB  investiga-
tions and reports. 

While  NHTSA  has  established  22  separate  standards  for  vehicle  crashworthiness 
as part of the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards (FMVSS) administered by the 
agency,  nearly  all  of  these  are  for  light  motor  vehicles  (mainly  passenger  vehicles 
that weigh less than 10,000 pounds). Most of these standards exempt motorcoaches 
with  gross  vehicle  weight  ratings  of  over  10,000  pounds.  For  example,  no  NHTSA 
safety  regulation  requires  that  motorcoaches  in  the  U.S.  have  any  occupant  protec-
tion  systems  of  any  kind,  including  seat  belts,  seat  mounting  retention,  seatback 
strength,  whiplash  protection,  or  upper  and  lower  vehicle  interior  occupant  impact 
protection.  Although  motorcoaches  are  required  to  comply  with  FMVSS  No.  217 
specifying motorcoach window retention and release for evacuation, and FMVSS No. 
302  governing  the  flammability  of  interior  materials,  motorcoaches  do  not  have  to 
comply  with  many  safety  standards  required  for  other  types  of  buses,  including 
school buses, and for passenger vehicles. As a result, motorcoach passengers are not 
afforded  the  same  basic  safety  features  and  types  of  protection  required  for  pas-
sengers in other vehicles. 

Among  the  important  safety  shortcomings  that  need  to  be  improved  in 

motorcoaches, the Motorcoach Enhancement Safety Act would require: 

• Seat  belts:  Three-point  lap/shoulder  belt  systems  have  been  required  for  pas-
senger  vehicles  for  decades  and  are  required  on  smaller  buses  and  on  big  pas-
senger  vans,  yet  are  not  required  in  motorcoaches.  Lap/shoulder  belt  restraint 
systems,  not  just  lap  belts,  are  essential  for  keeping  motorcoach  occupants  in 
their  seats  to  avoid  injuries  sustained  within  the  compartment  in  all  crash 
modes. 
• Rollover:  Motorcoaches  are  very  top  heavy,  with  high  centers  of  gravity  espe-
cially  when  fully  laden  with  passengers,  so  their  rollover  propensity  is  much 
higher  than  for  passenger  vehicles.  Crash  avoidance  technology  such  as  elec-
tronic  stability  control  and  adaptive  cruise  control  can  also  help  to  keep 
motorcoaches  out  of  crashes  in  the  first  place.  But  when  rollovers  still  occur, 
a strong roof crush resistance safety standard needs to be adopted to ensure the 
structural  integrity  of  the  roof  in  a  rollover  crash  that  preserves  occupant  sur-
vival space and prevents infliction of severe occupant trauma. 
• Ejection:  A  major  safety  issue  in  motorcoaches  is  preventing  occupants  from 
being ejected during a crash, especially in a rollover. According to NHTSA, more 
than  half  of  the  deaths  in  motorcoach  crashes  are  the  result  of  occupant  ejec-
tions. More than one-third of all deaths of motorcoach occupants in motorcoach 
crashes occur in rollovers, and occupant ejection is the reason for 70 percent of 
occupant  deaths  in  motorcoach  rollovers.17 Advanced  window  glazing  that  can 
survive  crash  impacts  will  prevent  occupant  ejection  and  save  lives.  There  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

48 

other  possible  countermeasures,  which,  in  combination  with  three-point  seat 
belts  and  advanced  glazing,  can  further  reduce  the  chances  of  passenger  ejec-
tion. 

The major topics of occupant restraint within the motorcoach passenger compart-
ment and the additional prevention of ejection in catastrophic events have been en-
gaged  by  both  the  European  Economic  Community 18 and  Australia.19 Three-point 
belts  restraining  motorcoach  occupants  became  mandatory  in  Australia  14  years 
ago, the European Union has just mandated that passengers must wear safety belts 
in  motorcoaches  beginning  in  May  2008,  and  anyone  traveling  by  motorcoach  in 
Japan  must  use  their  safety  belts  beginning  June  2008.  It  is  obvious  that  keeping 
motorcoach occupants safely in their seats is desperately needed so that passengers 
do  not  impact  each  other,  strike  unforgiving  interior  surfaces  and  equipment  in 
motorcoaches,  and  are  prevented  from  being  thrown  from  the  vehicle.  Three-point 
lap/shoulder  belt  restraints  initially  are  the  best  way  to  accomplish  keeping  each 
passenger in their seat. The rest of the world is moving on to higher levels of crash 
protection for motorcoach occupants while U.S. safety regulators fail to take action. 
The Motorcoach Enhanced Safety Act bill contains the provisions necessary to di-
rect  NHTSA  to  dramatically  improve  motorcoach  crashworthiness  in  all  crash 
modes, including rollovers, as well as in side and frontal impacts. Without congres-
sional  directives  requiring  the  issuance  of  new  and  improved  safety  standards  by 
specific  dates,  NHTSA  will  intermittently  study  the  safety  issues  over  many  years 
without addressing the major motorcoach crashworthiness and crash avoidance safe-
ty issues that NTSB long ago recommended should be adopted. NHTSA has proven 
over and over that it will delay major safety standards that can save lives and pre-
vent  injuries,  not  only  for  years,  but  also  for  decades,  unless  Congress  gives  it  a 
mandate in no uncertain terms and firm deadlines for action. 
Effective  Motorcoach  Operation  Safety  Oversight  and  Enforcement  is 

Lacking 

According  to  figures  from  FMCSA,20 there  are  about  3,700  U.S.  passenger-car-
rying companies conducting interstate operations employing 100,000 drivers to oper-
ate about 34,000 to perhaps 40,000 motorcoaches.21 Many of the Federal motor car-
rier  safety  regulations,  FMCSRs,  that  govern  commercial  motor  carriers,  vehicles, 
and  drivers  generally,  also  apply  to  motor  carriers  of  passengers.  Despite  the  rel-
ative  small  numbers  of  motorcoaches  and  motorcoach  companies,  FMCSA  is  failing 
in its stewardship responsibilities for motorcoaches as badly as it is for large trucks. 
Almost  all  of  NTSB’s  40  years  of  investigated  motorcoach  crashes  have  resulted 
in  findings  that  encompass  vehicle  performance,  maintenance,  inspection,  driver 
qualifications,  and  motor  carrier  company  safety  management.  The  examples  of  re-
cent  motorcoach  crashes  provided  earlier  in  this  testimony  confirm  that  multiple 
safety  problems  afflict  all  aspects  of  interstate  motorcoach  operations.  Although  se-
vere  motorcoach  crashes  often  appear  at  first  glance  to  be  the  result  of  an  isolated 
problem,  in  fact  digging  deeper  almost  always  reveals  multiple  problems  involving 
vehicle  maintenance,  driver  qualifications  and  performance  capabilities,  and  com-
pany  safety  management.  NTSB  has  confirmed  this  multifactorial  nature  of  motor-
coach crashes to be true in numerous crash investigations. 

FMCSA  has  not  only  failed  to  adopt  NTSB’s  safety  recommendations,  the  agency 
has also failed to issue other safety regulations needed to improve motor carrier and 
motorcoach safety. As a result, major areas of driver training and certification, mo-
torcoach safety inspection, data quality and systems for identifying potentially dan-
gerous  motorcoach  companies,  and  agency  oversight  and  enforcement  of  the 
FMCSRs  are  undeniably  inadequate  and  have  been  documented  repeatedly  by  the 
U.S.  DOT’s  OIG  and  by  GAO.  Key  rulemaking  actions  to  address  these  and  other 
issues languish year after year without action. The Motorcoach Enhanced Safety Act 
directs  FMCSA  to  address  major  deficiencies  in  its  regulations  governing  driver 
qualifications, vehicle safety condition, and motor carrier safety management. 

Motor  carrier  safety  issues  that  directly  impact  motorcoach  operating  safety  in-

clude: 
• Weak Federal and State Requirements for Motorcoach Driver Training 

Among the many areas in the Motorcoach Enhanced Safety Act aimed at improv-
ing motorcoach operational safety are provisions intended to substantially strength-
en  motorcoach  driver  CDL  testing  and  training  requirements.  Motorcoach  drivers 
are required to have CDLs with a passenger endorsement added on the basis of an-
other knowledge and skills test. However, there are no substantive training require-
ments  in  Federal  law  and  regulation  for  entry-level  commercial  motor  vehicle  driv-
ers, and there are none for the additional endorsements for operating hazardous ma-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

49 

terials vehicles, school buses, or motorcoaches. In short, there is no specific Federal 
training  requirement  for  an  interstate  commercial  driver  transporting  passengers. 
Federal  safety  agencies  spent  over  20  years  studying  commercial  driver  training 
issues, producing a Model Curriculum for training both drivers and instructors and 
conducting  rulemaking  pursuant  to  Section  4007(a)  of  the  Intermodal  Surface 
Transportation  Efficiency  Act  of  1991  (ISTEA).22 Despite  this  long  background  of 
deep involvement in the needs of commercial driver training, FMCSA did an abrupt 
about-face  in  May  2004  and  issued  a  final  rule  that  avoided  adopting  any  basic 
knowledge  and  skills  training  requirements,  including  behind-the-wheel  driving  in-
struction, for entry-level commercial drivers.23 Instead, the agency published a regu-
lation  that  only  required  drivers  to  gain  familiarity  with  four  ancillary  areas  of 
CMV  operation—driver  qualifications,  hours  of  service  requirements,  driver  health 
issues, and whistleblower protection. Not only did FMCSA not require driver train-
ing  as  a  prerequisite  for  a  candidate  seeking  an  entry-level  CDL,  the  agency  rule 
excused almost all novice drivers from even being considered entry-level commercial 
drivers. This rulemaking outcome was a complete reversal from earlier agency state-
ments  that  the  majority  of  new  commercial  drivers  were  not  receiving  adequate 
training. 

Since the FMCSA action reversed its own previous findings that basic knowledge 
and skills entry-level driver training was inadequate and should be required, Advo-
cates  filed  suit  against  the  agency.  In  a  unanimous  decision,  the  U.S.  Court  of  Ap-
peals for the District of Columbia found that the final rule was arbitrary, capricious, 
an  abuse  of  agency  discretion,  and  remanded  the  rule  to  FMCSA.  Advocates  for 
Highway  and  Auto  Safety  v.  FMCSA 24 (Entry-Level  Driver  Training  Decision).  In 
its  opinion,  the  appellate  court  stated  that  the  rule  ‘‘focuses  on  areas  unrelated  to 
the  practical  demands  of  operating  a  commercial  motor  vehicle’’  and  that  the  rule 
was ‘‘so at odds with the record assembled by DOT that the action cannot stand.’’ 25 
Incredibly,  when  FMCSA  reopened  rulemaking  on  commercial  driver  training  re-
quirements  in  response  to  the  adverse  court  decision  on  its  final  rule,  the  agency 
did  not  propose  a  training  curriculum  specifically  designed  for  motorcoach  opera-
tors.26 The curricula content of the proposed rule is entirely oriented toward the op-
eration  of  trucks  of  different  weights  and  configurations.  The  proposed  rule  has  no 
specific requirements anywhere just for motorcoach operators. 

Further,  in  the  December  2007  FMCSA  proposed  rule,  the  minimum  number  of 
hours  of  training  time  for  entry-level  student  drivers  of  motorcoaches  plummets  to 
120 hours for students wanting to operate motorcoaches and other large commercial 
motor vehicles with ‘‘Class B’’ CDLs.27 There is no explanation anywhere in the pre-
amble of the proposed rule or in the appendix of why this specific number of instruc-
tional hours was selected, nor why the amount of training was severely abbreviated 
from the 320 or more hours recommended in the 1985 Model Curriculum. 

Advocates  regards  FMCSA’s  entry-level  driver  training  requirements  for  motor-
coach  drivers  to  be  unspecific  to  the  special  tasks  that  motorcoach  operation  im-
poses,  as  perfunctory  in  its  requirements  and  its  safety  impact,  and  as  falling  well 
short  of  what  is  needed.  The  proposed  rule  does  not  fulfill  either  the  Court  of  Ap-
peals’ expectations or the agency’s legislated responsibilities. Substantively, the pro-
posed curriculum fails to ensure that motorcoach operators will be properly trained 
in the multiple, significant safety responsibilities the job demands. To add insult to 
injury, the proposed rule also would impose a 3-year moratorium on requiring com-
pliance with training requirements for new CDL applicants.28 This action would ex-
clude  tens  of  thousands  of  new  CDL  applicants  from  badly  needed  knowledge  and 
skills training requirements. 
• Tougher  Enforcement  Needed:  Compliance  Reviews  and  Roadside  Inspections  Do 

Not Remove Dangerous Motorcoach Companies From the Road 

A  central  problem  undermining  agency  effectiveness  in  overseeing  motor  carrier 
safety and reducing FMCSR violations is the annually low numbers and percentage 
of  both  roadside  inspections  and  CRs.  For  example,  the  Bluffton  University  Motor-
coach Crash that took seven lives and inflicted severe injuries involved a motorcoach 
company  that  had  a  Satisfactory  safety  rating  assigned  6  years  earlier,  in  January 
2001.  Similarly,  the  company  that  operated  the  motorcoach  that  crashed  in  Sher-
man,  Texas  last  month  killing  17  people,  was  awarded  a  Satisfactory  safety  rating 
despite  the  fact  that  the  company  had  received  repeated  driver  OOS  orders.  The 
truth is that a Satisfactory safety rating is no assurance of contemporary operating 
safety fitness. 

The  implementing  regulations  for  conducting  CRs  specify  criteria  for  assigning 
one  of  three  safety  rating  categories  to  a  motor  carrier:  Satisfactory,  Conditional, 
Unsatisfactory.29 FMCSA is required by law to issue a safety rating to all motor car-
riers.30 However,  the  agency  basically  decided  long  ago  that  it  would  no  longer  at-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

50 

tempt to fulfill the statutory requirement.31 Even without attempting to assign safe-
ty  ratings  to  all  motor  carriers,  FMCSA  conducts  CRs  on  only  a  tiny  percentage  of 
carriers. Barely 1 percent of motor carriers receive a CR each year, and only a tiny 
part  of  1  percent  of  all  registered  motor  carriers  are  given  Unsatisfactory  ratings. 
On  its  face,  it  is  improbable  that  assigning  Unsatisfactory  safety  ratings  to  so  few 
registered interstate carriers has any deterrent effect. 

Other  organizations  and  agencies  have  for  many  years  called  for  improvements 
to  the  safety  rating  process.  For  example,  NTSB’s  current  list  of  the  Most  Wanted 
Transportation Safety Improvements—Federal Issues 32 argues that the entire safe-
ty  fitness  regime  operates  too  leniently  with  criteria  that  do  not  result  frequently 
enough  in  motor  carriers  being  shut  down  or  drivers  having  their  licenses  revoked. 
In  testimony  delivered  before  the  House  Committee  on  Transportation  and  Infra-
structure,  Subcommittee  on  Highways,  Transit,  and  Pipelines,  March  20,  2007,  the 
FMCSA Administrator boasted that FMCSA had dramatically increased the number 
of  motorcoach  CRs  over  the  preceding  2  years.  However,  based  on  Advocates’  sam-
pling  of  states  on  FMCSA’s  website,  many  of  the  motorcoach  companies  receiving 
recent CRs are provided Satisfactory safety ratings even though they lack any safety 
rating  scores  in  one  or  more  of  the  four  Safety  Evaluation  Areas  (SEAs)  that  form 
part of the arcane system the agency uses to identify high safety risk motor carriers. 
In  fact,  some  motorcoach  companies  in  the  past  have  been  awarded  Satisfactory 
safety ratings with no safety scores for any of the four categories. In addition, high 
percentages of unrated motorcoaches are still listed for many states on FMCSA mo-
torcoach website.33 
• Consumers Denied Essential, Lifesaving Information on Motorcoach Safety 

FMCSA’s  passenger  motor  carrier  website  claims  that  it  provides  information  on 
motorcoach  companies  so  that  consumers  can  be  confident  that  they  are  choosing 
safe  motorcoach  companies.  How  does  that  claim  hold  up  under  close  examination? 
A  review  of  the  current  status  of  safety  ratings  of  motorcoaches  registered  in 
Texas  is  not  very  encouraging.  There  are  197  motorcoach  companies  with  FMCSA 
interstate  operating  numbers.  Of  those,  117,  or  59  percent,  have  Satisfactory  rat-
ings. All the rest of the companies have either Conditional ratings, are Unrated (64), 
or,  in  one  instance,  one  company  has  an  Unsatisfactory  rating  (Angel  Tours/Iguala 
Busmex).  But  one  company’s  Satisfactory  rating  was  awarded  back  in  1988—20 
years ago. Furthermore, of the 117 Satisfactory companies, only 17, or 14.5 percent, 
have  safety  scores  in  all  four  major  areas  of  safety.  And  it  should  be  stressed  that 
a Satisfactory rating for FMCSA only means that a motorcoach company minimally 
complies  with  the  Federal  safety  standards  for  motor  carriers—it  is  not  a  mark  of 
superior safety. 

Similarly,  consumers  in  New  Jersey  have  little  to  choose  from  in  selecting  a  mo-
torcoach company with the best safety credentials for long-distance trips. There are 
167  companies  headquartered  in  New  Jersey  that  are  registered  with  FMCSA  for 
interstate  transportation  of  passengers.  However,  57  of  these  businesses—34  per-
cent or fully one-third—have no safety ratings at all. Eight companies are operating 
with Conditional safety ratings. No companies have Unsatisfactory ratings. 

One  hundred  and  one  (101)  New  Jersey  motorcoach  companies  carry  Satisfactory 
safety  ratings.  But  one  company  received  its  Satisfactory  rating  back  in  1988,  two 
got  theirs  in  1991,  and  there  are  several  others  with  Satisfactory  ratings  assigned 
during  the  1990s.  It  is  important  to  recognize  that  a  safety  rating,  even  a  Satisfac-
tory rating, is just a snapshot of a company. A company’s safety practices can quick-
ly  deteriorate  so  that  a  Satisfactory  rating  can  become  meaningless  in  a  short 
amount of time. Many companies can come into compliance to achieve a Satisfactory 
safety rating only to lapse in its compliance with major motorcoach safety regulatory 
areas such as driver qualifications and certification, vehicle safety maintenance, and 
company safety management quality. 

Of  the  101  New  Jersey  motorcoach  companies  with  Satisfactory  ratings,  only  11 
have scores in all four major safety scoring areas (driver, vehicle, crash, safety man-
agement).  Therefore,  if  a  consumer  in  New  Jersey  wants  to  apply  a  high  standard 
for  choosing  a  company,  it  would  be  best  to  use  a  motorcoach  company  that  has  a 
Satisfactory  rating  in  all  four  safety  scoring  categories.  But  only  11  companies—or 
a little over 6.5 percent—of motorcoach operations in the state qualify. Based on Ad-
vocates’ sampling of states on FMCSA’s website, this is the case with most states— 
the listing of active motorcoach companies provided by FMCSA for each state, if rig-
orously evaluated by a consumer, is dramatically reduced oftentimes to only a hand-
ful of companies to choose from. 

When  motorcoaches  are  stopped  and  inspected,  the  results  are  equally  discour-
aging.  For  2005,  12  percent  of  the  motor  carriers  of  passengers  were  placed  OOS, 
a figure that has not changed over several years. Similarly, driver safety is a serious 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

51 

concern—driver  inspections  in  2005  placed  21  percent  of  U.S.  drivers  of  interstate 
motor  carriers  of  passengers  OOS  for  failing  to  retain  the  driver’s  previous  7  day 
logbook  showing  the  driver’s  record  of  duty.  In  the  same  vein,  20  percent  of  those 
drivers—one in five—were found to have no record of duty status logbook. These ag-
gregate figures are frightening, especially for patrons of interstate motorcoach com-
panies, and they show essentially no progress in substantially improving motorcoach 
safety on a nationwide basis. 
• Unknown  Status  and  Effectiveness  of  State  Annual  Bus  Safety  Inspection 

Programs 

The  Secretary  of  Transportation  is  required  to  prescribe  standards  for  annual,  or 
more  frequent,  inspection  of  commercial  motor  vehicles,  including  motorcoaches,  or 
approve  equally  effective  state  inspection  programs.34 Nine  years  ago  last  month, 
the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) issued a notice on the status of state 
bus  inspection  programs 35 and  subsequently  listed  25  of  50  states  with  approved, 
equivalent periodic inspection programs.36 

It  should  be  stressed  here  that  the  minimum  period  for  the  required  vehicle  in-
spection  is  only  once  a  year.37 Since  it  is  well  known  that  inspection  of  CMVs,  in-
cluding  motorcoaches,  needs  to  be  much  more  intensive  and  frequent  than  for  per-
sonal or light motor vehicles, a once-a-year inspection regime is clearly no guarantee 
of  safe  motorcoaches.  Many  companies  even  in  states  that  have  bus  inspection  pro-
grams  can  come  into  compliance  just  for  an  annual  inspection,  only  to  allow  major 
safety  features  of  their  motorcoaches  to  fall  into  disrepair  or  become  inoperative 
soon  after  passing  the  annual  inspection.  Moreover,  Advocates  could  find  no  infor-
mation  from  FMCSA’s  website  on  the  effectiveness  of  state  motorcoach  inspection 
programs  to  detect  safety  problems  or  how  well  or  for  how  long  state  motorcoach 
inspection  programs  ensure  compliance  with  all  Federal  motor  carrier  safety  re-
quirements. 

Several  provisions  in  the  Motorcoach  Enhanced  Safety  Act  directly  address  the 
issue  of  timely,  accurate  motorcoach  and  bus  safety  inspections,  including  both 
FMCSA and state actions that are necessary, and how FMCSA must administer the 
state  inspection  programs  in  connection  with  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Assistance 
Program (MCSAP). 
Electronic On-Board Recorders Are Long Overdue on Motorcoaches and All 

Motor Carriers 

Electronic  On-Board  Recorders  (EOBRs)  or  Automatic  On-Board  Recording  De-
vices  (AOBRDs)  have  been  increasingly  used  on  large  trucks  and  motorcoaches  for 
a variety of purposes, including monitoring the drivers’ hours of service (HOS) driv-
ing, working, and off-duty time of commercial drivers, and ensuring compliance with 
current  HOS  regulations.  Many  countries  around  the  world  now  require  the  use  of 
EOBRs  to  ensure  that  truck  drivers  comply  with  the  limits  of  each  nation’s  HOS. 
Currently,  all  European  Union  countries,  along  with  Turkey,  Israel,  Japan,  South 
Korea,  Brazil,  Venezuela,  and  Singapore,  require  automated  recording  devices  to 
monitor driver hours of service compliance. 

EOBRs can automatically record the hours that commercial operators drive trucks 
and motorcoaches in interstate commerce. EOBRs can also link with engines, trans-
missions,  and  global  positioning  system  (GPS)  devices  to  record  the  distance  and 
speed  a  commercial  motor  vehicle  has  traveled  and  whether  it  has  used  an  illegal 
route  or  traversed  a  weight-posted  bridge.  Motor  carriers  that  have  voluntarily  in-
stalled  EOBRs  are  still  only  a  small  percentage  of  commercial  motor  vehicles,  but 
motor carriers that use EOBRs praise the advantages they provide in terms of safe-
ty and efficiency since they eliminate the need for paper logbooks. This was stressed 
by  a  motor  carrier  industry  witness  in  last  year’s  hearing  on  EOBRs  conducted  by 
this Subcommittee.38 

Commercial  driver  fatigue  is  a  major  safety  problem  for  both  motorcoach  opera-
tors  and  truck  drivers.  EOBRs  are  especially  crucial  to  raising  the  level  of  motor-
coach  safety  by  ensuring  that  well-rested,  alert  drivers  are  in  charge  of  the  safety 
and  lives  of  up  to  58  passengers  onboard.  EOBRs  can  ensure  that  drivers  do  not 
exceed  maximum  shift  driving  time  and  that  they  take  the  required  off-duty  rest 
time  to  restore  their  performance  at  the  wheel.  Moreover,  EOBRs  on  interstate 
motorcoaches  permit  real-time  monitoring  of  the  routing  and  location  of  a  motor-
coach  so  that,  in  the  event  of  a  serious  event  such  as  a  crash  or  fire,  expeditious 
response  by  emergency  medical  personnel  and  enforcement  authorities  can  make  a 
substantial  difference  in  the  number  of  deaths  and  severe,  disabling  injuries  that 
result from these serious incidents. 

However, despite widespread, chronic violation of HOS limits by commercial driv-
ers,  FMCSA  in  early  2007  proposed  a  very  weak  regulation  that  will  require  vir-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

52 

tually  no  motor  carriers  to  install  EOBRs  on  big  trucks  and  buses.39 The  proposed 
rule would use EOBRs as a punishment for motor carriers that fail two consecutive 
CRs.  In  fact,  only  a  minute  number  of  companies—less  than  one-tenth  of  one  per-
cent—would be required to install EOBRs if that proposal is adopted. It is clear that 
FMCSA  is  openly  avoiding  the  need  to  ensure  that  commercial  drivers  adhere  to 
current HOS regulations limiting driving and working time, and ensuring minimum 
off-duty rest periods. 

The  Motorcoach  Enhanced  Safety  Act  includes  a  provision  to  require  EOBRs. 
Without  a  specific  direction  from  Congress  to  FMCSA,  the  agency  will  not  require 
EOBRs on all interstate commercial motor vehicles, to the detriment of safety. 
Conclusion and Recommendations 

Passenger  transportation  safety  by  over-the-road  motorcoaches  is  not  held  to  the 
high  safety  standards  of  commercial  passenger  aviation.  Motorcoach  crashes  can 
take  many  lives  in  a  single  event  and  inflict  severe  injuries  on  numerous  pas-
sengers.  NTSB’s  studies  and  crash  reports  document  the  deadly  outcome  of  a  cata-
strophic  motorcoach  crash,  and  its  safety  recommendations  provide  solutions  that 
will  dramatically  improve  motorcoach  safety.  Because  DOT  and  the  safety  agencies 
have  not  implemented  recommended  safety  countermeasures,  despite  having  had 
ample  opportunity  to  do  so  and  reams  of  supporting  evidence,  Congress  must  take 
action to increase the level of motorcoach safety and improve the quality of Federal 
and state oversight. 

Advocates recommends that the Subcommittee embrace the Motorcoach Enhanced 
Safety  Act  of  2007,  S.  2326.  This  legislation  will  jumpstart  motorcoach  safety  by 
putting  numerous  safety  improvements  on  reasonable  timelines  for  U.S.  DOT  rule-
making action. The outcome in just several years would be fewer motorcoach crash-
es with fewer injuries and deaths. 

We  further  recommend,  however,  that  additional  provisions  be  added  to  S.  2326 
to address the need for the imposition of criminal penalties for persons who illegally 
continue  to  operate  a  motor  carrier  after  having  been  ordered  to  cease  operations, 
to  establish  a  performance  standard  for  retreaded  tires  used  on  commercial  motor 
vehicles, and to require event data recorders (EDRs) on motorcoaches to assist crash 
investigators  in  reconstructing  how  and  why  each  motorcoach  crash  occurs.  NTSB 
has  repeatedly  called  for  EDRs  as  critically  important  to  passenger  transportation 
safety.40 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  this  information  to  the  Subcommittee 
on a major safety problem. We at Advocates look forward to working with the Sub-
committee  and  the  full  Committee  on  these  issues,  and  I  am  prepared  to  respond 
to any questions you may have. 
Endnotes 

1 Although  Advocates’  testimony  centers  on  over-the-road  motorcoaches,  much  of  our  critique 
of  motorcoach  safety  design,  operating  safety,  and  agency  oversight  also  applies  to  other  types 
of  buses  and  to  some  passenger-carrying  vans  that  fall  under  the  jurisdiction  of  both  FMCSA 
and NHTSA. 

2 Motorcoach  Override  of  Elevated  Exit  Ramp  Interstate  75,  Atlanta,  Georgia,  March  2,  2007, 
Appendix  C,  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  Accident  Report  HTSB/HAR–08/01,  July  8, 
2008 (Bluffton University Motorcoach Crash Report). 

3 Data supplied in special data run performed by the National Highway Traffic Safety Admin-

istration’s (NHTSA) National Center for Statistics and Analysis (NCSA). 

4 Id. 
5 Bluffton University Motorcoach Crash Report. 
6 Title 49 CFR § 382.305. 
7 Motorcoach  Fire  On  Interstate  45  During  Hurricane  Rita  Evacuation  Near  Wilmer  Texas, 

September 23, 2005. 

8 Title 49 CFR § 391.11(b)(2). 
9 See, 49 CFR Pt. 385 for a description of FMCSA’s safety rating process. 
10 http://testimony.ost.dot.gov/test/Sandberg1.htm, May 2, 2006. 
11 Bluffton University Motorcoach Crash Report at 52. 
12 Id. at 54. 
13 For example, see NTSB’s recommendation H–71–35 that was closed out on October 29, 1975. 
14 See, e.g., Commercial Motor Vehicles: Effectiveness of Actions Being Taken to Improve Motor 
Carrier Safety Is Unknown. Report to the Chairman, Subcommittee on Transportation and Rel-
ative  Agencies,  Committee  on  Appropriations,  House  of  Representatives,  GAO/RCED–001–89 
(July 2000); Significant Improvements in Motor Carrier Safety Program Since 1999 Act but Loop-
holes  for  Repeat  Violators  Need  Closing,  OIG  Report  Number  MH2006–046,  April  21,  2006;  Im-
provements  Needed  in  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Status  Measurement  System,  OIG  Report  Number 
MH–2004–034,  (Feb.  2004);  A  Statistical  Approach  Will  Better  Identify  Commercial  Carriers 
That  Pose  High  Crash  Risks  Than  Does  the  Current  Federal  Approach,  GAO–07–585  (June 
2007); Motor Carrier Safety: Federal Safety Agency Identifies Many High-Risk Carriers but Does 
Not Assess Maximum Fines as Often as Required by Law, GOA–07–584 (Aug. 2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

53 

2008). 

15 Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  for  the  Twenty-First  Century: 

A Legacy for Users, Pub. L. 109–59 (Aug. 10, 2005). 

16 Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  Transportation  Safety  Act  of  2007,  Pub.  L.  110–189  (Feb.  28, 

17 NHTSA’s Approach to Motorcoach Safety, Aug. 6, 2007. 
18 E.  Mayrhofer,  H.  Steffan,  H.  Hoschopf,  Enhanced  Coach  and  Bus  Occupant  Safety,  Paper 

05–0351, Graz University of Technology Vehicle Safety Institute, Austria, 2005. 

19 M.  Griffiths,  M.  Paine,  R.  Moore,  Three  Point  Seat  Belts  on  Coaches—The  First  Decade  in 
Australia,  Queensland  Transport,  Australia,  Abstract  ID  –5–0017,  2005.  The  authors  report 
that, since 1994 when 3-point belts were required in motorcoaches, several serious crashes have 
occurred, no belted coach occupant has received either fatal or disabling injuries. 

20 http://www.fmcsa.dot.gov/facts-research/facts-figures/analysis-statistics/cmvfacts.htm. 

There are no separate figures for motorcoaches provided, but the United Motorcoach Association 
estimates that there are probably about 45,000 to 50,000 commercial over-the-road motorcoaches 
in  the  U.S.  There  is,  in  addition,  an  unknown  number  of  ‘‘private’’  motorcoaches  such  as  those 
used for schools, church groups, and other organizations, some of which are interstate and must 
conform  to  most  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Regulations.  It  is  difficult  to  reconcile  these  fig-
ures with those from FMCSA (see, the text and footnote below) and the figures provided by the 
American  Bus  Association  in  its  Motorcoach  Census  2005:  Second  Benchmarking  Study  of  the 
Motorcoach  Industry  in  the  United  States  and  Canada,  September  2006,  in  which  it  is  stated 
that  in  2004  the  industry  consisted  of  3,500  companies  operating  nearly  40,000  motorcoaches. 
21 See,  Statement  of  John  Hill,  Administrator,  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration, 
before the House Committee on Transportation and Infrastructure, Subcommittee on Highways, 
Transit,  and  Pipelines,  March  20,  2007.  Also,  see,  http://ai.fmcsa.dot.gov/International/border. 
asp?dvar+3&cvar=pass&redirect=HistoricalOverview.asp&p=1.  However,  there  are  substantial 
discrepancies  throughout  FMCSA’s  website  on  the  number  of  passenger  carriers.  For  example, 
one  page  providing  figures  states  that  there  were  5,211  passenger  carriers  registered  with  the 
agency  as  of  2006.  http://www.fmcsa.dot.gov/facts-research/facts-figures/analysis-statistics/ 
cmvfacts.htm. There is no explanation of what kinds of passenger carriers this includes. 

22 Pub. L. 102–240, 105 Stat. 1914 (Dec. 18, 1991). 
23 69 FR 29384 et seq., May 21, 2004. 
24 429 F.3d 1136 (D.C. Cir. 2005). 
25 Id. at 3–4. 
26 72 FR 73226 (Dec. 26, 2007). 
27 72 FR 73227–73228. 
28 Id. at 73231–73232. 
29 The most recent statement of the governing regulations for determining safety fitness is the 
FMCSA  final  rule  of  August  22,  2000  (65  FR  50919),  which  was  a  response  to  the  increased 
stringency  of  safety  fitness  requirements  enacted  in  Section  4009  of  TEA–21  that  amended  49 
U.S.C.  § 31144,  originally  enacted  by  Section  215  of  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Act  of  1984  (Pub. 
L. 98–554). This final rule amended the regulations for safety fitness determinations in 49 CFR 
Pts.  385  and  386.  Pt.  385  contains  the  controlling  criteria  for  making  safety  fitness  determina-
tions  and  Pt.  386  contains  the  rules  of  practice  for  the  agency  controlling  the  issuance  of  CR 
ratings, petitions, hearings, orders, and other administrative machinery for conducting the over-
sight and enforcement programs of FMCSA. It should also be noted that FMCSA recognizes that 
its  administrative  selection  of  the  three  rating  categories  of  safety  fitness,  Satisfactory,  Condi-
tional,  and  Unsatisfactory,  has  been  legislatively  enshrined  through  explicit  mention  and  use 
of the three ratings in Section 15(b) of the Motor Carrier Safety Act of 1990. 49 U.S.C. § 31144. 
30 Section 215 of the Motor Carrier Safety Act of 1984 requires the Secretary to maintain, by 
regulation, a procedure for determining the safety fitness of an owner or operator of commercial 
motor vehicles. 49 U.S.C. § 31144. 

31 Motor  Carrier  Safety  Program,  DOT  Office  of  Inspector  General,  Report  Number  AS–FH– 
7–006,  March  26,  1997.  The  goal  of  assigning  safety  ratings  to  all  motor  carriers  by  September 
30,  1992,  was  a  self-imposed  target  by  FHWA  that  could  not  be  attained,  as  pointed  out  in  the 
GAO  report  of  January  1991,  Truck  Safety:  Improvements  Needed  in  FHWA’s  Motor  Carrier 
Safety Program, Report No. GAO/RCED–91–30. At the time of GAO’s preparation of this report, 
FHWA  had  not  rated  about  60  percent  of  interstate  motor  carriers.  As  GAO  points  out  in  this 
report,  the  agency  decided  that  its  safety  oversight  resources  would  be  better  spent  than  at-
tempting to safety rate all motor carriers in accordance with legislative requirements. On Octo-
ber 1, 1994, FHWA discontinued safety reviews to assess unrated motor carriers. 

32 See,  http://www.ntsb.gov/Recs/mostwanted/trucklsafety.htm.  As  previously  mentioned, 
NTSB recommends that if a carrier receives an Unsatisfactory rating for either the vehicle fac-
tor or the driver factor, that alone should trigger a pending Unsatisfactory rating. According to 
NTSB,  this  recommendation  ha  been  reissued  annually  since  199,  but  FMCSA  does  not  plan 
full  implementation  of  any  changes  to  its  safety  rating  system  and  other  oversight  processes 
until 2010 at the earliest. 

33 http://ai.fmcsa.dot.gov/Passenger/findlcarrier.asp. 
34 Title  49  Code  of  Federal  Regulation  (CFR)  Part  396;  Sec.  210  of  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety 

Act of 1984 (49 U.S.C. § 31142). 

35 63 FR 8516 et seq., February 19, 1998. 
36 66 FR 32863 (June 18, 2001). 
37 Section 210, Motor Carrier Safety Act of 1984, op. cit., codified at 49 U.S.C. § 31142. 
38 ‘‘Electronic  On-Board  Recorders  (EOBRs)  and  Truck  Driver  Fatigue  Reduction,’’  Committee 
on  Transportation  and  Infrastructure,  Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant 
Marine Infrastructure, Safety, and Security, U.S. Senate, May 1, 2007. 

39 72 FR 2340 (Jan. 18, 2007). 
40 See, NTSB Recommendation H–99–53, reissued as one of the NTSB recommendations in the 
recently  published  report  on  the  motorcoach  crash  of  the  Bluffton  University  baseball  team, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

54 

‘‘Motorcoach  Override  of  Elevated  Exit  Ramp  Interstate  75,  Atlanta,  Georgia,  March  2,  2007,’’ 
op. cit. 

Motorcoach Crashes 
September 2008 

APPENDIX 

This  list  contains  101  motorcoach  crashes  including  many  incidents  investigated 
by the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) and examples of other serious 
motorcoach crashes that have been publicly reported in the national media. In some 
cases specific dates are not available. NHTSA data reflects that 1,117 motorcoaches 
have  been  involved  in  crashes  between  1975  and  2005,  but  specific  information  is 
not available for each individual crash. 

Date of Crash 

Location 

Description 

August 10, 2008 

Primm, NV 

August 10, 2008 

Tunica, MS 

August 8, 2008 

Sherman, TX 

January 17, 2008 

Primm, NV 

January 7, 2008 

Mexican Hat, UT 

January 2, 2008 

Victoria, TX 

January 2, 2008 

Henderson, NC 

June 25, 2007 

Bowling Green, KY 

March 2, 2007 

Atlanta, GA 

May 20, 2007 

Clearfield, PA 

Motorcoach  rolled  off  the  road  after  experiencing  tire  fail-
ure. 29 passengers were injured. 

Motorcoach  overturned  on  a  median,  killing  3  passengers. 
The  roof  partially  collapsed  in  the  rollover.  No  cause  de-
termined as of yet. 

Motorcoach  carrying  55  passengers  crashed  after  blowing 
a tire and skidding off of the highway, hitting a guardrail 
and  coming  to  rest  on  its  side.  14  people  were  killed,  and 
40  were  injured.  NTSB  is  investigating.  The  blowout  con-
tributed  to  the  crash.  The  Sherman  PD  released  a  report 
that also claimed that faulty evasive action at the time of 
the blowout contributed to the crash. 

Motorcoach  ran  off  the  highway,  struck  a  guardrail,  and 
overturned.  The  fuel  tanks  were  breached,  and  the  bus 
caught  on  fire.  No  fatalities,  25  passengers  were  injured. 
No cause determined as of yet. 

Motorcoach  carrying  51  passengers  ran  off  a  curvy  road, 
rolled several times, and the roof was split open. The tires 
were  stripped  off.  Passengers  were  thrown  from  the  bus, 
and 9 were killed. The contributing factor was the driver’s 
negotiation of the turn. 

Motorcoach  carrying  passengers  from  Mexico  ran  off  the 
road,  overcorrected  and  rolled  over,  killing  one  passenger. 
Driver fatigue could be a factor in the crash. 

Motorcoach collided with a tractor-trailer when it failed to 
slow  down  when  the  truck  was  making  a  left  turn.  The 
bus  ran  off  the  road,  down  an  embankment  and  onto  its 
side. 50 passengers were injured. 

Motorcoach  veered  off  the  road  and  hit  an  overpass,  kill-
ing two passengers and injuring 66. The driver apparently 
dozed off while driving. 

Motorcoach  carrying  Bluffton  University  baseball  team 
crashed  through  an  overpass  bridge  wall  and  fell  19  feet 
onto  Interstate  75  landing  on  its  side.  Seven  motorcoach 
occupants  were  killed  and  21  injured.  NTSB  found  that 
the  lack  of  an  adequate  occupant  protection  system  con-
tributed to the severity of the crash. 

NTSB  investigation.  Rollover  crash:  2  passengers  killed, 
25 injured. 

Sept. 6, 2006 

Auburn, MA 

NTSB investigation. Rollover crash: 34 passengers injured. 

August 28, 2006 

Westport, NY 

NTSB  investigation.  Rollover  crash:  4  passengers  killed, 
48 injured. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

Date of Crash 

Location 

Description 

55 

March 30, 2006 

Houston, TX 

October 25, 2005 

San Antonio, TX 

October 16, 2005 

Osseo, WI 

Sept. 23, 2005 

Wilmer, TX 

Motorcoach carrying girls’ soccer team was trying to avoid 
debris falling from a tractor- trailer when it lost control on 
slippery  pavement  and  overturned.  Two  passengers  were 
killed.  The  Texas  Department  of  Public  Safety  cited  the 
tractor-trailer  driver  for  improperly  securing  the  load  and 
the  bus  driver  for  faulty  evasive  action.  NTSB  found  that 
passenger  restraints  and  strengthened  glass  windows  on 
the bus could have prevented some injuries. 

Motorcoach crashed into two 18-wheelers after its tire was 
blown.  The  driver  was  killed,  and  two  passengers  and  a 
truck driver sustained injuries. 

NTSB  investigation.  Frontal  impact  crash:  4  passengers 
killed, 35 injured. 

Motorcoach  carrying  44  assisted  living  facility  residents 
and nursing staff as part of the evacuation in anticipation 
of  Hurricane  Rita  caught  fire.  23  passengers  were  fatally 
injured.  Of  the  21  passengers  who  escaped,  2  were  seri-
ously injured and 19 received minor injuries, including the 
motorcoach  driver.  NTSB  found  that  insufficient  lubrica-
tion  in  the  right-side  tag  axle  wheel-bearing  assembly  of 
the  motorcoach,  resulting  in  increased  temperatures  and 
subsequent  failed  wheel  bearings,  led  to  the  catastrophic 
fire. Lack of fire-retardant construction materials and fail-
ure to conduct routine maintenance were contributing fac-
tors in the severity of the crash. 

July 25, 2005 

Baltimore, MD 

NTSB investigation. Rollover crash: 33 passengers killed. 

January 29, 2005 

Geneseo, NY 

Nov. 14, 2004 

Alexandria, VA 

October 9, 2004 

Turrell, AR 

August 6, 2004 

Jackson, TN 

May 24, 2004 

Anahuac, TX 

NTSB  investigation.  Frontal  impact  crash:  3  passengers 
killed, 20 injured. 

Motorcoach  was  transporting  27  high  school  students  to 
Mount Vernon, Virginia when it collided with an overpass. 
10  passengers  received  minor  injuries  and  another  sus-
tained  serious  injury.  NTSB  found  that  the  bus  driver’s 
failure  to  notice  and  respond  to  posted  low-clearance 
warning  signs  and  driver  distraction  resulting  from  talk-
ing  on  his  hands-  free  cellular  telephone  while  driving 
were the causes of the crash. 

NTSB  investigation.  Rollover  crash:  14  passengers  killed, 
15 injured. 

NTSB  investigation.  Frontal  impact  crash:  2  passengers 
killed, 18 injured. 

Motorcoach  collided  with  a  tractor-trailer,  killing  one  pas-
senger. 

Feb. 22, 2004 

North Hudson, NY 

NTSB  investigation.  Frontal  impact  crash:  47  passengers 
injured. 

2004 

Phoenix, AZ 

October 13, 2003 

Tallulah, LA 

NTSB  investigation.  Frontal  impact  crash:  1  passenger 
killed, 38 injured. 

Motorcoach  carrying  14  passengers  struck  a  tractor-trail-
er.  8  passengers  were  killed,  the  driver  and  6  other  pas-
sengers  sustained  minor  injuries,  and  the  driver  of  the 
tractor-trailer  was  uninjured.  NTSB  determined  that  the 
cause was the driver’s reduced alertness caused by fatigue 
as a result of his chronic insomnia and poor quality sleep. 
Also  contributing  was  the  failure  of  the  motorcoach  seat 
anchorages. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

Date of Crash 

Location 

Description 

56 

Feb. 14, 2003 

Hewitt, TX 

Motorcoach transporting 34 passengers crashed through a 
median  and  into  oncoming  traffic,  colliding  with  a  sport 
utility  vehicle  and  a  pickup  truck.  The  driver  and  pas-
senger of the SUV and 5 motorcoach passengers sustained 
fatal  injuries.  Motorcoach  driver  sustained  serious  inju-
ries;  remaining  passengers  sustained  minor  to  serious  in-
juries.  NTSB  found  probable  cause  of  the  crash  was  state 
authorities  decision  to  set  a  speed  limit  that  did  not  take 
into  account  the  roadway’s  limited  sight  distance  or  its 
poor conditions in wet weather was. The lack of a median 
barrier  and  an  occupant  protection  system  contributed  to 
the severity of the crash. 

2003 

Apache Co., AZ 

NTSB investigation. Rollover crash: 44 passengers injured. 

October 1, 2002 

Nephi, UT 

June 23, 2002 

Victor, NY 

June 9, 2002 

Loraine, TX 

April 24, 2002 

Kinder, LA 

October 3, 2001 

Manchester, TN 

August 19, 2001 

Pleasant View, TN 

January 2, 2001 

San Miguel, CA 

NTSB  investigation.  Rollover  crash:  6  passengers  killed, 
20 injured. 

Motorcoach  carrying  47  passengers  crashed  through  the 
grassy  area  between  an  exit  ramp  and  entrance  ramp, 
dragging  a  guardrail  and  coming  to  rest  on  its  right  side. 
The  guardrail  hit  three  cars.  5  passengers  were  killed,  41 
passengers  and  the  driver  sustained  minor  injuries,  and 
the  vehicle  passengers  had  minor  injuries.  NTSB  found 
that  the  cause  of  the  crash  was  due  to  the  driver  falling 
asleep  at  the  wheel.  A  contributing  factor  was  the  lack  of 
proper restraints for the motorcoach passengers. 

Motorcoach  carrying  37  passengers  collided  with  the  back 
of  a  tractor-trailer  that  entered  the  highway  from  an  en-
trance  ramp.  Three  passengers  in  the  front  of  the  motor-
coach  were  killed,  5  passengers  and  the  driver  were  seri-
ously  injured,  24  passengers  sustained  minor  injuries. 
NTSB  found  that  the  unnecessarily  slow  acceleration  by 
tractor-trailer  was  the  cause  of  the  crash.  The  driver  of 
the tractor-trailer was also impaired by cocaine. 

Motorcoach  drove  into  telephone  pole,  killing  the  driver 
and  4  passengers.  Driver  was  found  medically  incapaci-
tated. 

NTSB  investigation.  Rollover  crash:  6  passengers  killed, 
unknown injuries. 

Motorcoach carrying 47 passengers drifted off the roadway 
and crashed onto its right side. One passenger was killed, 
38  had  minor-to-serious  injuries.  NTSB  found  that  driver 
fatigue was the contributing factor to the crash. 

Motorcoach carrying 5 passengers ran off the right side of 
the  highway,  struck  a  guardrail,  and  went  over  a  bridge 
rail, plunging 23 feet. It came to rest on its side after roll-
ing over at the pavement below. 2 passengers were ejected 
and  killed,  3  passengers  were  injured.  NTSB  found  that 
the cause of the crash was driver fatigue. 

2001 

2001 

2001 

Allamuchy, NJ 

NTSB investigation. Rollover crash: 39 passengers injured. 

Bay St. Louis, MO 

NTSB  investigation.  Frontal  impact  crash:  16  passengers 
injured. 

Fairplay, CO 

NTSB investigation. Rollover crash: 45 passengers injured. 

August 27, 2000 

Eureka, MO 

Dec. 21, 1999 

Canon City, CO 

NTSB  investigation.  Frontal  impact  crash:  25  passengers 
injured. 

Motorcoach carrying 59 passengers lost control on a curve, 
rolled  at  least  once  down  an  embankment,  and  came  to 
rest  on  the  roof.  The  driver  and  two  passengers  were 
killed,  33  passengers  had  serious  injuries,  and  24  had 
minor injuries. NTSB found the driver was at fault for not 
maintaining  control  of  the  vehicle  in  icy  conditions.  The 
reason the driver did not slow down the vehicle before the 
crash was not determined. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

Date of Crash 

Location 

Description 

57 

May 9, 1999 

New Orleans, LA 

April 30, 1999 

Braidwood, IL 

March 2, 1999 

Sante Fe Ski Basin, New 
Mexico 

December 24, 1998 

Old Bridge, NJ 

June 20, 1998 

Burnt Cabins, PA 

Sept. 13, 1997 

Jonesboro, AR 

July 29, 1997 

Stony Creek, VA 

June 11, 1997 

Normandy, MO 

June 6, 1997 

Albuquerque, NM 

Motorcoach  carrying  43  passengers  crashed  when  it  de-
parted  the  highway  onto  a  shoulder,  struck  a  guardrail, 
vaulted over a golf cart path, and into a dirt embankment. 
22 passengers were killed, 15 passengers had serious inju-
ries,  and  6  passengers  had  minor  injuries.  NTSB  found 
the crash was caused by the driver’s incapacitation due to 
a  severe  medical  condition,  in  addition  to  the  driver’s  fa-
tigue and marijuana use. 

NTSB investigation. Rollover crash: 1 passenger killed, 23 
injured. 

Motorcoach carrying 36 passengers crashed when the driv-
er  lost  control  on  a  downward-sloping  portion  of  a  moun-
tainous road and crashed into a rock embankment. 2 pas-
sengers  were  killed,  and  35  others  injured.  NTSB  found 
that  the  cause  of  the  crash  was  the  poor  condition  of  the 
motorcoach  brakes  due  to  the  lack  of  an  effective  motor 
carrier vehicle maintenance and inspection program. 

NTSB  investigation.  Rollover  crash:  8  passengers  killed, 
14 injured. 

Motorcoach  carrying  23  passengers  crashed  when  it  drift-
ed  onto  the  right  shoulder  of  the  road  into  an  emergency 
parking area, and into a parked tractor-trailer that struck 
another  parked  tractor-trailer.  6  passengers  and  the  bus 
driver were killed, and 16 passengers were injured. NTSB 
found that the cause of the crash was reduced driver alert-
ness due to taking a sedating antihistamine and driver fa-
tigue due to irregular work-rest periods. 

Motorcoach  failed  to  stop  at  a  T  intersection  and  contin-
ued  through  a  ditch  and  earthen  levee.  1  passenger  was 
killed, 6 injured. 

Motorcoach left the roadway on the right, vaulted through 
small  trees  and  came  to  rest  on  its  side  in  a  river.  1  pas-
senger was killed, 32 injured. 

Motorcoach  collided  with  pedestrians  after  a  routine  stop 
by  a  driver  trainee.  The  driver  claimed  he  could  not  stop 
the  vehicle.  4  pedestrians  were  killed,  and  3  others  in-
jured. NTSB found that the cause of the crash was insuffi-
cient pedestrian protection and the need for positive sepa-
ration between the roadway and pedestrian areas. 

Motorcoach  drifted  off  the  roadway,  rode  up  and  over  a 
guardrail  and  hit  a  cement  wall.  Driver  was  fatigued.  1 
passenger was killed, 35 passengers injured. 

August 2, 1996 

Roanoke Rapids, NC 

Motorcoach driver was fatigued. 19 passengers injured. 

October 14, 1995 

Indianapolis, IN 

Motorcoach  entered  an  exit  at  high  speeds  and  over-
turned. 2 passengers were killed, 38 injured. 

July 23, 1995 

Bolton Landing, NY 

Motorcoach  lost  control  on  a  steep  downward  slope,  and 
overturned. 1 passenger was killed, 30 injured. 

April 24, 1994 

Chestertown, NY 

Feb. 22, 1994 

North Hudson, NY 

January 29, 1994 

Pueblo, CA 

Motorcoach  drifted  off  the  road  and  rolled  over.  Driver 
was  fatigued.  1  passenger  was  killed,  20  passengers  in-
jured. 

Motorcoach  carrying  47  passengers  collided  with  tractor- 
trailer  that  was  stopped  in  traffic.  Driver  said  he  didn’t 
see any brake lights on the trailer. 8 passengers injured. 

Motorcoach  slid  out  of  control  on  icy  pavement  and  rolled 
over. 1 passenger was killed, 8 injured. 

Sept. 17, 1993 

Winslow Township, NJ 

A truck drifted into the lane of the motorcoach, causing a 
head-on collision. 6 passengers were killed, 8 injured. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

Date of Crash 

Location 

Description 

58 

Sept. 10, 1993 

Phoenix, AZ 

June 26, 1993 

Springfield, MO 

July 26, 1992 

Vernon, NJ 

April 11, 1992 

Schroon Lake, NY 

January 24, 1992 

South Bend, IN 

June 26, 1991 

Donegal, PA 

August 3, 1991 

Caroline, NY 

February 2, 1991 

Joliett, PA 

May 18, 1990 

Big Pine, CA 

Feb. 18, 1989 

Falfurrias, TX 

Nov. 29, 1988 

Tinton Falls, NJ 

Nov. 19, 1988 

Nashville, TN 

July 24, 1988 

Camden, AL 

July 23, 1988 

Little Egg Harbor 
Township, NJ 

Sept. 6, 1987 

Middletown Township, 
NJ 

Motorcoach  ran  off  the  road  and  overcorrected,  then  over-
turned. Driver was fatigued. 33 passengers were injured. 

Motorcoach  collided  with  a  passenger  vehicle  head  on, 
then  left  the  roadway  and  turned  over  on  its  side.  1  pas-
senger was killed, 46 injured. 

Motorcoach  carrying  37  passengers  lost  control  on  a  steep 
hill,  crashing  into  two  cars,  overturning,  and  coming  to 
rest upright. 12 passengers were ejected from the bus, 6 of 
whom  were  killed.  NTSB  found  that  the  driver’s  inability 
to  maintain  the  bus  adequately  and  choosing  to  operate  a 
bus with known brake deficiencies caused the crash. 

Motorcoach  lost  control,  rolling  over  several  times.  2  pas-
sengers were killed, 29 injured. 

Motorcoach lost control on a snowy road when a passenger 
vehicle  stopped  in  front  of  it.  Witnesses  say  there  was  no 
vehicle ahead. 2 passengers were killed, 34 injured. 

Motorcoach  ran  off  the  right  side  of  the  road  and  over-
turned.  One  passenger  was  killed  and  14  passengers  in-
jured.  NTSB  found  that  the  cause  of  the  crash  was  the 
failure  of  Greyhound  Lines,  Inc.,  to  ensure  that  the  bus 
driver  had  adequate  training  and  experience  to  operate 
intercity  buses  safely,  resulting  in  his  inability  to  control 
the vehicle, which ran off the road and overturned. 

Motorcoach  ran  off  the  right  side  of  the  road  and  over-
turned. 33 passengers were injured, and 5 were uninjured. 
NTSB found that the cause of the crash was the failure of 
Greyhound Lines, Inc., to ensure that the bus drivers had 
adequate  training  and  experience  to  operate  intercity 
buses safely, resulting in their inability to control their ve-
hicles, which ran off the road and overturned. 

Motorcoach  swerved  to  the  right  when  the  driver  was 
reaching  for  a  water  bottle.  The  driver  corrected  and 
veered  off  the  other  side  of  the  roadway.  2  passengers 
were killed, 44 injured. 

Motorcoach  ran  off  the  road  and  hit  a  rock  and  earthen 
slope. 2 passengers were killed, 43 injured. 

Motorcoach  skidded  on  wet  pavement,  lost  control  and 
overturned  onto  an  embankment.  4  passengers  were 
killed, 19 injured. 

The  bus  driver  lost  control  of  the  bus  and  it  overturned. 
Passengers  injured.  NTSB  found  that  the  cause  of  the 
crash was the bus driver’s inattention that resulted in the 
loss of control of his vehicle. 

Motorcoach carrying 45 passengers lost control in a steer-
ing  maneuver  and  overturned.  38  passengers  were  in-
jured.  NTSB  found  the  cause  of  the  crash  to  be  the  driv-
er’s excessive speed, which was above the regulatory limit, 
and excessive due to weather conditions. 

Motorcoach  lost  control  and  rolled  over.  1  passenger  was 
killed, 30 injured. 

Motorcoach  lost  control  and  ran  off  of  the  highway.  Pas-
sengers injured. NTSB found that the crash was caused by 
the bus driver’s impairment from the recent use of cocaine 
while  on  duty  which  resulted  in  the  loss  of  control  of  the 
vehicle. 

Motorcoach  ran  off  the  road  and  overturned.  Driver  and 
one  passenger  were  killed,  32  passengers  injured.  NTSB 
found that the cause of the crash was the bus driver’s lack 
of vigilance due to fatigue, which resulted in his failure to 
perceive that the vehicle was leaving the roadway. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

Date of Crash 

Location 

Description 

59 

May 4, 1987 

Beaumont, TX 

April 4, 1987 

Alexandria, VA 

October 9, 1986 

North Bergen, NJ 

Sept. 29, 1986 

Carney’s Point, NJ 

July 14, 1986 

Brinkley, AR 

May 30, 1986 

Walker, CA 

October 9, 1986 

North Bergen, NJ 

Sept. 13, 1985 

Eureka Springs, AR 

August 25, 1985 

Frederick, MD 

June 20, 1985 

Ackerly, TX 

July 18, 1984 

Cheyenne, WY 

Nov. 30, 1983 

Livingston, TX 

April 7, 1982 

Oakland, CA 

A tractor-trailer jackknifed on an interstate, crashing into 
an  intercity  bus.  Driver  and  5  motorcaoch  passengers 
killed,  17  passengers  were  injured.  NTSB  found  that  the 
driver  of  tractor-trailer  was  operating  at  excessive  speed 
for the weather conditions. 

Motorcoach carrying 65 passengers struck an arched stone 
overpass,  shearing  off  the  roof.  33  passengers  sustained 
injuries,  1  person  died  10  hours  later  from  injuries  in  the 
crash. 

Motorcoach  veered  into  an  adjacent  lane,  struck  a  pas-
senger  vehicle,  then  struck  another  transit  bus.  One  per-
son  on  the  other  bus  was  killed,  and  26  other  passengers 
were  injured  from  both  buses.  NTSB  found  the  cause  of 
the  crash  was  the  distraction  of  the  bus  driver  from  his 
driving duties while assisting a bus passenger. 

Motorcoach crashed into the back of a slower moving trac-
tor-trailer.  Passengers  injured.  NTSB  found  the  cause  of 
the  crash  to  be  the  bus  driver’s  inattention  to  his  driving 
task  and  his  misjudgment  of  the  closing  speed  between 
the bus and the truck in front of him. 

Motorcoach  carrying  28  passengers  crashed  into  the  rear 
of a tractor-trailer, then left the pavement and overturned. 
Injuries  and  fatalities  not  known.  NTSB  found  that  the 
cause  of  the  crash  was  that  the  tractor-trailer  had  made 
an  illegal  U-Turn,  and  the  bus  was  traveling  at  an  exces-
sive speed that did not permit adequate time and distance 
to slow or stop the bus to avoid the collision. 

Motorcoach  carrying  40  passengers  lost  control  in  an  S 
curve,  and  came  to  rest  in  a  river.  21  passengers  were 
killed,  19  passengers  and  the  driver  were  injured.  NTSB 
found that the cause of the crash was excessive speed, fail-
ure of the driver to comply with advisory speed signs and 
to  reduce  the  bus  speed  sufficiently  to  negotiate  the  S 
curve safely. 

Motorcoach veered into an adjacent lane and struck a pas-
senger  vehicle;  then  it  struck  another  motorcoach.  1  pas-
senger was killed, 27 injured. 

Motorcoach lost control and rolled over. Driver and 3 pas-
sengers killed, 16 injured. 

Motorcoach  lost  control  on  wet  pavement  and  crashed, 
coming  to  rest  on  a  bridge  over  the  Monocacy  River.  Pas-
sengers were ejected in the crash sequence. The bus driver 
and 5 passengers were killed, and 11 passengers had inju-
ries.  NTSB  found  that  the  loss  of  control  and  excessive 
speed contributed to the crash, as did the lack of an opera-
tive  speedometer  and  highway  signs  warning  of  road  con-
ditions. 

Motorcoach  lost  control  on  wet  pavement,  rolled  over  and 
came  to  rest  on  its  roof.  4  passengers  were  killed,  27  in-
jured. 

Motorcoach  ran  into  the  rear  of  a  tractor-trailer.  Driver 
was fatigued. 1 passenger was killed, 10 injured. 

Motorcoach  carrying  11  passengers  struck  the  back  of  a 
tractor-trailer  that  had  just  entered  the  highway.  The 
truck crashed through a bridge guardrail and vaulted into 
a  creek  bank.  6  passengers  were  killed,  and  5  passengers 
and  the  bus  driver  had  injuries.  NTSB  found  that  the 
cause of the crash was the driver’s lack of alertness, prob-
ably  due  to  fatigue.  Excessive  speed  was  a  contributing 
factor. 

Motorcoach  collided  with  passenger  vehicle;  involved  in 
multi-vehicle collision. There were no passengers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

Date of Crash 

Location 

Description 

60 

June 15, 1981 

Mt. McKinley National 
Park, AK 

April 20, 1981 

Beltsville, MD 

Feb. 18, 1981 

Triangle, VA 

Nov. 16, 1980 

Luling, TX 

June 5, 1980 

Jasper, AR 

May 21, 1976 

Martinez, CA 

June 6, 1975 

Hamilton, GA 

Nov. 3, 1973 

Sacramento, CA 

Sept. 21, 1972 

New Jersey Turnpike, 
Exit 8, NJ 

Sept. 3, 1972 

Richmond, VA 

May 13, 1972 

Bean Station, TN 

Motorcoach  carrying  32  passengers  ran  off  the  right  side 
of  the  road  and  rolled  over,  sliding  down  a  hill.  5  pas-
sengers  were  killed,  26  passengers  injured.  NTSB  found 
that the cause of the crash was driver lack of training and 
experience. 

Motorcoach carrying 43 passengers failed to stop as traffic 
ahead  slowed  and  crashed  into  a  passenger  vehicle,  caus-
ing a 4-car pile-up and a fire. Three passenger vehicle oc-
cupants  were  killed.  The  bus  passengers  and  driver  had 
minor  injuries.  NTSB  found  that  the  cause  of  the  crash 
was  due  to  the  failure  of  the  driver  to  maintain  a  safe 
stopping distance between the bus and traffic ahead. 

Motorcoach  veered  off  the  roadway  and  overrode  a  guard-
rail,  into  a  bridge,  and  landing  in  2  feet  of  water  on  its 
side.  10  passengers  and  the  driver  were  killed.  NTSB 
found that those least injured were the ones who left their 
seats and crouched between the seats or lay on the floor. 

Motorcoach  lost  control  on  wet  pavement,  skidding,  rotat-
ing  and  coming  to  rest  on  its  side  across  the  roadway.  2 
passengers  were  killed  after  they  had  been  ejected  from 
the bus in the crash. 

Motorcoach  carrying  32  passengers  lost  control  in  a  left 
curve on a steep downgrade crashed into a drainage chan-
nel and was vaulted down an embankment. 20 passengers 
and  the  driver  were  killed,  and  13  passengers  were  in-
jured.  NTSB  found  that  driver  fatigue,  reduced  fuel  flow 
from a nonstandard fuel pump that adversely affected the 
bus driver’s ability to downshift, and the improperly main-
tained airbrake system all contributed to the crash. 

Motorcoach  carrying  52  passengers  mounted  a  section  of 
the  bridge  rail  system,  rolled  off  the  top  of  the  rail  and 
landed  on  its  roof.  29  passengers  were  killed  and  the  oth-
ers  sustained  injures.  NTSB  found  that  the  failure  of  the 
driver, who was unfamiliar with the bus, to correctly mon-
itor  the  service  brake  air  pressure  gauge,  recognize  the 
loss of air, and take appropriate action caused the crash. 

A  tractor-trailer  collided  with  a  motorcoach  carrying  20 
passengers.  The  truck  driver  and  bus  driver  were  killed. 
Most of the passengers were injured. NTSB found that the 
failure of the truck driver to operate at a proper speed for 
safe driving was the cause of the crash. 

Motorcoach ran off the road, overrode a guardrail and col-
lided with a bridge column. The driver and 12 passengers 
were killed, 33 passengers were injured. NTSB found that 
there should have been a better evacuation system. 

A  tractor-trailer  carrying  propylene  sideswiped  a  motor-
coach, carrying no passengers. NTSB found that the cause 
of  the  crash  was  the  evasive  steering  and  skidding  of  the 
bus into the tractor-trailer. 

Motorcoach  traveled  straight  through  a  right  curve, 
crashed into a median barrier rail, rotated across opposite 
lanes  and  vaulted  off  of  the  highway.  Motorcoach  driver 
was  fatigued.  3  passengers  were  killed,  39  injured.  NTSB 
found that if all passengers used restraints the number of 
passengers ejected from the bus would have been reduced. 

Motorcoach carrying 27 passengers hit a truck head-on as 
the  bus  attempted  to  pass  a  vehicle  on  a  two-lane  high-
way. The truck driver, bus driver and 12 passengers were 
killed,  and  14  passengers  injured.  9  passengers  had  been 
ejected.  NTSB  found  that  the  cause  of  this  crash  was  the 
bus driver attempting to pass without unobstructed clear- 
sight distance ahead, and the bus driver’s failure to avoid 
the truck, for unknown reasons. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

Date of Crash 

Location 

Description 

61 

October 10, 1971 

Marshfield, MO 

July 15, 1970 

New Smithville, PA 

June 9, 1970 

Dulles Airport Access 
Road, VA 

Nov. 24, 1969 

Petersburg, IN 

Dec. 26, 1968 

Beaver Falls, PA 

March 7, 1968 

Baker, CA 

Motorcoach  carrying  37  passengers  hit  the  left  side  of  a 
station  wagon  in  oncoming  traffic  and  rolled  over,  coming 
to rest on its side. 4 passengers were killed, including one 
who  had  been  ejected,  and  two  others  where  the  roof  had 
collapsed.  NTSB  found  that  the  crash  was  caused  by  the 
unlawful  maneuvering  of  the  station  wagon  on  a  limited- 
access highway by a driver under the influence of alcohol, 
and the delayed action by the bus driver. 

Motorcoach  started  to  slide  on  a  wet  highway  and  went 
into  a  180-degree  turn,  through  a  guardrail  and  down  an 
embankment  where  it  overturned.  18  people  were  ejected 
and  6  of  them  pinned  under  the  bus.  7  passengers  were 
killed.  NTSB  found  that  hydroplaning  of  the  front  wheels 
of  the  bus  that  initiated  a  skid  from  which  the  driver 
could not recover was the cause of the crash. 

Sedan  driven  by  a  driver  who  was  under  the  influence  of 
alcohol,  driving  on  the  wrong  side  of  the  highway,  struck 
motorcoach.  The  bus  went  into  a  skid,  and  finally  rested 
on  the  median.  One  passenger  died  20  days  after  the 
crash  due  to  crash-related  injuries.  The  driver  of  the 
sedan  was  killed.  NTSB  found  that  the  driver  going  the 
wrong way and driving under the influence of alcohol was 
the cause of the crash. 

Motorcoach carrying 27 passengers struck a passenger ve-
hicle  that  he  thought  was  entering  the  highway  at  a  dif-
ferent  area.  There  was  heavy  fog.  The  bus  skidded  and 
rolled, coming to rest on an embankment. One infant pas-
senger  of  the  bus  was  killed,  and  only  three  passengers 
had  injuries.  NTSB  found  that  the  bus  driver  misjudged 
the location of the passenger vehicle in the fog, and exces-
sive speed of the bus were causes of the crash. 

Motorcoach  ran  off  the  road  to  the  right,  overcorrected  on 
the  left,  went  off  the  road  again  on  the  right  and  another 
correction  made  the  bus  vault  and  roll  over  onto  its  roof. 
Then it slid down a drainage gully. 3 passengers died, and 
others sustained injuries. NTSB found that if occupant re-
straints had been used, it would have reduced the number 
and severity of injuries. 

Motorcoach was hit head-on by a passenger vehicle driven 
by  an  intoxicated  driver.  The  bus  overturned  and  then 
caught  on  fire.  19  passengers  died.  NTSB  recommended 
that all passengers and drivers on buses use restraints. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. They will be put in the record. Thank you. 
Ms. GILLAN. Thank you. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Forman? 

STATEMENT OF STEPHEN FORMAN, 

WEST BROOK BUS CRASH FAMILIES, BEAUMONT, TEXAS 

Mr.  FORMAN.  Good  afternoon,  Senator,  and  I  appreciate  the  op-
portunity to be able to speak on behalf of parents and victims this 
morning.  I  am  here  on  behalf  of  the  West  Brook  Bus  Crash  Fami-
lies.  I  am  the  father  of  Allison  Forman  who  was  severely  injured 
in the crash. 

Today I want to share with you what I call the reality of unsafe 
motorcoaches.  It  is  a  reality  that  has  been  known  but  ignored  for 
too long. It is a reality that has resulted in needless deaths and in-
juries,  millions  of  dollars  in  losses.  It  is  a  reality  that  the  lack  of 
seat  belts  and  basic  occupant  protection  in  these  motorcoaches 
killed our daughters, maimed and injured our daughters. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

62 

I want to share a little bit about our reality, the reality that both 
our children and our families faced, and then I would like to, hope-
fully  within  the  time  limit,  just  show  you  graphically—graphi-
cally—what  they  faced  because  we  now  have  pictures  of  exactly 
what our children and every other passenger faces in a motorcoach 
accident. 

My hope is that you and the other Members of Congress will say 
enough  is  enough.  We  waited  too  long.  I  want  to  try  to  convince 
you to create a new reality and that is safe motorcoaches. 

Our reality began March 29, 2006. The motorcoach bus that was 
transporting 23 of our daughters and their two coaches to a playoff 
game  in  Houston,  Texas  overturned,  killing  two  of  our  children, 
maiming  and  injuring  the  others.  Alicia  and  Ashley  were  ejected 
from  the  motorcoach  and  crushed.  There  were  no  seat  belts  on  the 
bus. There was no glazed windows keeping them or retaining them 
within the bus. When they came out of their seats and were thrown 
from  their  seats  because  of  lack  of  seat  belts,  there  was  no  glass. 
The bus had turned on its side. 

Devon  and  Allison  were  also  ejected  violently  from  their  seats. 
Their  left  arms—and  Devon  and  Allison  are  here—as  their  bodies 
were ejected out the bus when the bus turned over on its side, were 
dragged  under  the  bus,  dragged  along  the  pavement  until  the  bus 
ended  up  in  a  ditch.  And  there  they  were  trapped  under  the  bus 
for  over  an  hour.  My  daughter  was  upside  down  in  a  headstand. 
Devon  was  in  a  fire  ant  bed.  Still  alive,  they  were  pinned  under 
the bus. It took rescuers over an hour to free them. 

Young  Sarah’s  ear  was  torn  from  her  head,  her  head  violently 
gashed. Shoulders, ribs, knees cracked, glass shards the size of fists 
literally, because I saw them as they were surgically removed, were 
removed  from  their  backs  and  their  legs.  Their  beautiful  young 
faces will be scarred forever. 

In the immediate aftermath, some girls attempted to revive their 
dead  teammates.  Others  tried  to  free  Allison  and  Devon  and  com-
fort  them  in  their  pain.  Still  others  tried  to  lead  the  wounded  to 
rescue.  Blood  and  tears  mixed  with  mud  and  raindrops.  As  a  par-
ent, I frankly shudder from the horror of that scene. 

We  buried  our  precious  Ashley  and  Alicia.  Of  the  21  survivors, 
all received medical treatment of some kind. The more seriously in-
jured  spent  a  combined  total  of  86  days  in  the  hospital,  including 
intensive  care.  Four  of  the  girls  have  endured  a  combined  18  sur-
geries  to  save  and  in  some  way  rebuild  their  maimed  bodies.  Over 
8 months of school instructional days were missed prior to the close 
of that school year. Literally millions of dollars in medical expenses 
have been expended, and those costs continue. 

Chairman,  I  would  like  to,  if  I  can,—this  idea  that  we  need  to 
study more is hollow to parents. We know what the risk is. NHTSA 
knows  what  the  risk  is.  It  is  a  killer  combination.  It  is  the  high 
risk  of  rollover  and  frontal  collision  that  throws  you  out  of  your 
seat and the lack of basic occupant protections to keep you in your 
seat.  It  is  not  rocket  science.  I  was  shocked  when  we  got  into  this 
and  saw  the  NHTSA  statistics  from  1996  to  2005.  They  have 
known  these  statistics.  65  percent  single  vehicle  accidents.  70  per-
cent  of  all  fatality  crashes,  rollover  or  roadside  where  the  bus  just 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

63 

runs  off  the  road  and  hits  something.  70  percent  of  the  fatalities 
in rollover crashes by ejection. We have known this. 

I want to show you this video, and this is in a school bus. When 
we first saw this video, this is what happens when a bus rolls over 
without  seat  belts.  Those  are  our  children.  Our  children  told  us 
that as they were flying—when the bus rolled over on its side, the 
glass shattered and exploded, and the glass shards were coming up 
as they were falling down toward the pavement. And the glass col-
lided  with  faces,  with  bodies.  My  daughter  was  on  the  bottom  of 
that  pile.  Those  two  girls  that  were  killed  would  have  been  on  the 
bottom of that pile. 

Parents  ask  me  what  can  I  do  to  keep  my  child  safe  when  they 
have  to  get  on  a  motorcoach.  I  say  ride  in  the  aisle  seat  because 
at  least  you  will  have  a  body  underneath  you.  I  hate  to  say  that. 
Let me show you one other. They talked about the NHTSA crash 
testing.  Again,  it  is  not  rocket  science.  I  love  it  when  I  go  on 
NHTSA’s  website  and  I  find  a  NHTSA  flyer  from  2001  that  says 
a  body  that  is  in  motion  continues  in  motion  until  acted  upon  by 
another  body  that  is  stopped.  If  that  is  the  dashboard,  if  that  is 
your dashboard, then that is what is going to stop you. 

I want you to see what their own crash testing showed. The ones 
in  the  seat  in  front  are  in  the  three-point  lap  belt  seat  belt.  The 
ones  obviously  not  belted  fly  out.  That  is  a  frontal  crash.  Imagine 
taking that, combining it with the rollover. Why do you think there 
are so many deaths caused by ejection? 

This shocked me. This is the aftermath of their own testing. That 
is what it looks like inside of the bus on a 30 mile an hour frontal 
crash.  Now  put  the  faces  of  our  children  on  those  crash  dummies. 
Obviously,  we  know  the  result.  The  remedy  is  this  bill.  As  par-

ents, I find that this is a comprehensive bill. 

Yes,  there  is  an  oversight  issue,  and  I  would  like  to  quickly  ad-
dress  that.  Our  carrier  was  in  full  compliance  with  DOT  motor-
coach  provisions  and,  in  fact,  signed  an  affidavit  that  they  met  all 
DOT  provisions  to  our  school  when  our  school  hired  it.  What  they 
did  not  tell  our  school  was  that  they  did  not  meet  the  standards 
that are designed to carry children because they do not have to tell 
our school district that. They do not have to meet the requirements 
that  Congress  enacted  in  1974  to  protect  school  children.  And  I 
think  that  is  just  a  misrepresentation  by  the  industry  that  has  as 
a  keynote  speaker  at  their  latest  conference  targeting  school  dis-
tricts how to increase your market share. 

Of  course,  we  do  not  have  to  wait  for  any  more  studies.  NHTSA 
has been doing this study since 2002. A 70 percent reduction in fa-
talities estimated, and that is what they apply to all crashes. They 
have been doing it since 2002—crash fatalities with respect to roll-
overs.  45  to  51  percent  in  frontal  crash.  So  why  we  have  to  have 
all  this  additional  testing  is  beyond  me.  It  has  been  scientifically 
proven. 

Of course, I love this from a NHTSA presentation just this sum-
mer.  Dummies  stay  in  their  seat.  Every  parent  knows  that.  That 
is why we buckle up our children every day of the year. 

Senator  I  just  call  for  a  new  reality.  I  call  for  the  Congress  to 
have the political courage to make this a new reality. I call for the 
industry  to  stand  behind  their  product  and  do  something.  I  would 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

64 

dare  say  that  if  the  industry  would  build  these  safety  protections 
into their buses, parents would buy that operator’s bus as opposed 
to the ones that were not. 

But we cannot wait on the industry. We have to protect our chil-
dren  now.  The  standards  are  there.  We  do  not  have  to  create  new 
standards.  We  have  FMV210.  We  have  FMV220.  The  people  from 
NHTSA  know  what  I  am  talking  about.  They  need  to  adjust  those 
for  motorcoaches,  and  Congress  needs  to  require  these  occupant 
protections to save our children now. 

Thank you, Senator. 
[Applause.] 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Forman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEPHEN FORMAN, 

WEST BROOK BUS CRASH FAMILIES, BEAUMONT, TEXAS 

Our  Reality:  We  are  the  families  of  the  Beaumont  West  Brook  High  School  girls’ 
soccer  team.  On  the  afternoon  of  March  29,  2006,  the  motorcoach  bus  transporting 
23 of our daughters and their two coaches to a playoff game in Houston overturned, 
killing two of our children and maiming and injuring the others. 

The  motorcoach  that  carried  our  daughters  did  not  have  seatbelts  of  any  kind. 
The oversized windows, making up approximately 50 percent of the side area of the 
bus,  were  not  impact  resistant,  had  no  ‘‘glazing’’  and  were  merely  glued  to  the  out-
side  of  the  bus  as  opposed  to  being  installed  in  a  framework.  When,  according  to 
the  preliminary  DPS  report,  the  bus  driver  took  ‘‘faulty  evasive  action,’’  the  bus 
rolled over on its left side and 25 passengers were thrown from their seats. The win-
dows  shattered  into  shards  of  glass.  Bodies,  equipment,  books,  purses,  even  seats 
flew through the air landing on each other in a tumult of glass and asphalt. As the 
bus slid toward the ditch, our children were pummeled as if they were in a washing 
machine spin cycle. 

Ashley  and  Alicia  were  ejected  from  the  motorcoach  and  crushed,  their  bodies 
coming  to  rest  under  the  debris.  Devin  and  Allison  were  ejected,  their  left  arms 
sucked  under  the  frame  of  the  bus  and  their  bodies  dragged  beneath  the  bus  as  it 
skidded,  mangling  each  of  their  left  arms  and  causing  serious  head  injuries.  Still 
alive,  both  girls  were  pinned  underneath  the  bus.  Devin  was  trapped  in  a  bed  of 
fire  ants.  Allison  was  pinned  upside  down  in  a  headstand.  It  took  rescuers  over  an 
hour  to  free  them.  Sarah’s  ear  was  torn  from  her  head,  her  head  violently  gashed. 
Shoulders, ribs and knees cracked, glass shards the size of fists lodged in backs and 
legs, the beautiful faces of youth shredded on the pavement. 

In  the  immediate  aftermath,  some  girls  attempted  to  revive  their  dead  team-
mates.  Others  tried  to  free  their  trapped  friends  and  comfort  them  in  their  pain. 
Still  others  tried  to  lead  the  wounded  to  rescue.  Blood  and  tears  mixed  with  mud 
and raindrops. As parents, we shudder at the horror of the scene. 

We  buried  our  precious  Ashley  and  Alicia.  Of  the  21  survivors,  all  received  med-
ical  treatment  of  some  kind.  The  more  seriously  injured  spent  a  combined  total  of 
86  days  in  the  hospital  including  intensive  care.  Four  of  the  girls  have  endured  a 
combined 16 surgeries to save and in some way rebuild bodies maimed by the acci-
dent.  Over  8  months  of  school  instructional  days  were  missed  prior  to  the  close  of 
the  school  year.  Literally  millions  of  dollars  in  medical  expenses  have  been  ex-
pended and those costs continue. 

Devin’s  arm  was  amputated.  For  Allison,  her  left  elbow  was  crushed  and  is  use-
less. She has minimal use of her left hand. There were multiple head injuries, some 
requiring plastic surgery and stitches. For some, the ‘‘road rash,’’ pieces of glass and 
asphalt  imbedded  in  flesh,  was  so  severe  that  it  had  to  be  removed  by  surgery  or 
by  a  special  hydraulic  procedure  under  anesthesia.  There  have  been  hours  of  phys-
ical  therapy,  thousands  of  stitches,  bandages,  crutches  and  wheelchairs.  And  there 
has  been  pain—lots  of  pain—both  physical  and  emotional.  The  girls,  their  families 
and  coaches  have  spent  hours  in  counseling  and  therapy  sessions.  As  one  can  ex-
pect, both the physical and emotional scars of the tragedy will last a lifetime. 

The  Risk:  After  the  crash,  we  learned  that  charter  buses  hired  by  schools  (often 
under  pressure  from  parents,  coaches  and  teachers)  do  not  meet  ‘‘crashworthiness’’ 
standards  required  by  Congress  for  school  buses.  Those  standards,  which  became 
law  in  1977,  added  structural  frame,  roof  and  seat  requirements  ‘‘to  protect  our 
most precious cargo, the children of our future.’’ The structural requirements forced 
school  bus  windows  to  be  small  and  rigidly  framed  offering  less  chance  of  ejection. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

65 

Seatbelts in school buses was debated, but because of money and technology issues, 
never  implemented.  It  was  never  contemplated  that  charters  would  transport  school 
children like they do today. 

Unfortunately, times have changed, but the law has not. Nor has the bus industry 
voluntarily.  The  NTSB  has  recommended,  on  several  occasions  since  1977,  that 
crash  protections  be  required  of  motorcoaches  including  body  and  roof  structural 
support,  safety  windows  and  seatbelts.  In  1999,  the  NTSB  made  the  addition  of 
safety  belts  and  roof  crush  protections  part  of  their  ‘‘Most  Wanted’’  safety  improve-
ment list. NTSB reiterated recommendations in there July 8, 2008 report on Atlanta 
Bluffton Baseball Team crash stating 1 ‘‘Contributing to the severity of the accident 
was the motorcoach’s lack of an adequate occupant protection system.’’ 

But  still,  almost  10  years  after  becoming  ‘‘Most  Wanted’’,  powerful  industry  lob-
bies  have  successfully  kept  these  protections  from  being  added  to  motorcoaches.  At 
the  same  time,  the  industry  continues  to  ‘‘target’’  school  districts,  churches  and 
other  youth  organizations.  (At  the  2007  Motorcoach  Expo  one  seminar  was  entitled 
‘‘Targeting School Districts, How to Increase Your Market Share.’’) 

Sadly,  structural  protections,  safer  windows,  even  lap-shoulder  seatbelts,  are 
readily available for motorcoaches, but bus manufacturers and operators in the U.S. 
don’t install them to save money. (Buses in European Union and Australia have had 
these  protections  for  10  years!)  As  an  expert  for  the  Texas  Association  of  Pupil 
Transportation recently testified before the Texas House Transportation Committee, 
‘‘these buses [chartered motorcoaches] are designed for comfort, not safety.’’ Charter 
buses look massive and have an appearance of safety, but don’t be fooled. 

Motorcoach  operators  do  not  inform  schools  (or  parents)  that  their  buses  lack 
crash protection. Yet, they sell their buses for long distance, highway speed travel— 
the maximum accident risk! And forget about recourse. Even though charters carry 
55  to  60  persons  at  a  time,  operators  are  only  required  to  carry  insurance  limits 
of $5 million, nowhere near adequate liability should a crash occur. 

The  bus  industry  attempts  to  justify  their  conduct  with  a  good  (thankfully)  acci-
dent-per-miles-driven safety record. What they won’t share is the high injury/death- 
per-accident  result.  Charter  bus  accidents  can  and  will  continue  to  happen,  espe-
cially given our ever more dangerous and complex highways. When they do, the re-
sult is catastrophic. Our accident is case-in-point. 

The  Remedy:  The  Brown-Hutchison  Bill  (S.  2326)  and  Lewis  House  Companion 
(H.R.  6747)  (Action,  not  delays  through  testing  as  found  in  H.R.  4690)  provide  the 
needed impetus to require NHTSA to mandate these need safety reforms. Congress 
has  allowed  this  inaction  to  continue  long  enough.  No  more  adults  and  children 
should  die  or  be  injured  as  a  result  of  the  motorcoaches  failure  to  implement  these 
basic safety standard. The Bill: 

• Applies to new buses purchased with exceptions 
• Regulations w/in 1 year 

» Safety belts (retrofit in 2–5 years depending on hardship) 
» Advanced window glazing to prevent ejection 
» Firefighting Equipment (retrofit in 2–5 years ) 

• Regulations w/in 2 years 

» Compartmentalization and Impact protection 
» Stability control 
» Roof Strength—Crush Resistance 
» Enhanced Conspicuity 
» Smoke and Fire Suppression (retrofit in 2–5 years) 
» Improved Passenger Evacuation/Lighting 

• Regulations w/in 3 years 

» Adaptive Cruise Control/Collision Warnings 
» Automatic Fire Suppression 

• Test Reports 
• Improved Carrier Oversight 
• Stricter Driver Training/Licensing/Requirements 
• Better Bus Inspection Programs 
• Financial Incentive for Small Operator Compliance (H.R. 6747) 

1 See http://www.ntsb.gov/Publictn/2008/HAR0801.htm 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

66 

The  provisions  of  the  Bill  are  strong  and  reasonable.  The  Bill  says  ‘‘Enough  is 
enough’’.  It  is  obvious  that  neither  industry  not  the  DOT  will  take  action  without 
Congressional  mandate.  Congress  must  act  before  more  are  killed  and  injured.  As 
advocates  for  safer  student  transportation,  we  also  ask  Congress  to  close  the  ‘‘non- 
conforming’’  loophole  that  allows  motorcoaches  to  be  used  for  school  ‘‘activities’’  (as 
opposed  to  school  commutes)  until  they  meet  the  same  safety  requirements  that 
Congress enacted for our school children in 1974. 

No  more  parents,  students,  passengers  should  face  the  risk  that  became  our  hor-
rible  reality.  The  risk  is  real,  the  result  is  real,  and  the  remedy  is  available  and 
reasonable.  It  is  time  for  Congress  to  have  the  political  courage  to  make  a  new  re-
ality—a reality of safe motorcoaches for all. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Forman.  Your 
testimony  reveals  so  much  of  the  sadness,  the  anguish  that  any  of 
us who are a parent or know young people and treasure their lives 
so much. When I listened to your recounting of what happened that 
fateful  day,  it  is  something  that  we  have  to  respect  and  get  on 
with. 

You heard my question before, you know, why do we have to wait 
until 2010 for things that we know can make a difference? And we 
will talk to Mr. Pantuso about this. 

Mr. BETTS. Thank you again, Mr. Forman. Mr. Betts, please. 

STATEMENT OF JOHN BETTS, MOTORCOACH SAFETY NOW 
Mr.  BETTS.  Yes,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  for  this  opportunity. 
We, the families of those who have needlessly died or have suffered 
serious and permanent injuries, are here to thank the Senate Sur-
face  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure,  Safety, 
and  Security  Subcommittee  for  holding  this  oversight  hearing  on 
motorcoach  safety  and  the  need  to  pass  Senate  bill  2326,  a  critical 
piece of motorcoach safety legislation. 

I  am  John  Betts,  father  to  David  Betts,  who  died  March  2,  2007 
in  a  motorcoach  crash  on  North  Side  Drive  in  Atlanta,  along  with 
Zachary Arend, Scott Harmon, Cody Holp, Tyler Williams, and the 
bus  driver  and  his  wife.  The  motorcoach  was  traveling  to  Florida 
for  the  Bluffton  University  baseball  spring  trip.  Many  of  the  play-
ers  and  coaches  were  and  still  are  seriously  and  permanently  dis-
abled. 

David  was  a  20-year-old  sophomore  honor  student  who  loved  to 
play and compete. Though David was academically, musically, and 
athletically gifted, his greatest attribute was his heart. 

David  had  not  made  the  university  baseball  traveling  team  his 
freshman  year,  so  he  did  not  travel  with  the  team  to  Florida  in 
2006.  He  was  determined  to  not  only  make  the  traveling  team  his 
sophomore  year,  but  to  be  the  starting  second  baseman.  The  day 
before  they  left  for  Florida  in  the  spring  of  2007,  he  was  told  he 
would  be  the  starting  second  baseman.  David  never  told  us  he 
would be starting. He wanted to surprise his family. 

I tell you this story not only as a testimony to David’s determina-
tion but to illustrate the excitement and anticipation he felt. I was 
also  happily  anticipating  seeing  David  play  with  the  passion  he 
had for the game he loved. That eager anticipation turned into the 
darkest day of my life. 

While waiting in the Dayton airport, I looked up at a TV monitor 
and  saw  a  motorcoach  on  its  side.  It  had  been  identified  as  a  bus 
with  Little  League  players  that  had  crashed  in  Atlanta.  The  sense 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

67 

of  dread  I  felt  was  confirmed  when  I  arrived  in  Charlotte  and  dis-
covered  it  was  the  Bluffton  baseball  team.  At  least  six  were  con-
firmed dead, and many were seriously injured. 

As I rerouted my flight and arrived in to Atlanta, I rushed to the 
hospital  trying  to  find  David.  I  was  told  that  he  might  be  one  of 
the dead, and I would need to go to the morgue to identify his body. 
There  I  found  my  son  with  swollen,  discolored  eyes  and  multiple 
lacerations and bruises. 

I  returned  to  the  hospital  and  made  a  promise  to  the  surviving 
boys  that  because  David  was  so  good,  something  good  would  come 
out of this tragedy. Later I amended to include all those who died. 

Bluffton is but one of many such motorcoach tragedies. 
We  believe  2326  is  the  good  we  seek.  We  believe  this  legislation 
will drastically decrease the possibility of future death and serious 
injury  due  to  lack  of  basic  lifesaving  occupant  safety  features  on 
motorcoaches.  The  apathy  toward  these  changes  is  a  true  tragedy. 
As the apathy continues and the motorcoach industry grows, so will 
and has the death and serious injury toll. 

The  motorcoach  industry  is  now  transporting  over  630  million 
passengers  per  year  which  rivals  the  airline  industry.  There  are 
over 3,700 motorcoach companies and over 34,000 motorcoaches op-
erating  on  our  highways.  Yet,  the  United  States  Department  of 
Transportation  does  not  require  that  motorcoaches  have  the  same 
occupant safety protection features that are routinely designed and 
required in most other major modes of transportation. 

An  average  motorcoach  is  approximately  50  feet  long,  12  feet 
high,  8  feet  wide,  and  24  tons.  It  is  made  up  of  about  one-third  of 
non-safety  glass  and  travels  the  vast  majority  of  the  time  at  65  to 
75  miles  an  hour  carrying  our  most  fragile  cargo,  such  as  young 
people  and  senior  citizens.  The  size  of  a  motorcoach  gives  you  a 
sense  of  security,  but  motorcoaches  are  heavy,  unstable,  fast-mov-
ing projectiles. 

Though  crashes  may  never  be  100  percent  preventable,  we  can 
drastically reduce death and serious injury by having the standard 
occupancy protection devices called for in 2326. 

Both  Europe  and  Australia  are  decades  ahead  on  this  issue.  A 
10-year study was just completed that found Australia has not had 
one motorcoach death from anyone wearing a three-point restraint, 
which is a standard requirement in their motorcoaches. 

Our own National Transportation Safety Board has been making 
recommendations to no avail for at least the past decade, the occu-
pant safety features included in 2326. 

I ask you how you would feel if 1 week after you buried your son, 
you  read  the  NTSB’s  1999  bus  crash  worthiness  report,  which 
called  for  the  very  occupant  safety  features  that  could  have  saved 
your son’s life. And 2 weeks after that, you found out that the very 
motorcoach  he  was  riding  on  was  manufactured  by  a  company  in 
Europe  that  has  made  motorcoaches  with  those  same  safety  fea-
tures. 

And  now  I  learn  today  from  Mr.  Kelly  that  this  can  be  accom-
plished  in  a  2-year  period.  That  means  in  2001  those  safety  belts 
could  have  been  on  that  motorcoach  that  my  son  was  on,  and  he 
would  be  here  today.  And  I  appreciate  his  testimony  to  that  fact. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

68 

There  is  no  need  to  perpetuate  the  pain  of  having  a  loved  one 
killed  or  permanently  disabled  in  such  an  easily  preventable  man-
ner.  This  country  needs  to  pass  2326  to  direct  the  Department  of 
Transportation  to  implement  the  NTSB  recommendations  that 
have been ignored far too long to the detriment of public safety. 

As the legislative process unfolds, you may see opposition to this 
common  sense  legislation.  Let  me  briefly  address  what  I  believe 
may be the arguments against the bill. 

First, there are those who believe the U.S. Department of Trans-
portation  should  drive  the  change  in  motorcoach  safety  improve-
ments which could lead to redundant studies and waste more time 
at the expense of life. 

And second, there is no need to act because motorcoach transpor-
tation is one of the safest modes of transportation, which is no rea-
son not to strive to make motorcoach travel even safer. 

On  first  appearance,  these  seem  like  reasonable  arguments,  but 
a  closer  review  is  needed.  Due  to  time  constraints,  I  will  need  to 
direct you to my written statement to address these issues in more 
detail. 

Please  help  us  to  enact  2326  for  the  motorcoach  occupant  safety 
features  that  are  long  overdue.  It  is  literally  a  matter  of  life  and 
death. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  I  am  happy  to  answer 
any questions and look forward to working with this Committee on 
advancing legislation. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Betts follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN BETTS, MOTORCOACH SAFETY NOW 

We,  the  families  of  those  who  have  needlessly  died  or  have  suffered  serious  and 
permanent  injuries  are  here  to  thank  the  Senate  Surface  Transportation  and  Mer-
chant  Marine  Infrastructure,  Safety,  and  Security  Subcommittee  for  holding  this 
oversight  hearing  on  Motorcoach  safety  and  the  need  to  pass  Senate  Bill  2326,  a 
critical piece of motorcoach safety legislation. 

I  am  John  Betts,  father  to  David  Betts  who  died  March  2,  2007,  in  a  motorcoach 
crash on Northside Drive, in Atlanta, Georgia along with Zachary Arend, Scott Har-
mon,  Cody  Holp,  Tyler  Williams,  and  the  bus  driver  and  his  wife.  The  motorcoach 
was  traveling  to  Florida  for  the  Bluffton  University  Baseball  spring  trip.  Many  of 
the players and coaches were, and still are, seriously and permanently disabled. 

David  was  a  20-year-old  sophomore  honors  student  who  loved  to  play  and  com-
pete. Though David was academically, musically, and, athletically gifted his greatest 
attribute was his heart. 

David  had  not  made  the  University’s  baseball  traveling  team  his  freshman  year 
so  he  did  not  travel  with  the  team  to  Florida  in  2006.  He  was  determined  to  not 
only  make  the  traveling  team  his  sophomore  year  but  to  be  the  starting  second 
baseman. 

The  day  before  they  left  for  Florida  in  the  spring  of  2007  he  was  told  he  would 
be the starting second baseman. David never told us he would be starting; he want-
ed to surprise his family. 

I tell you this story not only as a testimony to David’s determination but to illus-
trate the excitement and anticipation he felt. I was also happily anticipating seeing 
David  play  with  the  passion  he  had  for  the  game  he  loved.  That  eager  anticipation 
turned into the darkest day of my life. 

While  waiting  in  the  Dayton  airport  I  looked  up  at  a  TV  monitor  and  saw  a  mo-
torcoach  on  its  side;  it  had  been  identified  as  a  bus  with  little  league  players  that 
had crashed in Atlanta. 

The  sense  of  dread  I  felt  was  confirmed  when  I  arrived  in  Charlotte  and  discov-
ered it was the Bluffton baseball team. At least six were confirmed dead and many 
were seriously injured. 

As I re-routed my flight and arrived in to Atlanta, I rushed to the hospital trying 
to  find  David.  I  was  told  he  might  be  one  of  the  dead  and  I  would  need  to  go  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

69 

the morgue to identify his body. There I found my son with swollen, discolored eyes 
and multiple lacerations and bruises. 

I returned to the hospital and made a promise to the surviving boys that because 
David was so good something good would come out of this tragedy. Later I amended 
that to include all those who died. 

Bluffton is but one of many such motorcoach tragedies. 
We believe S. 2326 is the good we seek; we believe this legislation will drastically 
decrease  the  possibility  of  future  death  and  serious  injury  due  to  lack  of  basic,  life-
saving occupant safety features on motorcoaches. The apathy toward these changes 
is  the  true  tragedy.  As  the  apathy  continues  and  the  motorcoach  industry  grows  so 
will, and has, the death and serious injury toll. 

The  motorcoach  industry  is  now  transporting  over  630  million  passengers  per 
year,  which  rivals  the  airline  industry.  There  are  over  3,700  motorcoach  companies 
and over 34,000 motorcoaches operating on our highways. Yet, the U.S. Department 
of  Transportation  does  not  require  that  motorcoaches  have  the  same  occupant  pro-
tection safety features that are routinely designed and required in most other major 
modes of transportation. 

An  average  motorcoach  is  approximately  50  feet  long,  12  feet  high,  8  feet  wide, 
and  24  tons.  It  is  made  up  of  1/3  non-safety  glass,  and  travels  the  vast  majority 
of  the  time  at  65  to  75  mph  carrying  our  most  fragile  cargo,  such  as  young  people 
and  senior  citizens.  The  size  of  a  motorcoach  gives  you  a  sense  of  security,  but 
motorcoaches are heavy, unstable, fast moving projectiles. 

Though  crashes  may  never  be  100  percent  preventable  we  can  drastically  reduce 
death and serious injury by having the standard occupancy protection devices called 
for  in  S.  2326.  Both  Europe  and  Australia  are  decades  ahead  on  this  issue;  a  10- 
year  study  was  just  completed  that  found  Australia  has  not  had  one  motorcoach 
death from anyone wearing a three-point restraint, which is a standard requirement 
in their motorcoaches. 

Our  own  National  Transportation  and  Safety  Board  (NTSB)  has  been  recom-
mending,  to  no  avail,  for  at  least  the  past  decade  the  occupant  safety  features  in-
cluded  in  S.  2326.  These  recommendations  include  crash  avoidance  technologies  to 
prevent  rollovers;  ejection  prevention  safety  features  such  as  seatbelts,  advanced 
window glazing and increased roof strength; fire protection advancements; more eas-
ily accessible passenger evacuation routes; and driver training and other operational 
updates that ensure motorcoach operator compliance. 

I  ask  you,  how  would  you  feel  if  1  week  after  you  buried  your  son  you  read  the 
NTSB’s  1999  bus  crashworthiness  report  which  called  for  the  very  occupant  safety 
features  that  could  have  saved  your  son’s  life?  Then,  2  weeks  after  that,  you  found 
out that the very motorcoach he was riding was manufactured by a company in Eu-
rope that has made motorcoaches with those same features for years? 

There  is  no  need  to  perpetuate  the  pain  of  having  a  loved  one  killed  or  perma-
nently  disabled  in  such  an  easily  preventable  manner;  this  country  needs  to  pass 
S.  2326  to  direct  the  Department  of  Transportation  to  implement  the  NTSB  rec-
ommendations that have been ignored far too long to the detriment of public safety. 
The  Senate  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  Committee  has  a  long  and 
proud history of supporting bi-partisan safety solutions to protect the American pub-
lic.  As  the  legislative  process  unfolds  you  may  see  opposition  to  this  commonsense 
legislation. Let me briefly address what I believe to be the major arguments against 
the bill. 

First,  there  are  those  who  believe  that  the  U.S.  DOT  should  drive  the  change  in 
motorcoach safety improvements and second, there is no need to act because motor-
coach transportation is one of the safest modes of transportation. 

On  first  appearance  these  seem  like  reasonable  arguments  but  a  closer  review  is 

needed, especially from the perspective of a father who has lost a child. 

Motorcoach  transportation  may  be  one  of  the  safest  modes  when  you  look  at  sta-
tistics  of  lives  lost  per  miles  traveled  compared  to  other  modes  of  transportation. 
However, as family members here today representing those who had a loved one die 
in  such  a  crash,  our  first  response  is  that  such  statistics  are  not  comforting.  As  a 
father,  am  I  to  disregard  David’s  death  as  his  being  one  of  the  unlucky  few?  As 
NTSB  recommendations  languish  here  in  the  United  States,  Europe  and  Australia 
have already required basic occupant safety protection measures such as seat belts. 
Many  of  us  flew  here  today  in  a  plane  that  had  a  seat  belt,  all  passenger  vehicles 
are  equipped  with  seat  belts  and  we  must  ask  why  has  the  government  and  indus-
try  delayed  in  making  seat  belts  available  on  motorcoaches?  The  U.S.  ought  to  be 
leading the world in motorcoach safety, not following. 

My second response is that you need to differentiate the crash from the outcome; 
that  is,  driver  error  and  highway  design  contributed  to  our  son’s  death.  However, 
the  lack  of  basic  occupant  restraints  led  to  his  and  many  other  ejections  that  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

70 

sulted  in  death  and  serious  injuries  from  being  tossed  around  like  they  were  in  a 
washing machine. 

My  third  response  is  that  motorcoach  travel  could  be  and  should  be  even  safer. 
Last  year  and  this  year  thus  far,  there  were  no  commercial  airline  crashes  in  the 
United States but that doesn’t mean we don’t continue to strive for the highest level 
of  safety  for  the  traveling  public.  This  increase  in  occupant  safety  technologies  is 
a  win-win.  That  is,  it  would  lead  to  fewer  deaths  and  injuries  and  decrease  the 
motor carriers’ insurance premiums. 

It is not necessary to study the problem further; indeed, we cannot afford to study 
the  problem  any  longer.  It  is  time  to  move  forward  with  legislation  giving  the  U.S. 
Department of Transportation direction and a timetable for action. 

The  NTSB  has  forty  years  of  field  reviews  of  motorcoach  accidents  and  NHTSA 
has  recently  (12/07)  performed  simulated  motorcoach  crash  and  rollover  tests  indi-
cating the need for three point restraints. 

Senate  Bill  2326  also  gives  reasonable  timeframes  for  addressing  safety  improve-

We  must  be  cautious  about  the  motives  of  those  who  request  more  study  on  that 
which  we  already  have  data.  Otherwise,  a  never-ending  data  gathering  game  will 
occur that unnecessarily increases timeframes and places more lives in jeopardy. 

This  past  18  months  a  nationwide  Internet  poll  has  found  a  75  percent  positive 
response to S. 2326. I have obtained well over 3,000 signed petitions from U.S. vot-
ers wanting this bill to pass. 

I  would  like  to  conclude  by  quoting  one  grieving  mother  whose  son  died  in  a  mo-
torcoach  crash  in  Utah  on  January  6,  2008.  I  believe  she  speaks  for  all  of  us  who 
have  lost  loved  ones  in  motorcoach  crashes.  ‘‘Had  there  been  seat  belts  on  that  bus 
my son would have had one on. In all probability he would still be alive. I am very 
passionate about this cause.’’ 

Please  help  us  to  enact  S.  2326  for  the  motorcoach  occupant  safety  features  that 

are long overdue, it is literally a matter of life and death. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify. I am happy to answer any questions and 

look forward to working with this Committee on advancing the legislation. 

ments. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Betts—— 
[Applause.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.—anything  by  way  of  a  longer  statement 

that you would like to make we will make some time. 

Mr.  BETTS.  Oh,  well,  that  was  very  nice  of  you.  One  of  the  big-

gest concerns I had was my verbosity and the time—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. It is not verbosity at all. 
Mr.  BETTS.  Well,  thank  you.  I  was  very  happy  that  that  timer 
was on outside of my sight. I took that as a presumption that I did 
not have to attend to that. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Your  testimony,  like  Mr.  Forman’s,  was 

very moving. 

Some  of  the  things  that  we  do  here  mystify  us  because  some 
things  are  as  obvious  as,  to  use  the  expression,  the  nose  on  your 
face,  and  yet  there  are  these  delays  and  procrastinations—they  do 
not get done. I mean, seat belts? You would not think of permitting 
your  child,  your  loved  one,  your  friend  to  get  in  your  car  and  not 
urge them to wear a seatbelt. If the buzzer does not go off, the bell 
does  not  go  off  in  your  car,  you  remind  them  out  of  just  your  con-
science. 

We  have  all  seen  accidents  where  a  seat  belt  was  not  worn  and 
the  consequence.  A  very  distinguished  attorney  that  was  a  good 
friend  of  mine  in  New  Jersey  went  just  a  couple  blocks  from  his 
office,  failed  to  put  on  his  seat  belt,  and  wound  up  in  an  accident 
that  crippled  him  for  the  remainder.  He  is  still  alive,  but  his  life 
is quite different as a result of being crippled. And all of his motor 
function is impaired. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

71 

So  we  thank  you  for  your  willingness  to  air  your  very  personal 
views  and  recognize  that  what  you  are  doing  is  contributing  to 
somebody  you  do  not  even  know,  some  family  that  you  have  never 
met.  I  know  that  Senator  Hutchison  feels  as  I  do.  We  have  to  get 
on with these things. Thank you. 

Mr.  Pantuso,  you  have  heard  this  testimony  and  obviously  are 
moved, as all of us are, as our friends at the table are, and the re-
sponse of those in the audience who saw this up front and personal 
in their own lives. 

What  are  the  top  safety  priorities  that  you  believe  that  we  have 
got to meet minimally—minimally? What can be done to hasten the 
actions  necessary  to  save  lives  and  reduce  injuries  and  ultimately, 
but  secondarily,  reduce  costs?  And  I  am  not  talking  about  the  per-
sonal  costs.  There  is  nothing  that  can  redeem  that  expenditure. 
You cannot replace a loved one or make them well again when they 
have been so seriously injured. 

What  would  you  say  ought  to  be—and  I  know  that  you  care 
about  the  passengers  you  carry.  What  would  you  say  ought  to  be 
the  first  things  done  that  are  minimally,  in  terms  of  time  and 
availability? What do you think we ought to do? 

Mr. PANTUSO. Mr. Chairman, thank you. Yes, we are very moved 
not only by the testimony, but by any accident, certainly any fatal-
ity that happens. 

The  motorcoach  industry  is  an  industry,  as  I  said  earlier,  made 
up  of  small  mom  and  pop  companies.  They  are  in  virtually  every 
community.  The  people  they  carry  are  their  neighbors,  their 
friends. 

What we have seen over the years has been a failure of Govern-
ment  to  act.  Plain  and  simple.  I  have  been  in  this  chair  at  the 
American  Bus  Association  as  their  CEO  for  more  than  a  decade, 
and for more than a decade, virtually every time there is a serious 
accident,  ABA  and  other  motorcoach  associations  have  gone  to 
NHTSA and said, please, please, do the testing necessary to answer 
the  question,  how  do  we  protect  the  occupants  on  board.  And  that 
has not happened until just last year. 

We  are  very,  very  grateful  that  it  is  going  on  now.  We  are  glad 
that NHTSA is in the testing mode. We are glad that they are look-
ing  at  roof  strength,  at  rollover,  at  occupant  protection,  that  they 
have  done  the  crash  test,  they  are  doing  the  sled  tests  and  that 
they are analyzing the millions of data points. And that is all that 
we can ask, but we have asked for it for a decade and it has taken 
that long to happen. 

I  think  that  the  real  critical  issue  that  can  be  dealt  with  imme-
diately  are  some  of  the  steps  that  were  outlined  by  Administrator 
Hill  and  again  that  we  have  asked  for  for  more  than  a  decade.  I 
remember  the  Mother’s  Day  crash  in  1998  in  New  Orleans  when 
more  than  20  individuals,  who  were  on  their  way  to  a  casino,  per-
ished  because  of  an  illegal  operation  and  an  illegal  driver.  That  to 
me is step number one. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. What can we do in the quickest fashion to 
offer  more  protection  than  we  do?  Collision  avoidance  is  a  great 
thing. It is technology. The buses have to be equipped and all kinds 
of  things  have  to  happen.  But  would  seat  belts  not  be  something 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

72 

fairly  easy  to  install  and  get  on  feeling  better  about  ourselves  and 
our obligations? 

Mr.  PANTUSO.  Well,  step  number  one,  Mr.  Chairman,  is  getting 
the  bad  operators  off  the  road.  That  has  got  to  be  first  and  fore-
most. That can be done tomorrow by this administration and by the 
State enforcement officials. 

Certainly  step  number  two  is  finding  what  the  occupant  protec-
tion system is that is going to work. Again, for more than a decade, 
we  have  said  the  most  important  part  is  to  keep  the  people  in  the 
coach,  keep  them  compartmentalized  in  the  seat,  make  sure  that 
the  windows  do  not  open  up  and  allow  the  individuals  to  go  out, 
make  sure  that  there  are  proper  windows,  whether  it  is  glazing  or 
whether  it  is  a  new  technology,  so  that  the  windows  do  not  break 
and the passengers—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I hear you, but these things require major 
change.  Am  I  wrong  to  suggest  that  if  we  could  get  seat  belts  in 
vehicles  that  we  could  avoid  some  of  the  tragedy  that  involves,  let 
us  say,  that  inevitable  action  that  could  come  along?  Would  that 
not be a good first move and put a plea out there to your members, 
to others on the basis of their costs of operation? I mean, insurance 
costs, I am sure, would go down and so forth. 

Mr. PANTUSO. Mr. Chairman, I do not think that you are wrong. 
I  mean,  I  have  a  seat  belt  in  my  car,  as  we  all  do.  I  buckle  up.  I 
am flying later today. There is a seat belt on the plane. 

The  question  is  to  what  standard  and  how  to  put  the  seat  belts 
in.  Again,  with  small  mom  and  pop  businesses  and  no  standard  to 
adhere  to  and  no  way  of  knowing  with  the  variety  of  coaches  that 
exist  out  there,  with  every  make  and  model  as  many  as  20  or  30 
years  old  and  different  seat  designs,  how  to  put  that  seat  belt  in 
and to do it in a way that is going to protect people and not further 
injure them. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  How  many  new  motorcoaches  are  brought 

into service a year in America? Do you know? 

Mr.  PANTUSO.  In  round  numbers,  between  2,000  and  2,500.  And 

again, that is out of a fleet of 35,000 to 40,000 coaches. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How many seats in the average bus? 
Mr.  PANTUSO.  Typically  50  or  a  little  more,  but  typically  50  on 

average. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. That is a lot of people. A lot of people. And 
if  it  was  possible  to  initiate  a  program  at  least  doing  that  much, 
I  think  it  is  a  cost  that  could  very  well  be  saved  on  the  financial 
side.  We  cannot  guarantee  that  something  still  terrible  would  not 
happen,  but  it  would  be  unlikely  that  deaths  would  not  go  down. 
Mr. PANTUSO. Mr. Chairman, I have never heard cost as an issue 
in the motorcoach industry, never had an operator question that as 
an  issue.  Again,  the  only  question  we  have  had  is  how  do  we  do 
it, and that is where we look to NHTSA. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. There is nobody in the industry that said, 
to  your  knowledge,  that  listen,  we  ought  to  get  on  with  this,  you 
know, why do we have to wait for more tests? As you said yourself, 
when  you  get  in  a  car,  you  get  in  an  airplane,  you  buckle  up.  It 
is second nature. 

[Applause.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

73 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Ms. Gillan, which of the safety issues that 
need improvement in the bus industry—also, I think this is a little 
diversionary.  It  is  a  question  about  the  trucking  industry.  I  am 
going to pass and we will submit it to you in writing. 

Ms. GILLAN. OK. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Because there is a lot that has to be done 
there,  but  it  is  not  the  same  sensitivity,  even  though  there  are  far 
more  terrible  accidents  involving  trucks.  But  I  do  not  know  how 
much  of  that  can  be  avoided,  but  there  are  things  that  we  can  do 
and  they  may  take  a  little  bit  longer  time.  But  we  ought  to  get  on 
with it. 

Mr.  FORMAN OR MR.  Betts,  I  do  not  have  to  ask  how  you  feel 
about the bus companies and the manufacturers. You have both ex-
pressed  frustration  at  not  having  had  the  opportunity  to  make  a 
difference  in  your  lives  by  lack  of  attention  to  the  safety  issues.  I 
think  it  is  redundant  to  ask  you  how  you  feel  about  these  compa-
nies that carry passengers without something. 

Do  you  think  we  ought  to  kind  of  rush  into  some  device  that 
might improve things? How do you feel about waiting for standards 
to be developed? 

Mr.  FORMAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  what  I  do  not  understand—what 
rang  hollow  to  me—the  standards  exist.  We  have  FMV210  which 
sets the performance standards for safety belts. If you are going to 
put  them  in,  that  is  the  standard  you  have  to  do.  They  have  an-
chorage standards. They have standards for lap-shoulder seat belts. 
In 2002, NHTSA did sled testing for seat belts in school buses. The 
physics is not any different. So they have the standard. 

As  I  understand  from  my  industry  contacts,  the  only  difference 
is  are  you  going  to  adopt  a  13G  seat  belt  versus  a  7G  seat  belt 
which  is  a  European  standard,  and  most  people  in  the  American 
industry—the  makers  of  these  restraint  systems—want  a  13G 
which is an FMV210 standard. 

So  this  idea  that  we  have  got  4  million  points  of  data  and  we 
have  got  to  go  back  and  analyze  them,  that  is  just  absolutely  a 
delay  tactic  and  hollow.  So  it  rings  hollow.  And  people  use  them. 
You know, our children in the school transportation, they did not 
have  a  choice.  In  other  words,  if  they  were  going  to  participate  on 
the baseball team or on the soccer team or on the band, they were 
going  to  ride  that  bus.  I  could  not,  as  a  parent,  take  them  off  that 
bus because it did not have seat belts. 

So  those  standards  exist.  We  know  that.  They  ought  to  be  ap-

plied to motorcoaches now. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Betts, do you want to—— 
Mr.  BETTS.  Yes.  As  it  relates  to  the  question  of  rushing  in,  I 
would  agree  with  Mr.  Pantuso.  I  do  not  think  you  rush  in.  In  the 
same  light,  in  the  Shuster  bill,  I  do  not  think  it  needs  to  take  18 
years. 

And I believe based on the information at least that I am seeing 
from the bus crash test that was done in December 2007 and based 
on the motorcoach that is sitting outside here that we saw, we tend 
to know already that that motorcoach, based on its ability to absorb 
force,  is  such  that  it  will  hold—the  seat  anchorage  system  will 
hold. So in my opinion—I agree with Mr. Forman—we do have not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

74 

only  the  technology,  we  now  have  the  data.  And  I  believe  we  need 
to go forward. 

What  I  really  would  not  like  seeing—and  I  am  sure  you  have 
picked  up  very  quickly  I  am  not  politically  oriented  nor,  quite 
frankly, driven. But if it is going to take 2 years of writing up and 
going  back  and  forth  in  the  House  and  Congress  and  this  kind  of 
stuff,  that  would  irritate  me  considerably  because  all  I  do  is  see 
more people dying and more people being permanently injured that 
do  not  need  to  be  when  we  already  have  the  data.  We  have  the 
science. If there is some piece of science that we do not need, I am 
open to listening to that. 

But  I  believe  what  Mr.  Forman—I  do  not  want  to  put  words  in 
his mouth, but I will tell you what is coming out of mine. I am 56 
years of age. I have been in administration for 34 years, and I have 
seen  a  lot  of  smoke  and  I  have  seen  some  fire.  And  I  believe  what 
you  do  is  you  ferret  out  and  differentiate  that  smoke  from  fire.  So 
I am certainly willing to listen if there is some science that is need-
ed. I just do not, at this point in time, have that. 

The second comment I would make to that is, you know, even on 
a  retrofit  of  a  bus  that  would  not  be  able  to  maybe  totally  with-
stand, my son—I know Mr. Forman mentioned about getting in an 
aisle  seat  and  my  wife  probably  cringed.  My  son  was  in  4C,  which 
is  an  aisle  seat.  He  was  propelled  out  of  his  seat  at  55  miles  an 
hour.  It  is  the  physics  of  the—whatever.  He  was  propelled  out  of 
his  seat  very  fast  and  stopped  very  hard  in  the  front  of  the  bus. 
I  will  tell  you  what.  You  take  me  back  in  time.  You  put  some 
mom and pop three-point seat restraint on that, and I am going to 
be  more  happy,  at  least  seeing  an  opportunity  not  to  be  flying.  He 
died  of  a  basal  skull  fracture  from  ear  to  ear.  I  am  thinking  if  he 
is  in  his  seat,  we  are  probably  not  going  to  have  that.  Could  there 
be other things? Mr. Pantuso, other people could say that. He could 
have  died  of  other  kinds  of  things.  Perhaps,  perhaps.  I  would  just 
as  soon  take  my  chance—prefer  to  take  my  chance  on  a  retrofit  so 
that  at  least  I  have  that  opportunity  not  to  go  flying  at  an  ex-
tremely high rate of speed and stop at an extremely quick decelera-
tion rate, to the extent that he also had an aortic tear. 

I  am  not  doing  this  for  emotion.  I  am  here  to—if  I  was,  I  would 
cry  like  I  did  about  10  minutes  ago.  But  I  am  doing  this  to  show 
that what is happening is when he stopped quickly, his heart went 
forward  and  went  this  way  and  ripped  the  aorta.  I  have  talked 
with  a  number  of  cardiac  surgeons.  They  said  that  quite  frankly, 
as  soon  as  that  occurred,  had  we  been  right  there  with  full  nurse 
and fully equipment, we could not have saved his life. 

So  I  am  thinking,  geez,  you  know,  the  seats  in  the  Bluffton  bus 
crash  were  all  intact.  I  am  thinking  my  son  is  in  his  seat.  The 
probability of him being intact is higher than him not being in that 
seat.  So  I  would  just  as  soon  have  a  retrofit  on  something  that 
maybe was not perfect, and on the new buses look at getting more 
of  the  seat  anchorage  system,  et  cetera,  because  I  think  at  least  it 
will decrease that amount. 

And  I  really  appreciate  your  comment,  Mr.  Chairman,  as  it  re-
lates to the other issue on the business side because I do not think 
the  motorcoach  industry  is  the  evil  empire.  They  are  a  business 
that  is  trying  to  operate.  And  in  my  opinion,  the  insurance  rates 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

75 

are  something  that  are  fairly  important  as  well  that  can  go  down 
with these safety features that are added. So it is not just a matter 
of decreasing death and serious injury. It is also a matter of assist-
ing them with their current insurance premiums. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Senator Hutchison, my apologies for running over, but you heard 

what I heard. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Yes, and I appreciate it. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. As painful as it is to our friends, it is pain-

ful to hear as well. Please. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Let  me  just  ask.  I  just  want  to  ask  Mr. 
Forman  for  the  record,  because  I  want  this  in  the  record.  Because 
of  his  determination  and  efforts,  we  do  have  a  law  in  Texas  that 
does protect our school children, and I would like for you to tell us 
because  it  was  your  efforts  really  that  I  think  spearheaded  this 
movement, exactly what you did in Texas that does assure that our 
young people, using school activity buses, will have seat belts. 

Mr.  FORMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator,  and  it  is  not  my  effort.  Our 
girls  were  a  team  and  the  parents  are  a  team  too.  So  it  is  a  lot 
of hard work from a lot of parents that are involved in this. 

Yes,  for  the  record,  in  2007,  Governor  Perry  signed  Ashley  and 
Alicia’s  Law  in  Texas,  which  requires  all  school  buses  to  have  lap- 
shoulder  seat  belts—all  newly  purchased  school  buses  to  have  lap- 
shoulder  seat  belts  beginning  in  2010,  September  2010,  and  all 
charter motorcoaches that carry students to have lap-shoulder seat 
belts  by  2011.  The  legislature  saw  that  the  technology  was  avail-
able. And with respect to both school buses and motorcoaches, that 
technology is available. 

There was a lead time given the industries to begin putting those 
in.  What  we  found  with  school  buses,  that  is  going  to  be  phased 
over a 10- to 12-year period with new buses because of the econom-
ics.  However,  for  the  motorcoach  industry,  that  economics—that  is 
a  profit-driven  industry.  That  is  not  public  funds.  There  is  abso-
lutely  no  reason  why  our  children  and  our  schools  are  being  sub-
jected to this risk. 

I think we were two votes short in the House of being unanimous 
and we had a unanimous Senate vote in Texas. Once they saw the 
videos,  once  they  saw  the  data  that  was  already  there,  the  stand-
ards  that  were  already  there,  they  said  this  is  what  we  want  for 
our State. We have a duty to protect our children, and NHTSA has 
finally  said  the  most  optimum  protection  is  a  lap-shoulder  seat 
belt. As the State legislature, they said this is what we need to do 
for our children. This is what we need to give peace of mind to our 
parents. 

If  I  could  add  just  briefly,  Senator,  the  only  place  today  that  a 
child  learns  not  to  wear  a  seat  belt  is  at  school.  Now,  when  you 
think  about  it,  because  parents  today—we  have  all  grown  up  with 
seat belts. We train our children from the minute they get in a car 
to have a restraint on. And the first time they ever get on any vehi-
cle  that  does  not  have  a  restraint  is  when  they  go  to  school. 
NHTSA  spends  millions  of  taxpayer  dollars  trying  to  educate  chil-
dren  to  put  on  seat  belts,  and  then  the  bell  rings  and  they  walk 
outside  on  a  school  bus  or  a  motorcoach  and  it  has  no  seat  belt. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

76 

We talked to a legislative aide in Texas. It was great because the 
young  aides—and  I  speak  to  the  staffers  behind  you—whose  chil-
dren are just entering school. The first grader came home and said, 
Mommy—you  know,  the  first  day  of  school  came  home  and  said, 
yes,  I  rode  the  bus  home  but  it  was  really  strange  because  where 
is the seat belt. Where is the seat belt? 

We  know  now  that  the  lowest  percentage—demographic  wearing 
seat belts is teens. That is about 10 or 15 points below national av-
erage  of  seat  belt  usage.  Now,  where  did  those  teens  learn  not  to 
wear  a  seat  belt?  Riding  school  buses  and  motorcoaches.  That  is 
the only place they could have learned. 

Something has got to get done. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. It defies logic. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Did you have something to add? 
Ms. GILLAN. Senator, can I just add something too? I would real-
ly like to dispel the notion that DOT is starting with a blank slate. 
A lot of the occupant protection technologies are already underway, 
are being studied at NHTSA. This Committee’s leadership resulted 
in SAFETEA–LU. They are looking at advanced window glazing for 
passenger  vehicles,  and  stronger  roofs.  They  are  doing  research  on 
crash  avoidance  technologies  for  large  trucks.  As  many  of  us  men-
tioned, Australia has had three-point seat belts for 14 years. 

So  it  is  not  as  though  nothing  has  been  done  and  none  of  these 
technologies have been looked at. What we need and what S. 2326 
does is it gives the agencies deadlines for moving forward with this. 
So  I  think  to  say,  well,  they  just  started  last  year  gives  a 
misimpression  that  nothing  has  been  done  when,  in  fact,  there  is 
a lot of work that has been done that has direct application to mo-
torcoach safety. 

Thank you. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you. 
Mr. Chairman, I just want to add one thing and that is that the 
people who have come here are all affected by Hurricane Ike. Beau-
mont  was  hit  and  so  was,  of  course,  the  Houston  area.  And  yet, 
these  people  who  mostly  do  not  have  power  in  their  homes  to  go 
back to felt so strongly about this that they kept their commitment. 
And  I  was  asked  by  the  Secretary  of  Homeland  Security  to  go 
with him to Houston and Galveston today and Beaumont and Port 
Arthur  and  Orange,  but  I  knew  if  I  did  not  come  here,  that  we 
would  not  have  the  same  kind  of  impetus  and  momentum  that  we 
just had to have. So I really appreciate your doing this. 

I  am  going  to  go  to  Beaumont  and  Port  Arthur  on  Monday  and 
Orange  to  try  to  take  care  of  that.  And  as  you  know,  I  have  been 
working  to  try  to  get  the  tax  relief,  which  we  are  going  to  get  for 
the bill that was already in place. But we have added Ike to it. 

So I just want to say that a lot of people are so committed to this 
that  we  want  to  move  it  forward,  and  I  hope  that  we  can  get  a 
markup  on  this  bill  and  at  the  earliest  moment  we  will  be  able  to 
pass  it.  And  if  there  are  legitimate  debates  or  amendments,  we 
want  to  be  open  for  that,  but  we  can  move.  There  are  some  basics 
here that can be done. 

So I thank all of you and I thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[Applause.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

77 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you.  I  like  millions  of  people  have 
seen  the  devastation  that  hit  Texas,  and  you  shake  your  head  in 
wonderment. How do people recover? We are not talking about this 
versus life or anything like that. But when your home is destroyed, 
the  memorabilia,  all  of  the  history  of  a  family  is  destroyed,  it  is 
very painful. We wish you and the people in Texas a sturdy recov-
ery. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you very much. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you. 
This Committee meeting is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4:32 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE UNITED MOTORCOACH ASSOCIATION 

Introduction 

The United Motorcoach Association (UMA), a thriving association of North Amer-
ican  bus  and  motorcoach  companies,  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  provide  testi-
mony  today  at  this  important  hearing.  Founded  in  1971,  our  1,300  plus  members 
range  in  size  from  small  independent  family  businesses  with  a  few  units  to  large 
corporate operations with diverse fleets and services. Our members are the Nation’s 
charter,  tour,  sightseeing  and  scheduled  service  operations  and  are  vital  to  many 
communities offering recreation, travel and tourism opportunities. The industry pro-
vides over 600 million passenger trips annually. 
Our Industry 

Of  the  nearly  3,600  bus  companies  in  the  United  States  representing  nearly 
40,000 buses, 90 percent of those companies are small businesses. The average com-
pany  employs  46  individuals  with  each  bus  and  motorcoach  representing  an  indus-
try  average  of  4.23  employees.  75  percent  of  the  industry  consists  of  fleets  of  fewer 
than  100  units  and  nearly  50  percent  of  the  industry  consists  of  fleets  24  units  or 
fewer. 
Our Regulatory Environment 

The bus and motorcoach industry operates under the oversight of the U.S. Depart-
ment  of  Transportation  and  authority  granted  by  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety 
Administration  (FMCSA).  The  FMCSA  conducts  periodic  Compliance  Reviews  of 
safety management programs, random safety inspections and maintains information 
regarding passenger carriers’ fiduciary responsibilities, such as insurance. A Compli-
ance  Review  is  an  on-site  examination  of  a  motor  carrier’s  records  and  operations 
to  determine  whether  the  carrier  meets  FMCSA  safety  fitness  standards,  i.e.,  are 
adequate safety management controls in place to ensure acceptable compliance with 
applicable  safety  requirements  to  reduce  risk.  Additionally,  our  buses  and 
motorcoaches are routinely inspected at operators’ facilities and at popular destina-
tions such as amusement parks, casinos, special events, etc. UMA strongly supports 
stronger  enforcement  activity  by  FMCSA  to  get  unsafe  operators  off  the  road  and 
implement  stricter  new  entrant  requirements  as  the  best  and  most  expedient  way 
to  improve  motorcoach  safety.  Every  bus  and  motorcoach  operating  legally  on  our 
Nation’s roads and highways must also conform to the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety 
Standards  established  by  the  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration 
(NHTSA). 
Our Industry’s Safety Record 

The bus and motorcoach industry has a remarkable safety record. In the past dec-
ade,  our  industry  has  experienced  an  average  of  fewer  than  23  fatalities  annually, 
despite operating in an environment, our Nation’s highways and roads, which expe-
riences  over  40,000  fatalities  annually  in  vehicular  accidents.  This  strong  safety 
record results from a combination of significant Federal regulatory oversight and an 
industry that treats safety as our economic lifeblood. Each accident, loss of life and 
injury,  no  matter  how  statistically  low,  is  always  one  too  many  and  UMA  partners 
with the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB), FMCSA and others to study 
measures  that  will  prevent  similar  accidents  from  reoccurring  and  convey  those  re-
sults to our members. 

UMA offers a number of services to operators and the public to maximize the safe-
ty  aspect  of  our  operations.  UMA  offers  the  public  a  detailed  online  ‘‘Consumer 
Guide  to  Purchasing  Motorcoach  Services’’  and  a  ‘‘Student’s  Guide’’  in  an  effort  to 
aid  the  consumer  in  the  selection  of  a  safe  and  reliable  bus  and  motorcoach  oper-
ator. UMA offers routine safety related assistance and seminars at our annual con-
ventions  and  hosts  an  annual  Safety  Management  Seminar  held  at  the  National 
Transportation Safety Board Academy in Ashburn, VA. UMA launched the Bus and 
Motorcoach  Academy  last  year,  the  first  of  its  kind  in  the  industry.  This  online 

(79) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

80 

Academy provides a curriculum of basic operational knowledge for owners, manage-
ment  and  our  industry’s  most  valuable  asset—our  drivers.  UMA  also  works  closely 
with  the  Bus  Industry  Safety  Council  and  the  Commercial  Vehicle  Safety  Alliance 
in continuing efforts to develop and propagate safe operating practices. 
Current Safety Issues and Legislation 

UMA worked closely with the late Congressman Paul Gillmor (R–OH) and subse-
quently Congressman Bill Shuster (R–PA) and Congresswoman Eddie Bernice John-
son  (D–TX)  to  develop  H.R.  4690,  comprehensive  legislation  rooted  in  research  and 
testing,  and  is  consistent  with  the  recommendations  of  the  NTSB  regarding  motor-
coach occupant protection. UMA has also joined in a coalition with many other enti-
ties  to  support  H.R.  3820  introduced  by  Congressman  Mike  Thompson  (D–CA)  and 
its  companion  measure,  S.  3428,  introduced  by  Senator  Debbie  Stabenow  (D–MI). 
‘‘The Commercial Motor Vehicle Advanced Technology Tax Act’’ would provide an in-
centive  approach  to  some  proven  new  safety  technologies.  UMA  commends  both  of 
these bills to the Committee’s consideration as you move forward with the reauthor-
ization process next year. 

Recently,  NHTSA  launched  a  new  motorcoach  crashworthiness  study  and  associ-
ated  testing.  UMA  supports  this  effort  and  eagerly  awaits  their  conclusions  as  we 
strongly  believe  any  new  safety  mandates  on  the  industry  should  be  based  on  com-
prehensive science, research and testing. It is important to note however, that most 
safety  enhancements  are  ‘‘engineered  in’’,  not  ‘‘added  on’’.  Much  consideration  must 
be  afforded  so  as  to  avoid  compromising  one  area  of  safety  for  another.  Whatever 
standards NHTSA may develop from this study and testing, UMA believes strongly 
that it should develop those standards for their installation on both new and retro-
fitted buses. 
Conclusion 

The  bus  and  motorcoach  industry  stands  proudly  by  our  safety  record  but  we 
never rest in the diligent pursuit of improving that record. Our very survival hinges 
on  those  pursuits.  UMA  stands  ready  to  assist  the  Committee,  Congress  and  our 
regulating  agencies  in  the  further  development  and  implementation  of  safe  oper-
ating  practices,  equipment  and  new  technologies  grounded  in  sound  science  and 
testing  to  further  improve  the  safety  for  our  customers.  Thank  you  for  the  oppor-
tunity to provide testimony to the Committee. 

ENHANCED PROTECTIVE GLASS AUTOMOTIVE ASSOCIATION (EPGAA) 

February 18, 2008 

Hon. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator Hutchison: 

I  am  writing  on  behalf  of  the  Enhanced  Protective  Glass  Automotive  Association 
(EPGAA)  to  express  support  for  legislation  you  recently  introduced,  the  Motorcoach 
Enhanced Safety Act of 2007 (S. 2326). 

The EPGAA is comprised of companies that manufacture laminated glass and the 
laminating  interlayer.  Its  purpose  is  to  provide  information  and  education  on  the 
development of laminated glass for added vehicle safety, security, and occupant com-
fort. EPGAA members include DuPont Automotive; Guardian Industries Corp.; PPG 
Industries, Inc.; Sekisui S-Lec America, LLC; and Solutia Inc. 

The EPGAA recognizes that safety is a function of overall vehicle design. It is the 
EPGAA’s  view  that  the  measures  mandated  in  S.  2326  will  help  protect  the  more 
than  630  million  passengers  currently  using  motorcoaches  for  travel.  The  National 
Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration  (NHTSA)  has  determined  that  more  than 
one-third of the deaths resulting from motorcoach crashes occur in rollovers. Accord-
ing  to  NHTSA,  more  than  half  the  deaths  in  motorcoach  crashes  are  the  result  of 
occupant  ejection.  S.  2326  would  require  manufacturers  to  use  advanced  glazing  as 
a safety countermeasure. 

Despite  several  recommendations  issued  by  the  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board since 1973, safety features such as safety belts and occupant ejection preven-
tion  countermeasures  (e.g.,  advanced  glazing  on  windows  other  than  windshields) 
have  yet  to  be  required  by  the  United  States  Department  of  Transportation.  Ad-
vanced  glazing  has  been  the  standard  for  windshield  applications  for  more  than  70 
years,  and  is  increasingly  being  used  voluntarily  for  other  window  openings.  Ad-
vanced glazing can be particularly important in motorcoaches as part of a total safe-
ty  system  because  the  windows  are  large  and  could  become  large  openings  during 
rollover events. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

81 

We  at  the  EPGAA  know  that  you  are  concerned  for  the  safety  of  the  millions  of 
Americans  that  take  advantage  of  motorcoach  travel  and  applaud  your  sponsorship 
of the Motorcoach Enhanced Safety Act of 2007. 

Please feel free to contact me for any additional information that may be helpful. 

Sincerely, 

PETER T. DISHART, 

President. 

Senate Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC. 
SUBJECT:  SENATE COMMERCE,  SCIENCE AND TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE BILL 

S. 2326 AND OVERSIGHT HEARING ON BUS SAFETY 

Dear Chairman Inouye and esteemed Committee Members: 

Houston, TX, September 15, 2008 

I  am  writing  you  on  a  very  personal  matter  that  requires  your  help.  Please  con-
sider  supporting  Bill  S.  2326,  The  Motorcoach  Enhanced  Safety  Act.  I  am  speaking 
to  you  today  as  a  constituent  and  as  a  person  who  has  been  personally  affected  by 
the current regulations governing bus safety. 

Let me give you a little background on me. After graduating with a Ph.D. in psy-
chology  from  University  of  Hawaii,  I  moved  back  to  Texas  on  July  12,  2008,  to  be 
closer  to  my  mother.  A  few  weeks  after  I  came  home,  my  mom  told  me  that  she 
was going on a church pilgrimage trip to Carthage, Missouri. Every year, thousands 
of  Vietnamese  Catholics  travel  from  all  over  the  United  States  to  Carthage  for  an 
annual  celebration  of  the  Virgin  Mary.  On  the  morning  of  Thursday,  August  7,  I 
gave  my  mom  a  hug  and  wished  her  a  good  trip  before  I  left  for  work.  I  reminded 
her  to  call  me  when  she  got  back  on  Sunday  so  I  could  pick  her  up  and  then  my 
brother  and  I  would  take  her  to  dinner  for  her  63rd  birthday.  But  we  did  not  have 
that opportunity because my mom’s bus crashed outside of Sherman, Texas at 12:45 
a.m.  on  Friday,  August  8,  2008.  My  mother,  Catherine  Tuong  Lam,  was  one  of  the 
17  victims  who  died  in  the  Sherman  bus  accident.  Catherine  worked  as  a  social 
worker  for  the  Texas  Department  of  Human  Services  in  Houston,  TX  for  almost  30 
years.  In  addition  to  serving  her  community,  one  of  her  greatest  achievements  in 
life was raising her children to be strong, successful adults on her own after my fa-
ther  passed  away  in  1985.  She  was  vibrant  and  healthy  and  I  have  lost  her.  She 
will never see me or my brother get married. She will never meet her future grand-
children.  Why?  Because  she  had  the  misfortune  of  traveling  on  a  bus  that  did  not 
have  the  safety  measures  recommended  by  the  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board (NTSB). 

Although  my  grief  is  very  profound,  some  of  my  community  members  have  suf-
fered  even  greater  losses.  The  day  after  my  brother  and  I  buried  our  mother,  my 
brother  went  to  a  joint  funeral  for  six  of  my  mom’s  friends  and  I  went  to  a  joint 
funeral  for  five  of  my  mom’s  friends.  Our  community  is  distraught  over  the  loss  of 
so many loved ones. My friend, Michael Tan Le, lost his father, mother, and mother- 
in-law in the Sherman Bus Accident while two other family members suffered seri-
ous  injuries.  Mrs.  Vivica  Nguyen  who  would  have  celebrated  her  30th  birthday  in 
a  few  days  leaves  two  children  under  the  age  of  10  behind,  in  the  care  of  her  hus-
band  Scott  Tran,  who  has  broken  ribs  and  can  hardly  stand  straight  as  a  result  of 
his  injuries  sustained  in  the  Sherman  bus  accident.  My  mother’s  good  friend,  Mr. 
Khiem Nguyen leaves behind a wife of 44 years, several children, and many grand-
children. 

Parents  have  lost  their  children.  Children  have  lost  their  parents.  Brothers  have 
lost their sisters. I was shocked and devastated to lose my mother so suddenly. Now 
that  I  have  had  some  time  to  grieve,  I  wonder  what  you  and  I  can  do  together  to 
ensure  that  other  families  do  not  have  to  experience  a  tragedy  like  this.  The  Na-
tional Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) is currently investigating the cause(s) of 
the  Sherman  Bus  Accident.  The  investigation  may  take  a  couple  of  years  to  com-
plete, but it is already evident that seatbelts and glazing on the bus windows would 
have  minimized  the  large  number  of  fatalities  and  serious  injuries  that  happened 
in  our  accident.  I  can  attest  to  this  because  not  only  did  we  lose  our  mother,  we 
lost  many  of  our  friends.  The  current  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration 
(FMCSA) regulations governing bus safety are inadequate. Federal regulations can-
not  stop  bus  accidents  from  occurring;  however,  regulations  can  mandate  increased 
safety  measures  that  would  minimize  the  devastating  number  of  serious  injuries 
and fatalities that result from current bus standards. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

82 

Just  days  ago,  Hurricane  Ike  caused  severe  damage  in  the  Houston/Galveston 
area.  My  office  at  UTMB  hospital  on  Galveston  Island  is  ruined  and  my  house  in 
Houston  has  sustained  severe  damages.  Even  though  I  have  lost  my  home  and  my 
workplace,  those  losses  are  nothing  compared  to  the  loss  of  my  mother.  And  that 
is why I am here in front of all of you, because I believe in the importance of pass-
ing this bill now. How many more lives must be crippled or lost before the cost/ben-
efit analyses show that the benefits of saving lives far exceeds the costs of increased 
safety measures? NTSB has issued numerous recommendations for motorcoach safe-
ty  belts  since  1968  and  for  improved  safety  glazing  since  1973.  How  many  further 
research  studies  are  needed  to  replicate  the  current  findings  that  show  how  loss  of 
life  can  be  prevented  simply  with  the  installation  of  seatbelts  and  glazing  on  win-
dows in motorcoaches? The time to act is now. More time is not needed to show that 
current bus safety standards are not enough. We cannot leave the fate of our fellow 
Americans to the motorcoach industries. We must take a strong stand. The time to 
act is now. 

NTSB  safety  recommendations  for  motorcoach  operations  have  languished  for 
years  and  Congressional  hearings  have  identified  numerous  oversight  and  enforce-
ment  failings  of  the  FMCSA.  The  NTSB  recommendations  address  needed  Federal 
Government  actions  to  improve  the  safety  of  the  vehicle  and  protect  its  occupants, 
to establish minimal training requirements for motorcoach operators, and to require 
better operational procedures. Again, I urge you that the time to act is now. 

On behalf of my mother, Catherine Tuong Lam, and the other Sherman Bus Acci-
dent  victims,  I  implore  you  to  consider  supporting  The  Motorcoach  Safety  Bill  (S. 
2326)  sponsored  by  Senators  Kay  Bailey  Hutchison  and  Sherrod  Brown.  Legislation 
is  absolutely  needed  to  correct  deadly  motorcoach  safety  problems.  Please  help  pre-
vent  other  families  from  going  through  what  my  brother  and  I  have  been  through 
in dealing with my beloved mother’s loss now. 

Respectfully, 

YEN-CHI LE, Ph.D. 

September 18, 2008 

Senate Subcommittee on Surface Transportation and Marine Infrastructure, Safety, 

and Security 

Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee 
Dear Senators, 

I  am  writing  this  letter  in  support  of  Senate  Bill  2326,  because  I  believe  that  is 
a  critical  piece  of  motorcoach  safety  legislation  that  is  long  overdue.  It  is  a  vital 
piece  of  legislation  needed  to  prevent  any  further  injuries  or  deaths  like  the  ones 
that affected the families of Bluffton University. 

I  am  Lynn  Mesley,  the  mother  of  James  Hausman,  survivor  of  the  Bluffton  Uni-
versity Bus Crash that occurred on March 2, 2007. The crash occurred on Northside 
Side, in Atlanta, Georgia and James lost five of his teammates that morning on the 
highway as a result of that crash. 

My son James is currently a senior at Bluffton, majoring in Mathematics and con-
sidering  a  career  in  law.  He  is  doing  well  academically  and  athletically  at  school 
and  is  very  strong-willed  and  independent.  He  has  handled  the  after  effects  of  the 
accident with the courage, strength and dignity lacking in much older men. The last 
18  months  have  forced  James  and  all  of  the  surviving  players  to  deal  with  issues 
that they should not be faced with until much later in life. 

My  son  was  seated  in  the  fifth  row  of  the  motorcoach  on  the  driver’s  side.  The 
final report from the NTSB and the story relayed from our son the day of the acci-
dent  shows  that  the  fatalities  from  the  crash  all  occurred  from  the  same  area  that 
he  was  sitting  in.  Only  by  the  Grace  of  God  were  we  able  to  talk  to  and  take  our 
son home with us from Atlanta after the crash. 

Unfortunately, the Bluffton incident is only one of many such tragedies. 
I  believe  S.  2326  is  the  needed  step  to  decrease  the  possibility  of  future  deaths 
and injuries due to the lack of basic safety measures such as safety belts and safety 
glass. 

My  husband  and  I  are  both  firefighter/paramedics  by  trade  and  we  see  firsthand 
frequently the differences that safety belts make in automobiles. We have seen peo-
ple  survive  automobile  accidents  that  they  should  have  been  killed  in  and  we  have 
also  seen  the  reverse.  We  have  seen  people  killed  in  minor  crashes  as  a  result  of 
the failure to wear a safety belt. 

The  NTSB  has  been  recommending  for  years,  (at  least  the  last  ten—minimum), 
to  improve  safety  features  in  the  motorcoach  industry.  These  recommendations  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

83 

clude: crash avoidance technologies to prevent rollovers, ejection prevention features 
such  as—safety  belts,  advanced  window  glazing  and  increased  roof  strength  to  pre-
vent/decrease  roof  crush,  fire  protection  improvements,  improved  driver  education 
and medical certifications and more accessible passenger evacuation routes. 

Unfortunately, this was not a topic that I was familiar with until March 2, 2007, 
at  5:40  a.m.  when  my  son  called  me  after  crawling  through  the  windshield  of  a 
crashed  motorcoach  in  the  middle  of  1–75  in  Atlanta,  GA.  I  did  make  a  promise  to 
my  son  standing  in  the  hospital  that  morning  that  we  would  do  everything  in  our 
power to make sure that the appropriate safety changes would be enacted. 

S.  2326  will  be  the  legislation  that  will  finally  enact  the  recommendations  that 

the NTSB has been heralding since at least 1999. 

I urge you to pass S. 2326 so that no other families have to endure what the fami-
lies  of  Bluffton  University  and  many  other  families  have  had  to  endure.  I  am  very 
dedicated to this cause and am determined to see it through its fruition. 

Thank you for your consideration, 

LYNN MESLEY. 

Honorable Senators, 

I  am  here  today  in  support  of  Senate  Bill  2326.  Unfortunately  I  have  a  personal 
experience relating to this bill. My son was a member of the Bluffton baseball team 
that left the overpass in Atlanta last year. We were lucky that he survived the acci-
dent; however we lost five of his teammates during this tragedy. As you know, mor-
bidity  and  mortality  cost  this  country  millions  each  year.  Prevention  is  the  venue 
to  prevent  unnecessary  grief  and  loss  from  accidents  like  these.  Commercial  bus 
safety  measures  instituted  in  a  timely  manner  as  legislated  in  this  bill  will  reduce 
the continued loss of life associated with bus accidents. 

I  am  a  professional  firefighter  paramedic  and  a  member  of  FEMA  USAR  with 
Ohio  Task  Force  1.  I  have  been  in  this  field  since  1974  and  I  have  been  witness 
to  the  changes  occurring  in  our  transportation  system.  I  have  seen  that  seat  belts 
saved many lives which would have otherwise been lost. I have witnessed the value 
of  vehicle  compartmentalization  on  newer  cars.  Air  bags,  roll  over  roof  reinforce-
ments, fuel cut of valves, and crumple zones to absorb the kinetic energy of impacts 
are  just  a  few  of  the  safety  features  found  in  the  transportation  industry.  Even  my 
fire  truck  has  seat  belts  installed  and  mandated  they  be  used  while  responding  to 
an  emergency.  I  have  trained  and  practiced  cutting  apart  school  buses.  They  are 
built like tanks to protect our children from harm. I also have witnessed what hap-
pens  in  motor  vehicle  accident  when  the  occupants  do  not  wear  seat  belts  and  are 
ejected. The outcome is usually fatal. Because of my background, I am a strong sup-
porter for increased safety requirements for the motorcoach industry. These require-
ments need to be in place as son as possible. 

Unfortunately  it  takes  a  tragedy  and  public  outcry  to  legislate  needed  changes 
that  should  have  been  implemented  years  ago.  The  NTSB  has  recommended  these 
changes  and  their  voice  has  gone  unheard.  How  many  more  of  our  sons,  daughter, 
and relatives will be lost before we heed the warning and make the necessary safety 
requirements  law.  The  motorcoach  industry  will  continue  to  resist  changes  that  af-
fect  their  profit  margins.  We  must  act  in  the  public’s  behalf  and  enforce  change  in 
the  industry.  We  the  families  of  motorcoach  victims  have  united  to  see  this  bill  en-
acted as is without change. 

Thank  you  for  your  attention  to  this  important  piece  of  legislation.  I  am  sure  it 

will save many lives once it becomes law. 

Sincerely, 

BARRY A. MESLEY, 

Ohio. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. JOHN HILL 

Question 1. Why did your agency give operating authority to bus companies with-
out  first  verifying  that  the  buses  they  intend  to  use  are  safe  to  carry  passengers? 
Do you need more resources or authority to conduct these on-site inspections of new 
entrants before they hit the road? 

Answer. The current legal requirement for a motor carrier to obtain operating au-
thority is finding the applicant to be ‘‘willing and able to perform the operations and 
to comply with all applicable statutory and regulatory provisions.’’ To be considered 
fit,  an  applicant  needs  to  show  compliance  with  the  applicable  financial  responsi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

84 

bility  and  safety  fitness  requirements.  In  the  past,  unless  an  application  was  op-
posed  on  the  grounds  of  the  applicant  not  being  fit,  the  authority  was  granted. 
FMCSA  depended  solely  upon  protests  filed  by  the  public  to  identify  unfit  appli-
cants. This was mostly because during the application stage, there is little informa-
tion  available  to  assess  whether  a  carrier  can  comply  with  the  regulations.  In  fact, 
a  carrier  may  decide  not  to  purchase  or  lease  vehicles  for  an  operation  until  after 
it  is  granted  authority—wishing  to  delay  investments  until  it  has  the  ability  to 
enter the business. 

However,  the  Agency  found  relying  on  protests  to  be  insufficient  in  identifying 
passenger  carrier  applicants  that  may  be  unfit.  In  August  2008,  the  Agency  imple-
mented a more rigorous administrative review process for new motorcoach operating 
authority applicants which compares available applicant information to existing car-
rier  information  to  determine  if  the  Agency  has  any  information  that  indicates  the 
new  carrier  may  be  connected  with  previous  or  existing  carriers  the  Agency  has 
identified  as  unsafe.  An  unsafe  carrier  is  one  for  which  FMCSA  has  data  outlining 
poor  performance  during  inspections,  a  less  than  satisfactory  safety  rating,  or  hav-
ing been subject to civil penalties or out-of-service orders from the Agency. 

In  addition,  the  application  is  vetted  by  FMCSA  at  the  local  level  and  with  the 
appropriate State agency. If an affiliation with a motorcoach carrier with an unsafe 
record  is  detected  through  this  vetting  process,  the  applicant  is  required  to  provide 
additional  documentation.  The  FMCSA  will  deny  authority  to  any  motorcoach  car-
rier  attempting  to  reestablish  itself  as  a  new  carrier  if  it  is  determined  that  it  has 
a previous unsafe record. 

The Agency’s new entrant safety assurance regulations require all new motor car-
riers  be  subjected  to  safety  monitoring  for  an  18  month  period  following  the  com-
mencement of operations. As a part of this safety monitoring, all new motor carriers 
are  subjected  to  an  onsite  safety  audit  within  their  first  18  months  of  operations. 
In order to determine if the carrier has established sound safety management proc-
esses, it is necessary for the carrier to generate safety performance data in the form 
of roadside inspections, crash reports, etc., so they need to be operating for a period 
of  time  before  the  safety  audit  is  scheduled.  However,  due  to  the  Agency’s  concern 
about passenger carriers, the FMCSA established an internal policy to complete the 
new  entrant  safety  audits  of  passenger  carriers  within  9  months,  rather  than  the 
18 months provided in the originating statute. In practice, the safety audit of a new 
motorcoach carrier is conducted within 4.5 months. 

The Agency is also in the process of finalizing revisions to the New Entrant proc-
ess  in  a  rule,  New  Entrant  Safety  Assurance  Process,  which  would  raise  the  level 
of  compliance  required  to  pass  the  safety  audit.  The  FMCSA  expects  the  final  rule 
to be published the week of December 15, 2008. 

Question 2. The FMCSA began work on a Bus Crash Causation Study in 2004 to 
analyze different bus crashes and evaluate the factors that caused them. This study 
was  expected  to  be  completed  in  2007;  now  your  agency  is  saying  November  2008. 
Has this study been completed yet, and why is it taking so long to produce? 

Answer. The original plan for the Bus Crash Causation Study was to collect data 
on  50  to  100  serious  bus  crashes  in  the  state  of  New  Jersey  in  2005.  However,  the 
number of bus crashes was fewer than expected, so FMCSA extended data collection 
through  2006.  Even  then,  there  were  only  39  crashes  in  the  2-year  period.  The 
Agency expects to deliver a final report on the study by early 2009. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

JACQUELINE S. GILLAN 

Question.  Which  of  the  safety  issues  that  need  improvement  in  the  bus  industry 

also need to be visited in the trucking industry? 

Answer.  Almost  all  safety  issues  involving  the  crash  protection  of  occupants  in 
motorcoach safety that are proposed in the Motorcoach Enhanced Safety Act of 2008 
(the  Act)  are  also  needed  for  large  trucks.  For  example,  insufficient  attention  has 
been paid to preventing truck driver ejection in rollover crashes. A high percentage 
of  truck  drivers  who  die  in  rollover  crashes  are  the  result  of  ejection  through  open 
door  and  shattered  glazing,  especially  side  windows.  These  ejection  deaths  can  be 
dramatically reduced through the use of advanced, anti-ejection glazing and fail-safe 
latch designs that prevent door openings in rollover crashes. 

Truck  drivers  are  also  prone  to  serious  injury  from  impacts  with  dangerous  inte-
rior surfaces in both straight (single-unit) trucks and in tractor cabs. Currently, the 
only  safety  design  feature  in  large  trucks  to  protect  the  truck  driver  are  seat  belts, 
which  have  a  substantially  lower  use  rate  compared  to  passenger  motor  vehicles. 
Impact  mitigation  for  truck  drivers  through  the  use  of  supplementary,  passive  sys-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

85 

tems  such  as  upper  and  lower  interior  air  bags  has  essentially  been  ignored  by  the 
National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration,  although  the  use  of  these  safety 
systems in addition to active restraints (seat belts) would substantially reduce truck 
driver injuries with interior surfaces and components. 

The  Act  also  provides  for  required  installation  of  collision  avoidance  technologies 
to  reduce  motorcoach  rollover  crashes  that  result  from  driver  loss  of  control.  These 
include  electronic  stability  control  and  roll  stability  control  which  strongly  counter-
act  a  motorcoach’s  loss  of  tire  adhesion  and  the  driver  losing  steering  and  braking 
control  over  the  vehicle.  These  crash  avoidance  countermeasures  are  just  as  cru-
cially important for large trucks, especially combination trucks pulling trailers that 
are highly prone to rollover and loss of control crashes. Preventing both straight and 
tractor-trailer  large  trucks  from  loss-of-control  events  will  result  in  substantial  re-
ductions  in  rollover  crashes,  as  well  as  departures  from  travel  lanes  into  adjacent 
lanes, resulting in multiple deaths to occupants of other vehicles, or into dangerous 
roadside  environments  where  the  probability  of  a  rollover  crash  is  dramatically  in-
creased.  Overall,  reducing  large  truck  loss-of-control  crashes  can  substantially  re-
duce the death toll resulting from large truck collisions with small passenger motor 
vehicles.  Currently,  the  overwhelming  majority  of  those  motor  vehicle  occupants 
who die in large truck-passenger motor vehicles are the occupants of the small vehi-
cles.  For  example,  when  a  single  truck  has  a  fatal  crash  with  a  single  small  pas-
senger  motor  vehicle,  98  percent  of  those  who  die  are  in  the  car,  van,  or  pickup 
truck. 

Large  trucks  also  are  inadequately  regulated  at  the  present  time  for  the  strict 
oversight  needed  to  ensure  that  only  the  safest  motor  carriers  and  drivers  operate 
them. Recent regulations issued by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration 
(FMCSA)  have  rejected  calls  from  both  the  safety  and  state  enforcement  commu-
nities  for  more  stringent  oversight  of  commercial  driver  physical  qualifications  and 
the  prevention  of  medical  certificate  fraud.  FMCSA  has  also  issued  a  final  rule  re-
jecting  the  safety  community’s  recommendations  that  new  motor  carrier  entrants, 
including  trucking  companies,  undergo  both  proficiency  testing  and  pre-authoriza-
tion safety audits before beginning operations in order to ensure that motor carrier 
management is familiar with and will comply with all Federal Motor Carrier Safety 
Regulations and the Hazardous Materials Regulations. 

In  addition,  commercial  drivers  of  all  types  of  commercial  motor  vehicles  should 
be  required  to  undergo  rigorous  driver  training  programs.  Unfortunately,  FMCSA 
issued a final rule a few months ago that requires only a weak, inadequate training 
for both motorcoach and truck drivers. 

Currently,  truck  drivers  under  the  recent  final  hours  of  service  regulation  issued 
in November 2008 by FMCSA are allowed to drive 28 percent more hours and work 
40 percent more total hours than allowed under the pre–2003 hours of service regu-
lation.  All  truck  drivers  can  accrue  98  hours  of  work  and  88  hours  of  driving  over 
8  consecutive  calendar  days,  and  some  truck  drivers  can  legally  accrue  more  than 
100 hours of work over this period of time. This regulation exposes drivers to much 
more  crash  risk  than  under  the  old  regulation  while  also  promoting  more  fatigue 
that will result in reduced alertness and safe driving performance for truck drivers. 
The regulation has twice been overturned in Federal appellate court and remanded 
to FMCSA, yet the agency defiantly has re-issued the same regulation again despite 
court  rulings  rejecting  the  agency’s  basis  for  the  rule.  This  rule  is  a  serious  blow 
to motor carrier safety and must be decisively and finally overturned. 

It is crucially important to have real-time monitoring and recordation both of com-
mercial  driver  hours  of  service  and  truck  and  motorcoach  location  and  routing. 
Truck  drivers  currently  falsify  their  logbooks  on  a  regular  basis  to  conceal  hours  of 
service violations that amount to dangerous, illegal driving and working hours that 
cheat  on  crucial  rest  and  recovery  time  needed  to  restore  safe  driving  performance. 
Electronic  on-board  recorders  (EOBRs)  must  be  required  on  all  motorcoaches  and 
large  trucks.  EOBRs  must  be  linked  with  engine  and  transmission  functions  and 
also  incorporate  Global  Positioning  Systems  (GPS)  that  track  driver  and  vehicle  lo-
cation  in  real  time  to  ensure  rapid  responses  to  emergency  events  involving  motor-
coach  passengers  and  truck  crashes,  especially  truck  incidents  involving  actual  or 
potential  release  of  placarded  amounts  of  hazardous  materials,  and  to  prevent 
trucks  using  illegal  routes  to  transport  overweight  loads  and  prohibited  hazardous 
materials. 

Large  trucks  and  motorcoaches  also  should  be  required  to  undergo  annual  state 
inspections  that  demonstrate  for  the  record  the  condition  of  these  vehicles  and 
whether  they  conform  to  all  safety  requirements  established  by  NHTSA  and  by 
FMCSA. Currently, motor carriers can self-inspect their equipment, and the quality 
of those inspections to ensure safe operation of trucks and motorcoaches is unknown 
because  FMCSA  does  not  audit  these  self-inspections  to  determine  their  adequacy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

86 

Generally  speaking,  all  occupant  protection,  collision  avoidance,  driver  oversight, 
and  enforcement  requirements  for  motorcoaches,  apart  from  those  that  are  unique 
to  these  large  passenger-carrying  buses  (such  as  passenger  evacuation  counter-
measures), are equally necessary for large truck safety enhancement. However, both 
NHTSA  and  FMCSA  have  either  delayed  or  rejected  progressive  safety  regulations 
that  would  reduce  both  the  frequency  and  severity  of  large  truck  crashes  and,  in 
turn,  reduce  the  annual  death  toll  from  large  truck  crashes,  which  averages  nearly 
5,000 fatalities each year. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:50 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80274.TXT JACKIE

